Ohio, session 136, SB450.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Ohio: Section 101.01. That sections 151.01, 151.08, 164.03, 164.08, 3318.042, 3318.49, 3343.05, 5751.02, and 5751.20 be amended and sections 3318.33 and 3343.11 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 151.01. (A) As used in sections 151.01 to 151.11 and 151.40 of the Revised Code and in the applicable bond proceedings unless otherwise provided: (1) "Bond proceedings" means the resolutions, orders, agreements, and credit enhancement facilities, and amendments and supplements to them, or any one or more or combination of them, authorizing, awarding, or providing for the terms and conditions applicable to or providing for the security or liquidity of, the particular obligations, and the provisions contained in those obligations. (2) "Bond service fund" means the respective bond service fund created by section 151.03, 151.04, 151.05, 151.06, 151.07, 151.08, 151.09, 151.10, 151.11, or 151.40 of the Revised Code, and any accounts in that fund, including all moneys and investments, and earnings from investments, credited and to be credited to that fund and accounts as and to the extent provided in the applicable bond proceedings. (3) "Capital facilities" means capital facilities or projects as referred to in section 151.03, 151.04, 151.05, 151.06, 151.07, 151.08, 151.09, 151.10, 151.11, or 151.40 of the Revised Code. (4) "Costs of capital facilities" means the costs of acquiring, constructing, reconstructing, rehabilitating, remodeling, renovating, enlarging, improving, equipping, or furnishing capital facilities, and of the financing of those costs. "Costs of capital facilities" includes, without limitation, and in addition to costs referred to in section 151.03, 151.04, 151.05, 151.06, 151.07, 151.08, 151.09, 151.10, 151.11, or 151.40 of the Revised Code, the cost of clearance and preparation of the site and of any land to be used in connection with capital facilities, the cost of any indemnity and surety bonds and premiums on insurance, all related direct administrative expenses and allocable portions of direct costs of the issuing authority, costs of engineering and architectural services, designs, plans, specifications, surveys, and estimates of cost, financing costs, interest on obligations, including but not limited to, interest from the date of their issuance to the time when interest is to be paid from sources other than proceeds of obligations, amounts necessary to establish any reserves as required by the bond proceedings, the reimbursement of all moneys advanced or applied by or borrowed from any person or governmental agency or entity for the payment of any item of costs of capital facilities, and all other expenses necessary or incident to planning or determining feasibility or practicability with respect to capital facilities, and such other expenses as may be necessary or incident to the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, remodeling, renovation, enlargement, improvement, equipment, and furnishing of capital facilities, the financing of those costs, and the placing of the capital facilities in use and operation, including any one, part of, or combination of those classes of costs and expenses. For purposes of sections 122.085 to 122.0820 of the Revised Code, "costs of capital facilities" includes "allowable costs" as defined in section 122.085 of the Revised Code. (5) "Credit enhancement facilities," "financing costs," and "interest" or "interest equivalent" have the same meanings as in section 133.01 of the Revised Code. (6) "Debt service" means principal, including any mandatory sinking fund or redemption requirements for retirement of obligations, interest and other accreted amounts, interest equivalent, and any redemption premium, payable on obligations. If not prohibited by the applicable bond proceedings, debt service may include costs relating to credit enhancement facilities that are related to and represent, or are intended to provide a source of payment of or limitation on, other debt service. (7) "Issuing authority" means the Ohio public facilities commission created in section 151.02 of the Revised Code for obligations issued under section 151.03, 151.04, 151.05, 151.07, 151.08, 151.09, 151.10, or 151.11 of the Revised Code, or the treasurer of state, or the officer who by law performs the functions of that office, for obligations issued under section 151.06 or 151.40 of the Revised Code. (8) "Net proceeds" means amounts received from the sale of obligations, excluding amounts used to refund or retire outstanding obligations, amounts required to be deposited into special funds pursuant to the applicable bond proceedings, and amounts to be used to pay financing costs. (9) "Obligations" means bonds, notes, or other evidences of obligation of the state, including any appertaining interest coupons, issued under Section 2k, 2l, 2m, 2n, 2o, 2p, 2q, 2s, 2t, or 15 of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, and pursuant to sections 151.01 to 151.11 or 151.40 of the Revised Code or other general assembly authorization. (10) "Principal amount" means the aggregate of the amount as stated or provided for in the applicable bond proceedings as the amount on which interest or interest equivalent on particular obligations is initially calculated. Principal amount does not include any premium paid to the state by the initial purchaser of the obligations. "Principal amount" of a capital appreciation bond, as defined in division (C) of section 3334.01 of the Revised Code, means its face amount, and "principal amount" of a zero coupon bond, as defined in division (J) of section 3334.01 of the Revised Code, means the discounted offering price at which the bond is initially sold to the public, disregarding any purchase price discount to the original purchaser, if provided for pursuant to the bond proceedings. (11) "Special funds" or "funds," unless the context indicates otherwise, means the bond service fund, and any other funds, including any reserve funds, created under the bond proceedings and stated to be special funds in those proceedings, including moneys and investments, and earnings from investments, credited and to be credited to the particular fund. Special funds do not include the school building program assistance fund created by section 3318.25 of the Revised Code, the higher education improvement fund created by division (F) of section 154.21 of the Revised Code, the higher education improvement taxable fund created by division (G) of section 154.21 of the Revised Code, the highway capital improvement bond fund created by section 5528.53 of the Revised Code, the state parks and natural resources fund created by section 1557.02 of the Revised Code, the coal research and development fund created by section 1555.15 of the Revised Code, the clean Ohio conservation fund created by section 164.27 of the Revised Code, the job ready site development fund created by section 122.0820 of the Revised Code, the third frontier research and development fund created by section 184.19 of the Revised Code, the third frontier research and development taxable bond fund created by section 184.191 of the Revised Code, or other funds created by the bond proceedings that are not stated by those proceedings to be special funds. (B) Subject to Section 2l, 2m, 2n, 2o, 2p, 2q, 2s, 2t, or 15, and Section 17, of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, the state, by the issuing authority, is authorized to issue and sell, as provided in sections 151.03 to 151.11 or 151.40 of the Revised Code, and in respective aggregate principal amounts as from time to time provided or authorized by the general assembly, general obligations of this state for the purpose of paying costs of capital facilities or projects identified by or pursuant to general assembly action. (C) Each issue of obligations shall be authorized by resolution or order of the issuing authority. The bond proceedings shall provide for or authorize the manner for determining the principal amount or maximum principal amount of obligations of an issue, the principal maturity or maturities, the interest rate or rates, the date of and the dates of payment of interest on the obligations, their denominations, and the place or places of payment of debt service which may be within or outside the state. Unless otherwise provided by law, the latest principal maturity may not be later than the earlier of the thirty-first day of December of the twenty-fifth calendar year after the year of issuance of the particular obligations or of the twenty-fifth calendar year after the year in which the original obligation to pay was issued or entered into. Sections 9.96, 9.98, 9.981, 9.982, and 9.983 of the Revised Code apply to obligations. The purpose of the obligations may be stated in the bond proceedings in general terms, such as, as applicable, "financing or assisting in the financing of projects as provided in Section 2l of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution," "financing or assisting in the financing of highway capital improvement projects as provided in Section 2m of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution," "paying costs of capital facilities for a system of common schools throughout the state as authorized by Section 2n of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution," "paying costs of capital facilities for state-supported and state-assisted institutions of higher education as authorized by Section 2n of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution," "paying costs of coal research and development as authorized by Section 15 of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution," "financing or assisting in the financing of local subdivision capital improvement projects as authorized by Section 2m, 2p, and 2s, and 2t of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution," "paying costs of conservation projects as authorized by Sections 2o and 2q of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution," "paying costs of revitalization projects as authorized by Sections 2o and 2q of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution," "paying costs of preparing sites for industry, commerce, distribution, or research and development as authorized by Section 2p of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution," or "paying costs of research and development as authorized by Section 2p of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution." (D) The issuing authority may appoint or provide for the appointment of paying agents, bond registrars, securities depositories, clearing corporations, and transfer agents, and may without need for any other approval retain or contract for the services of underwriters, investment bankers, financial advisers, accounting experts, marketing, remarketing, indexing, and administrative agents, other consultants, and independent contractors, including printing services, as are necessary in the judgment of the issuing authority to carry out the issuing authority's functions under this chapter. When the issuing authority is the Ohio public facilities commission, the issuing authority also may without need for any other approval retain or contract for the services of attorneys and other professionals for that purpose. Financing costs are payable, as may be provided in the bond proceedings, from the proceeds of the obligations, from special funds, or from other moneys available for the purpose. (E) The bond proceedings may contain additional provisions customary or appropriate to the financing or to the obligations or to particular obligations including, but not limited to, provisions for: (1) The redemption of obligations prior to maturity at the option of the state or of the holder or upon the occurrence of certain conditions, and at particular price or prices and under particular terms and conditions; (2) The form of and other terms of the obligations; (3) The establishment, deposit, investment, and application of special funds, and the safeguarding of moneys on hand or on deposit, in lieu of the applicability of provisions of Chapter 131. or 135. of the Revised Code, but subject to any special provisions of sections 151.01 to 151.11 or 151.40 of the Revised Code with respect to the application of particular funds or moneys. Any financial institution that acts as a depository of any moneys in special funds or other funds under the bond proceedings may furnish indemnifying bonds or pledge securities as required by the issuing authority. (4) Any or every provision of the bond proceedings being binding upon the issuing authority and upon such governmental agency or entity, officer, board, commission, authority, agency, department, institution, district, or other person or body as may from time to time be authorized to take actions as may be necessary to perform all or any part of the duty required by the provision; (5) The maintenance of each pledge or instrument comprising part of the bond proceedings until the state has fully paid or provided for the payment of the debt service on the obligations or met other stated conditions; (6) In the event of default in any payments required to be made by the bond proceedings, or by any other agreement of the issuing authority made as part of a contract under which the obligations were issued or secured, including a credit enhancement facility, the enforcement of those payments by mandamus, a suit in equity, an action at law, or any combination of those remedial actions; (7) The rights and remedies of the holders or owners of obligations or of book-entry interests in them, and of third parties under any credit enhancement facility, and provisions for protecting and enforcing those rights and remedies, including limitations on rights of individual holders or owners; (8) The replacement of mutilated, destroyed, lost, or stolen obligations; (9) The funding, refunding, or advance refunding, or other provision for payment, of obligations that will then no longer be outstanding for purposes of this section or of the applicable bond proceedings; (10) Amendment of the bond proceedings; (11) Any other or additional agreements with the owners of obligations, and such other provisions as the issuing authority determines, including limitations, conditions, or qualifications, relating to any of the foregoing. (F) The great seal of the state or a facsimile of it may be affixed to or printed on the obligations. The obligations requiring execution by or for the issuing authority shall be signed as provided in the bond proceedings. Any obligations may be signed by the individual who on the date of execution is the authorized signer although on the date of these obligations that individual is not an authorized signer. In case the individual whose signature or facsimile signature appears on any obligation ceases to be an authorized signer before delivery of the obligation, that signature or facsimile is nevertheless valid and sufficient for all purposes as if that individual had remained the authorized signer until delivery. (G) Obligations are investment securities under Chapter 1308. of the Revised Code. Obligations may be issued in bearer or in registered form, registrable as to principal alone or as to both principal and interest, or both, or in certificated or uncertificated form, as the issuing authority determines. Provision may be made for the exchange, conversion, or transfer of obligations and for reasonable charges for registration, exchange, conversion, and transfer. Pending preparation of final obligations, the issuing authority may provide for the issuance of interim instruments to be exchanged for the final obligations. (H) Obligations may be sold at public sale or at private sale, in such manner, and at such price at, above or below par, all as determined by and provided by the issuing authority in the bond proceedings. (I) Except to the extent that rights are restricted by the bond proceedings, any owner of obligations or provider of a credit enhancement facility may by any suitable form of legal proceedings protect and enforce any rights relating to obligations or that facility under the laws of this state or granted by the bond proceedings. Those rights include the right to compel the performance of all applicable duties of the issuing authority and the state. Each duty of the issuing authority and that authority's officers, staff, and employees, and of each state entity or agency, or using district or using institution, and its officers, members, staff, or employees, undertaken pursuant to the bond proceedings, is hereby established as a duty of the entity or individual having authority to perform that duty, specifically enjoined by law and resulting from an office, trust, or station within the meaning of section 2731.01 of the Revised Code. The individuals who are from time to time the issuing authority, members or officers of the issuing authority, or those members' designees acting pursuant to section 151.02 of the Revised Code, or the issuing authority's officers, staff, or employees, are not liable in their personal capacities on any obligations or otherwise under the bond proceedings. (J)(1) Subject to Section 2k, 2l, 2m, 2n, 2o, 2p, 2q, 2s, 2t, or 15, and Section 17, of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution and sections 151.01 to 151.11 or 151.40 of the Revised Code, the issuing authority may, in addition to the authority referred to in division (B) of this section, authorize and provide for the issuance of: (a) Obligations in the form of bond anticipation notes, and may provide for the renewal of those notes from time to time by the issuance of new notes. The holders of notes or appertaining interest coupons have the right to have debt service on those notes paid solely from the moneys and special funds that are or may be pledged to that payment, including the proceeds of bonds or renewal notes or both, as the issuing authority provides in the bond proceedings authorizing the notes. Notes may be additionally secured by covenants of the issuing authority to the effect that the issuing authority and the state will do all things necessary for the issuance of bonds or renewal notes in such principal amount and upon such terms as may be necessary to provide moneys to pay when due the debt service on the notes, and apply their proceeds to the extent necessary, to make full and timely payment of debt service on the notes as provided in the applicable bond proceedings. In the bond proceedings authorizing the issuance of bond anticipation notes the issuing authority shall set forth for the bonds anticipated an estimated schedule of annual principal payments the latest of which shall be no later than provided in division (C) of this section. While the notes are outstanding there shall be deposited, as shall be provided in the bond proceedings for those notes, from the sources authorized for payment of debt service on the bonds, amounts sufficient to pay the principal of the bonds anticipated as set forth in that estimated schedule during the time the notes are outstanding, which amounts shall be used solely to pay the principal of those notes or of the bonds anticipated. (b) Obligations for the refunding, including funding and retirement, and advance refunding with or without payment or redemption prior to maturity, of any obligations previously issued. Refunding obligations may be issued in amounts sufficient to pay or to provide for repayment of the principal amount, including principal amounts maturing prior to the redemption of the remaining prior obligations, any redemption premium, and interest accrued or to accrue to the maturity or redemption date or dates, payable on the prior obligations, and related financing costs and any expenses incurred or to be incurred in connection with that issuance and refunding. Subject to the applicable bond proceedings, the portion of the proceeds of the sale of refunding obligations issued under division (J)(1)(b) of this section to be applied to debt service on the prior obligations shall be credited to an appropriate separate account in the bond service fund and held in trust for the purpose by the issuing authority or by a corporate trustee. Obligations authorized under this division shall be considered to be issued for those purposes for which the prior obligations were issued. (2) Except as otherwise provided in sections 151.01 to 151.11 or 151.40 of the Revised Code, bonds or notes authorized pursuant to division (J) of this section are subject to the provisions of those sections pertaining to obligations generally. (3) The principal amount of refunding or renewal obligations issued pursuant to division (J) of this section shall be in addition to the amount authorized by the general assembly as referred to in division (B) of the following sections: section 151.03, 151.04, 151.05, 151.06, 151.07, 151.08, 151.09, 151.10, 151.11, or 151.40 of the Revised Code. (K) Obligations are lawful investments for banks, savings and loan associations, credit union share guaranty corporations, trust companies, trustees, fiduciaries, insurance companies, including domestic for life and domestic not for life, trustees or other officers having charge of sinking and bond retirement or other special funds of the state and political subdivisions and taxing districts of this state, the sinking fund, the administrator of workers' compensation subject to the approval of the workers' compensation board, the state teachers retirement system, the public employees retirement system, the school employees retirement system, and the Ohio police and fire pension fund, notwithstanding any other provisions of the Revised Code or rules adopted pursuant to those provisions by any state agency with respect to investments by them, and are also acceptable as security for the repayment of the deposit of public moneys. The exemptions from taxation in Ohio as provided for in particular sections of the Ohio Constitution and section 5709.76 of the Revised Code apply to the obligations. (L)(1) Unless otherwise provided or provided for in any applicable bond proceedings, moneys to the credit of or in a special fund shall be disbursed on the order of the issuing authority. No such order is required for the payment, from the bond service fund or other special fund, when due of debt service or required payments under credit enhancement facilities. (2) Payments received by the state under interest rate hedges entered into as credit enhancement facilities under this chapter shall be deposited to the credit of the bond service fund for the obligations to which those credit enhancement facilities relate. (M) The full faith and credit, revenue, and taxing power of the state are and shall be pledged to the timely payment of debt service on outstanding obligations as it comes due, all in accordance with Section 2k, 2l, 2m, 2n, 2o, 2p, 2q, 2s, 2t, or 15 of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, and section 151.03, 151.04, 151.05, 151.06, 151.07, 151.08, 151.09, 151.10, or 151.11 of the Revised Code. Moneys referred to in Section 5a of Article XII, Ohio Constitution, may not be pledged or used for the payment of debt service except on obligations referred to in section 151.06 of the Revised Code. Net state lottery proceeds, as provided for and referred to in section 3770.06 of the Revised Code, may not be pledged or used for the payment of debt service except on obligations referred to in section 151.03 of the Revised Code. The state covenants, and that covenant shall be controlling notwithstanding any other provision of law, that the state and the applicable officers and agencies of the state, including the general assembly, shall, so long as any obligations are outstanding in accordance with their terms, maintain statutory authority for and cause to be levied, collected and applied sufficient pledged excises, taxes, and revenues of the state so that the revenues shall be sufficient in amounts to pay debt service when due, to establish and maintain any reserves and other requirements, and to pay financing costs, including costs of or relating to credit enhancement facilities, all as provided for in the bond proceedings. Those excises, taxes, and revenues are and shall be deemed to be levied and collected, in addition to the purposes otherwise provided for by law, to provide for the payment of debt service and financing costs in accordance with sections 151.01 to 151.11 of the Revised Code and the bond proceedings. (N) The general assembly may from time to time repeal or reduce any excise, tax, or other source of revenue pledged to the payment of the debt service pursuant to Section 2k, 2l, 2m, 2n, 2o, 2p, 2q, 2s, 2t, or 15 of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, and sections 151.01 to 151.11 or 151.40 of the Revised Code, and may levy, collect and apply any new or increased excise, tax, or revenue to meet the pledge, to the payment of debt service on outstanding obligations, of the state's full faith and credit, revenue and taxing power, or of designated revenues and receipts, except fees, excises or taxes referred to in Section 5a of Article XII, Ohio Constitution, for other than obligations referred to in section 151.06 of the Revised Code and except net state lottery proceeds for other than obligations referred to in section 151.03 of the Revised Code. Nothing in division (N) of this section authorizes any impairment of the obligation of this state to levy and collect sufficient excises, taxes, and revenues to pay debt service on obligations outstanding in accordance with their terms. (O) Each bond service fund is a trust fund and is hereby pledged to the payment of debt service on the applicable obligations. Payment of that debt service shall be made or provided for by the issuing authority in accordance with the bond proceedings without necessity for any act of appropriation. The bond proceedings may provide for the establishment of separate accounts in the bond service fund and for the application of those accounts only to debt service on specific obligations, and for other accounts in the bond service fund within the general purposes of that fund. (P) Subject to the bond proceedings pertaining to any obligations then outstanding in accordance with their terms, the issuing authority may in the bond proceedings pledge all, or such portion as the issuing authority determines, of the moneys in the bond service fund to the payment of debt service on particular obligations, and for the establishment and maintenance of any reserves for payment of particular debt service. (Q) The issuing authority shall by the fifteenth day of July of each fiscal year, certify or cause to be certified to the office of budget and management the total amount of moneys required during the current fiscal year to meet in full all debt service on the respective obligations and any related financing costs payable from the applicable bond service fund and not from the proceeds of refunding or renewal obligations. The issuing authority shall make or cause to be made supplemental certifications to the office of budget and management for each debt service payment date and at such other times during each fiscal year as may be provided in the bond proceedings or requested by that office. Debt service, costs of credit enhancement facilities, and other financing costs shall be set forth separately in each certification. If and so long as the moneys to the credit of the bond service fund, together with any other moneys available for the purpose, are insufficient to meet in full all payments when due of the amount required as stated in the certificate or otherwise, the office of budget and management shall at the times as provided in the bond proceedings, and consistent with any particular provisions in sections 151.03 to 151.11 and 151.40 of the Revised Code, transfer a sufficient amount to the bond service fund from the pledged revenues in the case of obligations issued pursuant to section 151.40 of the Revised Code, and in the case of other obligations from the revenues derived from excises, taxes, and other revenues, including net state lottery proceeds in the case of obligations referred to in section 151.03 of the Revised Code. (R) Unless otherwise provided in any applicable bond proceedings, moneys to the credit of special funds may be invested by or on behalf of the state only in one or more of the following: (1) Notes, bonds, or other direct obligations of the United States or of any agency or instrumentality of the United States, or in no-front-end-load money market mutual funds consisting exclusively of those obligations, or in repurchase agreements, including those issued by any fiduciary, secured by those obligations, or in collective investment funds consisting exclusively of those obligations; (2) Obligations of this state or any political subdivision of this state; (3) Certificates of deposit of any national bank located in this state and any bank, as defined in section 1101.01 of the Revised Code, subject to inspection by the superintendent of financial institutions; (4) The treasurer of state's pooled investment program under section 135.45 of the Revised Code. The income from investments referred to in division (R) of this section shall, unless otherwise provided in sections 151.01 to 151.11 or 151.40 of the Revised Code, be credited to special funds or otherwise as the issuing authority determines in the bond proceedings. Those investments may be sold or exchanged at times as the issuing authority determines, provides for, or authorizes. (S) The treasurer of state shall have responsibility for keeping records, making reports, and making payments, relating to any arbitrage rebate requirements under the applicable bond proceedings. Sec. 151.08. This section applies to obligations as defined in this section. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Capital facilities" or "capital improvement projects" means the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, improvement, planning, and equipping of roads and bridges, waste water treatment systems, water supply systems, solid waste disposal facilities, flood control systems, and storm water and sanitary collection, storage, and treatment facilities, including real property, interests in real property, facilities, and equipment related or incidental to those facilities. (2) "Costs of capital facilities" include related direct administrative expenses and allocable portions of direct costs of the Ohio public works commission and the local subdivision. (3) "Local subdivision" means any county, municipal corporation, township, sanitary district, or regional water and sewer district. (4) "Obligations" means obligations as defined in section 151.01 of the Revised Code issued to pay costs of capital facilities. (B)(1) The issuing authority shall issue obligations to pay costs of financing or assisting in the financing of the capital improvement projects of local subdivisions pursuant to Section 2m of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, section 151.01 of the Revised Code, and this section. Not more than one hundred twenty million dollars principal amount of obligations, plus the principal amount of obligations that in any prior fiscal years could have been, but were not, issued within that one-hundred-twenty-million dollar fiscal year limit, may be issued in any fiscal year. Not more than one billion two hundred million dollars principal amount of obligations pursuant to Section 2m of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution may be issued for the purposes of this section and division (B)(2) of section 164.09 of the Revised Code. (2) The issuing authority shall issue obligations to pay costs of financing or assisting in the financing of the capital improvement projects of local subdivisions pursuant to Section 2p of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, section 151.01 of the Revised Code, and this section. Not more than one hundred twenty million dollars in principal amount of such obligations may be issued in any of the first five fiscal years of issuance and not more than one hundred fifty million dollars in principal amount of such obligations may be issued in any of the next five fiscal years, plus in each case the principal amount of such obligations that in any prior fiscal year could have been but were not issued within those fiscal year limits. No obligations shall be issued for the purposes of this section pursuant to Section 2p of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, until at least one billion one hundred ninety-nine million five hundred thousand dollars aggregate principal amount of obligations have been issued pursuant to Section 2m of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution. Not more than one billion three hundred fifty million dollars principal amount of obligations may be issued pursuant to Section 2p of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution for the purposes of this section. (3) The issuing authority shall issue obligations to pay costs of financing or assisting in the financing of the capital improvement projects of local subdivisions pursuant to Section 2s of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, section 151.01 of the Revised Code, and this section. Not more than one hundred seventy-five million dollars in principal amount of such obligations may be issued in any of the first five fiscal years of issuance and not more than two hundred million dollars in principal amount of such obligations may be issued in any of the next five fiscal years, plus in each case the principal amount of such obligations that in any prior fiscal year could have been but were not issued within those fiscal year limits. No obligations shall be issued for the purposes of this section pursuant to Section 2s of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, until all of the obligations authorized under Section 2p of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, have been issued. Not more than one billion eight hundred seventy-five million dollars principal amount of obligations may be issued pursuant to Section 2s of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, for the purposes of this section. (4) The issuing authority shall issue obligations to pay costs of financing or assisting in the financing of the capital improvement projects of local subdivisions pursuant to Section 2t of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, section 151.01 of the Revised Code, and this section. Not more than two hundred fifty million dollars in principal amount of such obligations may be issued in each of the ten fiscal years of issuance, plus in each case the principal amount of those obligations that in any prior fiscal year could have been but were not issued within those fiscal year limits. No obligations shall be issued for the purposes of this section pursuant to Section 2t of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, until all of the obligations authorized under Section 2s of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, have been issued. Not more than two billion five hundred million dollars principal amount of obligations may be issued pursuant to Section 2t of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, for the purposes of this section. (C) Net proceeds of obligations shall be deposited into the state capital improvements fund created by section 164.08 of the Revised Code. (D) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "state capital improvements bond service fund." All moneys received by the state and required by the bond proceedings, consistent with this section and section 151.01 of the Revised Code, to be deposited, transferred, or credited to the bond service fund, and all other moneys transferred or allocated to or received for the purposes of that fund, shall be deposited and credited to the bond service fund, subject to any applicable provisions of the bond proceedings but without necessity for any act of appropriation. During the period beginning with the date of the first issuance of obligations and continuing during the time that any obligations are outstanding in accordance with their terms, so long as moneys in the bond service fund are insufficient to pay debt service when due on those obligations payable from that fund (except the principal amounts of bond anticipation notes payable from the proceeds of renewal notes or bonds anticipated) and due in the particular fiscal year, a sufficient amount of revenues of the state is committed and, without necessity for further act of appropriation, shall be paid to the bond service fund for the purpose of paying that debt service when due. Sec. 164.03. For the purpose of allocating the funds made available to finance public infrastructure capital improvement projects of local subdivisions through the issuance of general obligations of the state of Ohio pursuant to Section 2k, 2m, 2p, or 2s, or 2t of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, the state is divided into the following districts: District one. Cuyahoga county shall constitute district one. District two. Hamilton county shall constitute district two. District three. Franklin county shall constitute district three. District four. Montgomery county shall constitute district four. District five. Defiance, Erie, Fulton, Henry, Ottawa, Paulding, Sandusky, Williams, and Wood counties shall constitute district five. District six. Mahoning and Trumbull counties shall constitute district six. District seven. Ashtabula, Geauga, Lake, and Portage counties shall constitute district seven. District eight. Summit county shall constitute district eight. District nine. Lorain, Huron, and Medina counties shall constitute district nine. District ten. Butler, Clermont, Clinton, and Warren counties shall constitute district ten. District eleven. Champaign, Clark, Darke, Greene, Madison, Miami, Preble, and Union counties shall constitute district eleven. District twelve. Lucas county shall constitute district twelve. District thirteen. Allen, Auglaize, Hancock, Logan, Mercer, Putnam, Shelby, and Van Wert counties shall constitute district thirteen. District fourteen. Carroll, Columbiana, Coshocton, Guernsey, Harrison, Holmes, Jefferson, and Tuscarawas counties shall constitute district fourteen. District fifteen. Adams, Brown, Fayette, Gallia, Highland, Jackson, Lawrence, Pike, Ross, Scioto, and Vinton counties shall constitute district fifteen. District sixteen. Ashland, Crawford, Hardin, Marion, Richland, Seneca, Wayne, and Wyandot counties shall constitute district sixteen. District seventeen. Delaware, Fairfield, Knox, Licking, Morrow, and Pickaway counties shall constitute district seventeen. District eighteen. Athens, Belmont, Hocking, Meigs, Monroe, Morgan, Muskingum, Noble, Perry, and Washington counties shall constitute district eighteen. District nineteen. Stark county shall constitute district nineteen. Sec. 164.08. (A) Except as provided in sections 151.01 and 151.08 or section 164.09 of the Revised Code, the net proceeds of obligations issued and sold by the treasurer of state pursuant to section 164.09 of the Revised Code before September 30, 2000, or pursuant to sections 151.01 and 151.08 of the Revised Code, for the purpose of financing or assisting in the financing of the cost of public infrastructure capital improvement projects of local subdivisions, as provided for in Section 2k, 2m, 2p, or 2s, or 2t of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, and this chapter, shall be paid into the state capital improvements fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury. Investment earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. (B) Beginning July 1, 2016, each program year the amount of obligations authorized by the general assembly in accordance with sections 151.01 and 151.08 or section 164.09 of the Revised Code, excluding the proceeds of refunding or renewal obligations, shall be allocated by the director of the Ohio public works commission as follows: (1) First, twelve per cent of the amount of obligations authorized shall be allocated to provide financial assistance to villages and to townships with populations in the unincorporated areas of the township of less than five thousand persons, for capital improvements in accordance with section 164.051 and division (D) of section 164.06 of the Revised Code. As used in division (B)(1) of this section, "capital improvements" includes resurfacing and improving roads. (2) Following the allocation required by division (B)(1) of this section, the director may allocate two per cent of the authorized obligations to provide financial assistance to local subdivisions for capital improvement projects which in the judgment of the director of the Ohio public works commission are necessary for the immediate preservation of the health, safety, and welfare of the citizens of the local subdivision requesting assistance. Starting July 1, 2021, the director may allocate up to six per cent of authorized obligations as provided in this division. (3) The director shall determine the amount of the remaining obligations authorized to be issued and sold that each county would receive if such amounts were allocated on a per capita basis each year. If a county's per capita share for the year would be less than three hundred thousand dollars, the director shall allocate to the district in which that county is located an amount equal to the difference between three hundred thousand dollars and the county's per capita share. (4) After making the allocation required by division (B)(3) of this section, the director shall allocate the remaining amount to each district on a per capita basis. (C)(1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the state capital improvements revolving loan fund, into which shall be deposited all repayments of loans made to local subdivisions for capital improvements pursuant to this chapter. Investment earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. (2) There may also be deposited in the state capital improvements revolving loan fund moneys obtained from federal or private grants, or from other sources, which are to be used for any of the purposes authorized by this chapter. Such moneys shall be allocated each year in accordance with division (B)(4) of this section. (3) Moneys deposited into the state capital improvements revolving loan fund shall be used to make loans for the purpose of financing or assisting in the financing of the cost of capital improvement projects of local subdivisions. (4) Investment earnings credited to the state capital improvements revolving loan fund that exceed the amounts required to meet estimated federal arbitrage rebate requirements shall be used to pay costs incurred by the public works commission in administering this section. Investment earnings credited to the state capital improvements revolving loan fund that exceed the amounts required to pay for the administrative costs and estimated rebate requirements shall be allocated to each district on a per capita basis. (5) Each program year, loan repayments received and on deposit in the state capital improvements revolving loan fund shall be allocated as follows: (a) Each district public works integrating committee shall be allocated an amount equal to the sum of all loan repayments made to the state capital improvements revolving loan fund by local subdivisions that are part of the district. Moneys not used in a program year may be used in the next program year in the same manner and for the same purpose as originally allocated. (b) Loan repayments made pursuant to projects approved under division (B)(1) of this section shall be used to make loans in accordance with section 164.051 and division (D) of section 164.06 of the Revised Code. Allocations for this purpose made pursuant to division (C)(5) of this section shall be in addition to the allocation provided in division (B)(1) of this section. (c) Loan repayments made pursuant to projects approved under division (B)(2) of this section shall be used to make loans in accordance with division (B)(2) of this section. Allocations for this purpose made pursuant to division (C)(5) of this section shall be in addition to the allocation provided in division (B)(2) of this section. (d) Loans made from the state capital improvements revolving loan fund shall not be limited in their usage by divisions (E), (F), and (G) of section 164.05 of the Revised Code. (D) Investment earnings credited to the state capital improvements fund that exceed the amounts required to meet estimated federal arbitrage rebate requirements shall be used to pay costs incurred by the public works commission in administering sections 164.01 to 164.12 of the Revised Code. (E) The director of the Ohio public works commission shall notify the director of budget and management of the amounts allocated pursuant to this section and such information shall be entered into the state accounting system. The director of budget and management shall establish appropriation line items as needed to track these allocations. (F) If the amount of a district's allocation in a program year exceeds the amount of financial assistance approved for the district by the commission for that year, the remaining portion of the district's allocation shall be added to the district's allocation pursuant to division (B) of this section for the next succeeding year for use in the same manner and for the same purposes as it was originally allocated, except that any portion of a district's allocation which was available for use on new or expanded infrastructure pursuant to division (G) of section 164.05 of the Revised Code shall be available in succeeding years only for the repair and replacement of existing infrastructure. (G) When an allocation based on population is made by the director pursuant to division (B) of this section, the director shall use the most recent decennial census statistics, and shall not make any reallocations based upon a change in a district's population. Sec. 3318.042. (A) The board of education of any school district that is receiving assistance under sections 3318.01 to 3318.20 of the Revised Code after May 20, 1997, or under section 3318.33 or sections 3318.40 to 3318.45 of the Revised Code, and whose project is still under construction, may request that the Ohio facilities construction commission examine whether the circumstances prescribed in either division (B)(1) or (2) of this section exist in the school district. If the commission so finds, the commission shall review the school district's original assessment and approved project and consider providing additional assistance to the school district to correct the prescribed conditions found to exist in the district. Additional assistance under this section shall be limited to additions to one or more buildings, remodeling of one or more buildings, or changes to the infrastructure of one or more buildings. (B) Consideration of additional assistance to a school district under this section is warranted in either of the following circumstances: (1) Additional work is needed to correct an oversight or deficiency not identified or included in the district's initial assessment. (2) Other conditions exist that, in the opinion of the commission, warrant additions or remodeling of the project facilities or changes to infrastructure associated with the district's project that were not identified in the initial assessment and plan. (C) If the commission decides in favor of providing additional assistance to any school district under this section, the school district shall be responsible for paying for its portion of the cost of the additions, remodeling, or infrastructure changes pursuant to section 3318.083 of the Revised Code. If, after making a financial evaluation of the school district, the commission determines that the school district is unable without undue hardship, according to the guidelines adopted by the commission, to fund the school district portion of the increase, then the state and the school district shall enter into an agreement whereby the state shall pay the portion of the cost increase attributable to the school district which is determined to be in excess of any local resources available to the district and the district shall thereafter reimburse the state. The commission shall establish the district's schedule for reimbursing the state, which shall not extend beyond ten years. The commission may lengthen the reimbursement schedule of a school district that has entered into an agreement under this section prior to September 26, 2003, as long as the total term of that schedule does not extend beyond ten years. Debt incurred under this section shall not be included in the calculation of the net indebtedness of the school district under section 133.06 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3318.33. (A) The Ohio facilities construction commission shall establish and administer the aging school accelerator pilot program. The commission shall adopt guidelines and procedures for the pilot program. Under the pilot program, the commission shall provide support for the classroom facilities projects of each school district that meets the following criteria on or before the effective date of this section: (1) The district has at least one building that is used primarily for classroom instruction in which all or a significant portion of the structure is at least one hundred years old. (2) The district has never been approved to receive assistance under sections 3318.01 to 3318.20 of the Revised Code or has not completed all segments of a project approved under those sections. (3) The district's operating expenditure per pupil for fiscal year 2025 was in the lowest twenty-five per cent of all school districts in the state. (4) The district qualifies to serve all of its students in one school building according to the commission's policies. (B) The commission shall determine which school districts qualify for the pilot program and notify the qualifying districts. To participate in the pilot program, a qualifying district annually shall set aside the equivalent of one-half mill for each dollar of valuation for maintenance on the project, for a number of years and in a manner determined by the commission. (C) The commission shall set aside from the amounts appropriated to the commission for classroom facilities assistance projects for the appropriate fiscal year an amount determined by the commission to be adequate to serve qualifying districts and offer the funding to qualifying districts. The state share of the basic project cost for a classroom facilities project under the pilot program shall be at least forty per cent of the total project cost. (D) Once a pilot project is completed under this section, the project shall be considered served and ineligible for further assistance under sections 3318.01 to 3318.20 of the Revised Code, except for the corrective action program established under section 3318.49 of the Revised Code and any additional assistance provided under section 3318.042 of the Revised Code to cover the district's portion of the cost for that program. Sec. 3318.49. (A) The corrective action program is hereby established to provide funding for the correction of work, in connection with a project funded under sections 3318.01 to 3318.20 or, section 3318.33, or sections 3318.40 to 3318.45 of the Revised Code, that is found after occupancy of the facility to be defective or to have been omitted. (B) The Ohio facilities construction commission may provide funding under this section only if the school district notifies the executive director of the commission of the defective or omitted work within five years after occupancy of the facility for which the district seeks the funding. (C) The commission shall establish procedures and deadlines for school districts to follow in applying for assistance under this section. The procedures shall include definitions of "defective" and "omitted," and shall require that remediation efforts focus first on engaging the respective contractors that designed and constructed the areas that have design or construction-related issues. The commission shall consider applications on a case-by-case basis, taking into account the amount of money appropriated and available for purposes of this section. (D) The commission may provide funding assistance necessary to take corrective measures after evaluating the defective or omitted work. (1) If the work to be corrected or remediated is part of a project not yet completed, the commission may amend the project agreement to increase the project budget and use corrective action funding to provide the state portion of the amendment. If the work to be corrected or remediated is part of a completed project and funds were retained or transferred pursuant to division (C) of section 3318.12 of the Revised Code, the commission may enter into a new agreement to address the corrective action. (2) Whether or not the project is completed, the district shall contribute a portion of the cost of the corrective action, to be determined in accordance with section 3318.032 of the Revised Code or, if the district is a joint vocational school district, section 3318.42 of the Revised Code. A district that is unable to provide its portion so that remediation can proceed may apply to the commission for additional assistance under section 3318.042 of the Revised Code. (E) The commission shall assess responsibility for the defective or omitted work and seek cost recovery from responsible parties, if applicable. Any recovery of the expense of remediation shall be applied first to the district portion of the cost of the corrective action. Any remaining funds shall be applied to the state portion and deposited into the school building program assistance fund established under section 3318.25 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3343.05. The Subject to section 3343.11 of the Revised Code, the board of trustees of Central state university shall take, keep, and maintain exclusive authority, direction, supervision, and control over the operations and conduct of such university, so as to assure for said university the best attainable results with the aid secured to it from the state. The board shall provide courses of study in accordance with the standards of the department of education and workforce, and create, establish, provide for, and maintain such industrial, vocational, agricultural, home economics, commercial, business administration, technical, and collegiate subjects leading to the bachelors degree in arts and sciences. The board may provide for other courses and degrees. Sec. 3343.11. The board of trustees of Central state university shall enter into an agreement with either the department of administrative services or another governmental third party under which the Central state university board of trustees transfers oversight authority for the management of the university's facilities to the department or other governmental third party. Sec. 5751.02. (A) For the purpose of funding the needs of this state and its local governments, there is hereby levied a commercial activity tax on each person with taxable gross receipts for the privilege of doing business in this state. For the purposes of this chapter, "doing business" means engaging in any activity, whether legal or illegal, that is conducted for, or results in, gain, profit, or income, at any time during a calendar year. Persons on which the commercial activity tax is levied include, but are not limited to, persons with substantial nexus with this state. The tax imposed under this section is not a transactional tax and is not subject to Public Law No. 86-272, 73 Stat. 555. The tax imposed under this section is in addition to any other taxes or fees imposed under the Revised Code. The tax levied under this section is imposed on the person receiving the gross receipts and is not a tax imposed directly on a purchaser. The tax imposed by this section is an annual privilege tax for the calendar year that contains all tax periods in the calendar year. A taxpayer is subject to the annual privilege tax for doing business during any portion of such calendar year. (B) The tax imposed by this section is a tax on the taxpayer and shall not be billed or invoiced to another person. Even if the tax or any portion thereof is billed or invoiced and separately stated, such amounts remain part of the price for purposes of the sales and use taxes levied under Chapters 5739. and 5741. of the Revised Code. Nothing in division (B) of this section prohibits: (1) A person from including in the price charged for a good or service an amount sufficient to recover the tax imposed by this section; or (2) A lessor from including an amount sufficient to recover the tax imposed by this section in a lease payment charged, or from including such an amount on a billing or invoice pursuant to the terms of a written lease agreement providing for the recovery of the lessor's tax costs. The recovery of such costs shall be based on an estimate of the total tax cost of the lessor during the tax period, as the tax liability of the lessor cannot be calculated until the end of that period. (C)(1) The commercial activities tax receipts fund is hereby created in the state treasury and shall consist of money arising from the tax imposed under this chapter. Sixty-five one-hundredths of one per cent of the money credited to that fund shall be credited to the revenue enhancement fund and shall be used to defray the costs incurred by the department of taxation in administering the tax imposed by this chapter and in implementing tax reform measures. The remainder of the money in the commercial activities tax receipts fund shall first be credited to the fund described in division (C)(2) of this section, as provided in that division, and the remainder shall be credited to the general revenue fund. (2) Not later than the twentieth day of February, May, August, and November of each year, the commissioner shall provide for payment to the commercial activity tax motor fuel receipts fund of an amount that bears the same ratio to the balance in the commercial activities tax receipts fund that (a) the taxable gross receipts attributed to motor fuel used for propelling vehicles on public highways as indicated by returns filed by the tenth day of that month for a liability that is due and payable on or after July 1, 2013, for a tax period ending before July 1, 2014, bears to (b) all taxable gross receipts as indicated by those returns for such liabilities. (D)(1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the commercial activity tax motor fuel receipts fund. (2) On or before the fifteenth day of June of each fiscal year beginning with fiscal year 2015, the director of the Ohio public works commission shall certify to the director of budget and management the amount of debt service paid from the general revenue fund in the current fiscal year on bonds issued to finance or assist in the financing of the cost of local subdivision public infrastructure capital improvement projects, as provided for in Sections 2k, 2m, 2p, and 2s, and 2t of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, that are attributable to costs for construction, reconstruction, maintenance, or repair of public highways and bridges and other statutory highway purposes. That certification shall allocate the total amount of debt service paid from the general revenue fund and attributable to those costs in the current fiscal year according to the applicable section of the Ohio Constitution under which the bonds were originally issued. (3) On or before the thirtieth day of June of each fiscal year beginning with fiscal year 2015, the director of budget and management shall determine an amount up to but not exceeding the amount certified under division (D)(2) of this section and shall reserve that amount from the cash balance in the petroleum activity tax public highways fund or the commercial activity tax motor fuel receipts fund for transfer to the general revenue fund at times and in amounts to be determined by the director. The director shall transfer the cash balance in the petroleum activity tax public highways fund or the commercial activity tax motor fuel receipts fund in excess of the amount so reserved to the highway operating fund on or before the thirtieth day of June of the current fiscal year. Sec. 5751.20. No determinations, computations, certifications, or payments shall be made under this section after June 30, 2015. (A) As used in sections 5751.20 to 5751.22 of the Revised Code: (1) "School district," "joint vocational school district," "local taxing unit," "recognized valuation," "fixed-rate levy," and "fixed-sum levy" have the same meanings as used in section 5727.84 of the Revised Code. (2) "State education aid" for a school district means the following: (a) For fiscal years prior to fiscal year 2010, the sum of state aid amounts computed for the district under the following provisions, as they existed for the applicable fiscal year: division (A) of section 3317.022 of the Revised Code, including the amounts calculated under former section 3317.029 and section 3317.0217 of the Revised Code; divisions (C)(1), (C)(4), (D), (E), and (F) of section 3317.022; divisions (B), (C), and (D) of section 3317.023; divisions (L) and (N) of section 3317.024; section 3317.0216; and any unit payments for gifted student services paid under section 3317.05 and former sections 3317.052 and 3317.053 of the Revised Code; except that, for fiscal years 2008 and 2009, the amount computed for the district under Section 269.20.80 of H.B. 119 of the 127th general assembly and as that section subsequently may be amended shall be substituted for the amount computed under division (D) of section 3317.022 of the Revised Code, and the amount computed under Section 269.30.80 of H.B. 119 of the 127th general assembly and as that section subsequently may be amended shall be included. (b) For fiscal years 2010 and 2011, the sum of the amounts computed under former sections 3306.052, 3306.12, 3306.13, 3306.19, 3306.191, and 3306.192 of the Revised Code; (c) For fiscal years 2012 and 2013, the sum of the amounts paid under Sections 267.30.50, 267.30.53, and 267.30.56 of H.B. 153 of the 129th general assembly; (d) For fiscal year 2014 and each fiscal year thereafter, the sum of state amounts computed for the district under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code; except that, for fiscal years 2014 and 2015, the amount computed for the district under the section of this act entitled "TRANSITIONAL AID FOR CITY, LOCAL, AND EXEMPTED VILLAGE SCHOOL DISTRICTS" shall be included. (3) "State education aid" for a joint vocational school district means the following: (a) For fiscal years prior to fiscal year 2010, the sum of the state aid computed for the district under division (N) of section 3317.024 and former section 3317.16 of the Revised Code, except that, for fiscal years 2008 and 2009, the amount computed under Section 269.30.80 of H.B. 119 of the 127th general assembly and as that section subsequently may be amended shall be included. (b) For fiscal years 2010 and 2011, the amount paid in accordance with Section 265.30.50 of H.B. 1 of the 128th general assembly. (c) For fiscal years 2012 and 2013, the amount paid in accordance with Section 267.30.60 of H.B. 153 of the 129th general assembly. (d) For fiscal year 2014 and each fiscal year thereafter, the amount computed for the district under section 3317.16 of the Revised Code; except that, for fiscal years 2014 and 2015, the amount computed for the district under the section of this act entitled "TRANSITIONAL AID FOR JOINT VOCATIONAL SCHOOL DISTRICTS" shall be included. (4) "State education aid offset" means the amount determined for each school district or joint vocational school district under division (A)(1) of section 5751.21 of the Revised Code. (5) "Machinery and equipment property tax value loss" means the amount determined under division (C)(1) of this section. (6) "Inventory property tax value loss" means the amount determined under division (C)(2) of this section. (7) "Furniture and fixtures property tax value loss" means the amount determined under division (C)(3) of this section. (8) "Machinery and equipment fixed-rate levy loss" means the amount determined under division (D)(1) of this section. (9) "Inventory fixed-rate levy loss" means the amount determined under division (D)(2) of this section. (10) "Furniture and fixtures fixed-rate levy loss" means the amount determined under division (D)(3) of this section. (11) "Total fixed-rate levy loss" means the sum of the machinery and equipment fixed-rate levy loss, the inventory fixed-rate levy loss, the furniture and fixtures fixed-rate levy loss, and the telephone company fixed-rate levy loss. (12) "Fixed-sum levy loss" means the amount determined under division (E) of this section. (13) "Machinery and equipment" means personal property subject to the assessment rate specified in division (F) of section 5711.22 of the Revised Code. (14) "Inventory" means personal property subject to the assessment rate specified in division (E) of section 5711.22 of the Revised Code. (15) "Furniture and fixtures" means personal property subject to the assessment rate specified in division (G) of section 5711.22 of the Revised Code. (16) "Qualifying levies" are levies in effect for tax year 2004 or applicable to tax year 2005 or approved at an election conducted before September 1, 2005. For the purpose of determining the rate of a qualifying levy authorized by section 5705.212 or 5705.213 of the Revised Code, the rate shall be the rate that would be in effect for tax year 2010. (17) "Telephone property" means tangible personal property of a telephone, telegraph, or interexchange telecommunications company subject to an assessment rate specified in section 5727.111 of the Revised Code in tax year 2004. (18) "Telephone property tax value loss" means the amount determined under division (C)(4) of this section. (19) "Telephone property fixed-rate levy loss" means the amount determined under division (D)(4) of this section. (20) "Taxes charged and payable" means taxes charged and payable after the reduction required by section 319.301 of the Revised Code but before the reductions required by sections 319.302 and 323.152 of the Revised Code. (21) "Median estate tax collections" means, in the case of a municipal corporation to which revenue from the taxes levied in Chapter 5731. of the Revised Code was distributed in each of calendar years 2006, 2007, 2008, and 2009, the median of those distributions. In the case of a municipal corporation to which no distributions were made in one or more of those years, "median estate tax collections" means zero. (22) "Total resources," in the case of a school district, means the sum of the amounts in divisions (A)(22)(a) to (h) of this section less any reduction required under division (A)(32) or (33) of this section. (a) The state education aid for fiscal year 2010; (b) The sum of the payments received by the school district in fiscal year 2010 for current expense levy losses pursuant to division (C)(2) of section 5727.85 and divisions (C)(8) and (9) of section 5751.21 of the Revised Code, excluding the portion of such payments attributable to levies for joint vocational school district purposes; (c) The sum of fixed-sum levy loss payments received by the school district in fiscal year 2010 pursuant to division (E)(1) of section 5727.85 and division (E)(1) of section 5751.21 of the Revised Code for fixed-sum levies charged and payable for a purpose other than paying debt charges; (d) Fifty per cent of the school district's taxes charged and payable against all property on the tax list of real and public utility property for current expense purposes for tax year 2008, including taxes charged and payable from emergency levies charged and payable under section 5709.194 of the Revised Code and excluding taxes levied for joint vocational school district purposes; (e) Fifty per cent of the school district's taxes charged and payable against all property on the tax list of real and public utility property for current expenses for tax year 2009, including taxes charged and payable from emergency levies and excluding taxes levied for joint vocational school district purposes; (f) The school district's taxes charged and payable against all property on the general tax list of personal property for current expenses for tax year 2009, including taxes charged and payable from emergency levies; (g) The amount certified for fiscal year 2010 under division (A)(2) of section 3317.08 of the Revised Code; (h) Distributions received during calendar year 2009 from taxes levied under section 718.09 of the Revised Code. (23) "Total resources," in the case of a joint vocational school district, means the sum of amounts in divisions (A)(23)(a) to (g) of this section less any reduction required under division (A)(32) of this section. (a) The state education aid for fiscal year 2010; (b) The sum of the payments received by the joint vocational school district in fiscal year 2010 for current expense levy losses pursuant to division (C)(2) of section 5727.85 and divisions (C)(8) and (9) of section 5751.21 of the Revised Code; (c) Fifty per cent of the joint vocational school district's taxes charged and payable against all property on the tax list of real and public utility property for current expense purposes for tax year 2008; (d) Fifty per cent of the joint vocational school district's taxes charged and payable against all property on the tax list of real and public utility property for current expenses for tax year 2009; (e) Fifty per cent of a city, local, or exempted village school district's taxes charged and payable against all property on the tax list of real and public utility property for current expenses of the joint vocational school district for tax year 2008; (f) Fifty per cent of a city, local, or exempted village school district's taxes charged and payable against all property on the tax list of real and public utility property for current expenses of the joint vocational school district for tax year 2009; (g) The joint vocational school district's taxes charged and payable against all property on the general tax list of personal property for current expenses for tax year 2009. (24) "Total resources," in the case of county mental health and disability related functions, means the sum of the amounts in divisions (A)(24)(a) and (b) of this section less any reduction required under division (A)(32) of this section. (a) The sum of the payments received by the county for mental health and developmental disability related functions in calendar year 2010 under division (A)(1) of section 5727.86 and divisions (A)(1) and (2) of section 5751.22 of the Revised Code as they existed at that time; (b) With respect to taxes levied by the county for mental health and developmental disability related purposes, the taxes charged and payable for such purposes against all property on the tax list of real and public utility property for tax year 2009. (25) "Total resources," in the case of county senior services related functions, means the sum of the amounts in divisions (A)(25)(a) and (b) of this section less any reduction required under division (A)(32) of this section. (a) The sum of the payments received by the county for senior services related functions in calendar year 2010 under division (A)(1) of section 5727.86 and divisions (A)(1) and (2) of section 5751.22 of the Revised Code as they existed at that time; (b) With respect to taxes levied by the county for senior services related purposes, the taxes charged and payable for such purposes against all property on the tax list of real and public utility property for tax year 2009. (26) "Total resources," in the case of county children's services related functions, means the sum of the amounts in divisions (A)(26)(a) and (b) of this section less any reduction required under division (A)(32) of this section. (a) The sum of the payments received by the county for children's services related functions in calendar year 2010 under division (A)(1) of section 5727.86 and divisions (A)(1) and (2) of section 5751.22 of the Revised Code as they existed at that time; (b) With respect to taxes levied by the county for children's services related purposes, the taxes charged and payable for such purposes against all property on the tax list of real and public utility property for tax year 2009. (27) "Total resources," in the case of county public health related functions, means the sum of the amounts in divisions (A)(27)(a) and (b) of this section less any reduction required under division (A)(32) of this section. (a) The sum of the payments received by the county for public health related functions in calendar year 2010 under division (A)(1) of section 5727.86 and divisions (A)(1) and (2) of section 5751.22 of the Revised Code as they existed at that time; (b) With respect to taxes levied by the county for public health related purposes, the taxes charged and payable for such purposes against all property on the tax list of real and public utility property for tax year 2009. (28) "Total resources," in the case of all county functions not included in divisions (A)(24) to (27) of this section, means the sum of the amounts in divisions (A)(28)(a) to (d) of this section less any reduction required under division (A)(32) or (33) of this section. (a) The sum of the payments received by the county for all other purposes in calendar year 2010 under division (A)(1) of section 5727.86 and divisions (A)(1) and (2) of section 5751.22 of the Revised Code as they existed at that time; (b) The county's percentage share of county undivided local government fund allocations as certified to the tax commissioner for calendar year 2010 by the county auditor under division (J) of section 5747.51 of the Revised Code or division (F) of section 5747.53 of the Revised Code multiplied by the total amount actually distributed in calendar year 2010 from the county undivided local government fund; (c) With respect to taxes levied by the county for all other purposes, the taxes charged and payable for such purposes against all property on the tax list of real and public utility property for tax year 2009, excluding taxes charged and payable for the purpose of paying debt charges; (d) The sum of the amounts distributed to the county in calendar year 2010 for the taxes levied pursuant to sections 5739.021 and 5741.021 of the Revised Code. (29) "Total resources," in the case of a municipal corporation, means the sum of the amounts in divisions (A)(29)(a) to (g) of this section less any reduction required under division (A)(32) or (33) of this section. (a) The sum of the payments received by the municipal corporation in calendar year 2010 for current expense levy losses under division (A)(1) of section 5727.86 and divisions (A)(1) and (2) of section 5751.22 of the Revised Code as they existed at that time; (b) The municipal corporation's percentage share of county undivided local government fund allocations as certified to the tax commissioner for calendar year 2010 by the county auditor under division (J) of section 5747.51 of the Revised Code or division (F) of section 5747.53 of the Revised Code multiplied by the total amount actually distributed in calendar year 2010 from the county undivided local government fund; (c) The sum of the amounts distributed to the municipal corporation in calendar year 2010 pursuant to section 5747.50 of the Revised Code; (d) With respect to taxes levied by the municipal corporation, the taxes charged and payable against all property on the tax list of real and public utility property for current expenses, defined in division (A)(35) of this section, for tax year 2009; (e) The amount of admissions tax collected by the municipal corporation in calendar year 2008, or if such information has not yet been reported to the tax commissioner, in the most recent year before 2008 for which the municipal corporation has reported data to the commissioner; (f) The amount of income taxes collected by the municipal corporation in calendar year 2008, or if such information has not yet been reported to the tax commissioner, in the most recent year before 2008 for which the municipal corporation has reported data to the commissioner; (g) The municipal corporation's median estate tax collections. (30) "Total resources," in the case of a township, means the sum of the amounts in divisions (A)(30)(a) to (c) of this section less any reduction required under division (A)(32) or (33) of this section. (a) The sum of the payments received by the township in calendar year 2010 pursuant to division (A)(1) of section 5727.86 of the Revised Code and divisions (A)(1) and (2) of section 5751.22 of the Revised Code as they existed at that time, excluding payments received for debt purposes; (b) The township's percentage share of county undivided local government fund allocations as certified to the tax commissioner for calendar year 2010 by the county auditor under division (J) of section 5747.51 of the Revised Code or division (F) of section 5747.53 of the Revised Code multiplied by the total amount actually distributed in calendar year 2010 from the county undivided local government fund; (c) With respect to taxes levied by the township, the taxes charged and payable against all property on the tax list of real and public utility property for tax year 2009 excluding taxes charged and payable for the purpose of paying debt charges. (31) "Total resources," in the case of a local taxing unit that is not a county, municipal corporation, or township, means the sum of the amounts in divisions (A)(31)(a) to (e) of this section less any reduction required under division (A)(32) of this section. (a) The sum of the payments received by the local taxing unit in calendar year 2010 pursuant to division (A)(1) of section 5727.86 of the Revised Code and divisions (A)(1) and (2) of section 5751.22 of the Revised Code as they existed at that time; (b) The local taxing unit's percentage share of county undivided local government fund allocations as certified to the tax commissioner for calendar year 2010 by the county auditor under division (J) of section 5747.51 of the Revised Code or division (F) of section 5747.53 of the Revised Code multiplied by the total amount actually distributed in calendar year 2010 from the county undivided local government fund; (c) With respect to taxes levied by the local taxing unit, the taxes charged and payable against all property on the tax list of real and public utility property for tax year 2009 excluding taxes charged and payable for the purpose of paying debt charges; (d) The amount received from the tax commissioner during calendar year 2010 for sales or use taxes authorized under sections 5739.023 and 5741.022 of the Revised Code; (e) For institutions of higher education receiving tax revenue from a local levy, as identified in section 3358.02 of the Revised Code, the final state share of instruction allocation for fiscal year 2010 as calculated by the chancellor of higher education and reported to the state controlling board. (32) If a fixed-rate levy that is a qualifying levy is not charged and payable in any year after tax year 2010, "total resources" used to compute payments to be made under division (C)(12) of section 5751.21 or division (A)(1)(b) or (c) of section 5751.22 of the Revised Code in the tax years following the last year the levy is charged and payable shall be reduced to the extent that the payments are attributable to the fixed-rate levy loss of that levy as would be computed under division (C)(2) of section 5727.85, division (A)(1) of section 5727.85, divisions (C)(8) and (9) of section 5751.21, or division (A)(1) of section 5751.22 of the Revised Code. (33) In the case of a county, municipal corporation, school district, or township with fixed-rate levy losses attributable to a tax levied under section 5705.23 of the Revised Code, "total resources" used to compute payments to be made under division (C)(3) of section 5727.85, division (A)(1)(d) of section 5727.86, division (C)(12) of section 5751.21, or division (A)(1)(c) of section 5751.22 of the Revised Code shall be reduced by the amounts described in divisions (A)(34)(a) to (c) of this section to the extent that those amounts were included in calculating the "total resources" of the school district or local taxing unit under division (A)(22), (28), (29), or (30) of this section. (34) "Total library resources," in the case of a county, municipal corporation, school district, or township public library that receives the proceeds of a tax levied under section 5705.23 of the Revised Code, means the sum of the amounts in divisions (A)(34)(a) to (c) of this section less any reduction required under division (A)(32) of this section. (a) The sum of the payments received by the county, municipal corporation, school district, or township public library in calendar year 2010 pursuant to sections 5727.86 and 5751.22 of the Revised Code, as they existed at that time, for fixed-rate levy losses attributable to a tax levied under section 5705.23 of the Revised Code for the benefit of the public library; (b) The public library's percentage share of county undivided local government fund allocations as certified to the tax commissioner for calendar year 2010 by the county auditor under division (J) of section 5747.51 of the Revised Code or division (F) of section 5747.53 of the Revised Code multiplied by the total amount actually distributed in calendar year 2010 from the county undivided local government fund; (c) With respect to a tax levied pursuant to section 5705.23 of the Revised Code for the benefit of the public library, the amount of such tax that is charged and payable against all property on the tax list of real and public utility property for tax year 2009 excluding any tax that is charged and payable for the purpose of paying debt charges. (35) "Municipal current expense property tax levies" means all property tax levies of a municipality, except those with the following levy names: airport resurfacing; bond or any levy name including the word "bond"; capital improvement or any levy name including the word "capital"; debt or any levy name including the word "debt"; equipment or any levy name including the word "equipment," unless the levy is for combined operating and equipment; employee termination fund; fire pension or any levy containing the word "pension," including police pensions; fireman's fund or any practically similar name; sinking fund; road improvements or any levy containing the word "road"; fire truck or apparatus; flood or any levy containing the word "flood"; conservancy district; county health; note retirement; sewage, or any levy containing the words "sewage" or "sewer"; park improvement; parkland acquisition; storm drain; street or any levy name containing the word "street"; lighting, or any levy name containing the word "lighting"; and water. (36) "Current expense TPP allocation" means, in the case of a school district or joint vocational school district, the sum of the payments received by the school district in fiscal year 2011 pursuant to divisions (C)(10) and (11) of section 5751.21 of the Revised Code to the extent paid for current expense levies. In the case of a municipal corporation, "current expense TPP allocation" means the sum of the payments received by the municipal corporation in calendar year 2010 pursuant to divisions (A)(1) and (2) of section 5751.22 of the Revised Code to the extent paid for municipal current expense property tax levies as defined in division (A)(35) of this section, excluding any such payments received for current expense levy losses attributable to a tax levied under section 5705.23 of the Revised Code. If a fixed-rate levy that is a qualifying levy is not charged and payable in any year after tax year 2010, "current expense TPP allocation" used to compute payments to be made under division (C)(12) of section 5751.21 or division (A)(1)(b) or (c) of section 5751.22 of the Revised Code in the tax years following the last year the levy is charged and payable shall be reduced to the extent that the payments are attributable to the fixed-rate levy loss of that levy as would be computed under divisions (C)(10) and (11) of section 5751.21 or division (A)(1) of section 5751.22 of the Revised Code. (37) "TPP allocation" means the sum of payments received by a local taxing unit in calendar year 2010 pursuant to divisions (A)(1) and (2) of section 5751.22 of the Revised Code, excluding any such payments received for fixed-rate levy losses attributable to a tax levied under section 5705.23 of the Revised Code. If a fixed-rate levy that is a qualifying levy is not charged and payable in any year after tax year 2010, "TPP allocation" used to compute payments to be made under division (A)(1)(b) or (c) of section 5751.22 of the Revised Code in the tax years following the last year the levy is charged and payable shall be reduced to the extent that the payments are attributable to the fixed-rate levy loss of that levy as would be computed under division (A)(1) of that section. (38) "Total TPP allocation" means, in the case of a school district or joint vocational school district, the sum of the amounts received in fiscal year 2011 pursuant to divisions (C)(10) and (11) and (D) of section 5751.21 of the Revised Code. In the case of a local taxing unit, "total TPP allocation" means the sum of payments received by the unit in calendar year 2010 pursuant to divisions (A)(1), (2), and (3) of section 5751.22 of the Revised Code. If a fixed-rate levy that is a qualifying levy is not charged and payable in any year after tax year 2010, "total TPP allocation" used to compute payments to be made under division (C)(12) of section 5751.21 or division (A)(1)(b) or (c) of section 5751.22 of the Revised Code in the tax years following the last year the levy is charged and payable shall be reduced to the extent that the payments are attributable to the fixed-rate levy loss of that levy as would be computed under divisions (C)(10) and (11) of section 5751.21 or division (A)(1) of section 5751.22 of the Revised Code. (39) "Non-current expense TPP allocation" means the difference of total TPP allocation minus the sum of current expense TPP allocation and the portion of total TPP allocation constituting reimbursement for debt levies, pursuant to division (D) of section 5751.21 of the Revised Code in the case of a school district or joint vocational school district and pursuant to division (A)(3) of section 5751.22 of the Revised Code in the case of a municipal corporation. (40) "TPP allocation for library purposes" means the sum of payments received by a county, municipal corporation, school district, or township public library in calendar year 2010 pursuant to section 5751.22 of the Revised Code for fixed-rate levy losses attributable to a tax levied under section 5705.23 of the Revised Code. If a fixed-rate levy authorized under section 5705.23 of the Revised Code that is a qualifying levy is not charged and payable in any year after tax year 2010, "TPP allocation for library purposes" used to compute payments to be made under division (A)(1)(d) of section 5751.22 of the Revised Code in the tax years following the last year the levy is charged and payable shall be reduced to the extent that the payments are attributable to the fixed-rate levy loss of that levy as would be computed under division (A)(1) of section 5751.22 of the Revised Code. (41) "Threshold per cent" means, in the case of a school district or joint vocational school district, two per cent for fiscal year 2012 and four per cent for fiscal years 2013 and thereafter. In the case of a local taxing unit or public library that receives the proceeds of a tax levied under section 5705.23 of the Revised Code, "threshold per cent" means two per cent for tax year 2011, four per cent for tax year 2012, and six per cent for tax years 2013 and thereafter. (B)(1) The commercial activities tax receipts fund is hereby created in the state treasury and shall consist of money arising from the tax imposed under this chapter. Eighty-five one-hundredths of one per cent of the money credited to that fund shall be credited to the revenue enhancement fund and shall be used to defray the costs incurred by the department of taxation in administering the tax imposed by this chapter and in implementing tax reform measures. The remainder of the money in the commercial activities tax receipts fund shall first be credited to the commercial activity tax motor fuel receipts fund, pursuant to division (B)(2) of this section, and the remainder shall be credited in the following percentages each fiscal year to the general revenue fund, to the school district tangible property tax replacement fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury for the purpose of making the payments described in section 5751.21 of the Revised Code, and to the local government tangible property tax replacement fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury for the purpose of making the payments described in section 5751.22 of the Revised Code, in the following percentages: 1 2 3 4 A Fiscal year General Revenue Fund School District Tangible Property Tax Replacement Fund Local Government Tangible Property Tax Replacement Fund B 2006 67.7% 22.6% 9.7% C 2007 0% 70.0% 30.0% D 2008 0% 70.0% 30.0% E 2009 0% 70.0% 30.0% F 2010 0% 70.0% 30.0% G 2011 0% 70.0% 30.0% H 2012 25.0% 52.5% 22.5% I 2013 and thereafter 50.0% 35.0% 15.0% (2) Not later than the twentieth day of February, May, August, and November of each year, the commissioner shall provide for payment from the commercial activities tax receipts fund to the commercial activity tax motor fuel receipts fund an amount that bears the same ratio to the balance in the commercial activities tax receipts fund that (a) the taxable gross receipts attributed to motor fuel used for propelling vehicles on public highways as indicated by returns filed by the tenth day of that month for a liability that is due and payable on or after July 1, 2013, for a tax period ending before July 1, 2014, bears to (b) all taxable gross receipts as indicated by those returns for such liabilities. (C) Not later than September 15, 2005, the tax commissioner shall determine for each school district, joint vocational school district, and local taxing unit its machinery and equipment, inventory property, furniture and fixtures property, and telephone property tax value losses, which are the applicable amounts described in divisions (C)(1), (2), (3), and (4) of this section, except as provided in division (C)(5) of this section: (1) Machinery and equipment property tax value loss is the taxable value of machinery and equipment property as reported by taxpayers for tax year 2004 multiplied by: (a) For tax year 2006, thirty-three and eight-tenths per cent; (b) For tax year 2007, sixty-one and three-tenths per cent; (c) For tax year 2008, eighty-three per cent; (d) For tax year 2009 and thereafter, one hundred per cent. (2) Inventory property tax value loss is the taxable value of inventory property as reported by taxpayers for tax year 2004 multiplied by: (a) For tax year 2006, a fraction, the numerator of which is five and three-fourths and the denominator of which is twenty-three; (b) For tax year 2007, a fraction, the numerator of which is nine and one-half and the denominator of which is twenty-three; (c) For tax year 2008, a fraction, the numerator of which is thirteen and one-fourth and the denominator of which is twenty-three; (d) For tax year 2009 and thereafter a fraction, the numerator of which is seventeen and the denominator of which is twenty-three. (3) Furniture and fixtures property tax value loss is the taxable value of furniture and fixture property as reported by taxpayers for tax year 2004 multiplied by: (a) For tax year 2006, twenty-five per cent; (b) For tax year 2007, fifty per cent; (c) For tax year 2008, seventy-five per cent; (d) For tax year 2009 and thereafter, one hundred per cent. The taxable value of property reported by taxpayers used in divisions (C)(1), (2), and (3) of this section shall be such values as determined to be final by the tax commissioner as of August 31, 2005. Such determinations shall be final except for any correction of a clerical error that was made prior to August 31, 2005, by the tax commissioner. (4) Telephone property tax value loss is the taxable value of telephone property as taxpayers would have reported that property for tax year 2004 if the assessment rate for all telephone property for that year were twenty-five per cent, multiplied by: (a) For tax year 2006, zero per cent; (b) For tax year 2007, zero per cent; (c) For tax year 2008, zero per cent; (d) For tax year 2009, sixty per cent; (e) For tax year 2010, eighty per cent; (f) For tax year 2011 and thereafter, one hundred per cent. (5) Division (C)(5) of this section applies to any school district, joint vocational school district, or local taxing unit in a county in which is located a facility currently or formerly devoted to the enrichment or commercialization of uranium or uranium products, and for which the total taxable value of property listed on the general tax list of personal property for any tax year from tax year 2001 to tax year 2004 was fifty per cent or less of the taxable value of such property listed on the general tax list of personal property for the next preceding tax year. In computing the fixed-rate levy losses under divisions (D)(1), (2), and (3) of this section for any school district, joint vocational school district, or local taxing unit to which division (C)(5) of this section applies, the taxable value of such property as listed on the general tax list of personal property for tax year 2000 shall be substituted for the taxable value of such property as reported by taxpayers for tax year 2004, in the taxing district containing the uranium facility, if the taxable value listed for tax year 2000 is greater than the taxable value reported by taxpayers for tax year 2004. For the purpose of making the computations under divisions (D)(1), (2), and (3) of this section, the tax year 2000 valuation is to be allocated to machinery and equipment, inventory, and furniture and fixtures property in the same proportions as the tax year 2004 values. For the purpose of the calculations in division (A) of section 5751.21 of the Revised Code, the tax year 2004 taxable values shall be used. To facilitate the calculations required under division (C) of this section, the county auditor, upon request from the tax commissioner, shall provide by August 1, 2005, the values of machinery and equipment, inventory, and furniture and fixtures for all single-county personal property taxpayers for tax year 2004. (D) Not later than September 15, 2005, the tax commissioner shall determine for each tax year from 2006 through 2009 for each school district, joint vocational school district, and local taxing unit its machinery and equipment, inventory, and furniture and fixtures fixed-rate levy losses, and for each tax year from 2006 through 2011 its telephone property fixed-rate levy loss. Except as provided in division (F) of this section, such losses are the applicable amounts described in divisions (D)(1), (2), (3), and (4) of this section: (1) The machinery and equipment fixed-rate levy loss is the machinery and equipment property tax value loss multiplied by the sum of the tax rates of fixed-rate qualifying levies. (2) The inventory fixed-rate loss is the inventory property tax value loss multiplied by the sum of the tax rates of fixed-rate qualifying levies. (3) The furniture and fixtures fixed-rate levy loss is the furniture and fixture property tax value loss multiplied by the sum of the tax rates of fixed-rate qualifying levies. (4) The telephone property fixed-rate levy loss is the telephone property tax value loss multiplied by the sum of the tax rates of fixed-rate qualifying levies. (E) Not later than September 15, 2005, the tax commissioner shall determine for each school district, joint vocational school district, and local taxing unit its fixed-sum levy loss. The fixed-sum levy loss is the amount obtained by subtracting the amount described in division (E)(2) of this section from the amount described in division (E)(1) of this section: (1) The sum of the machinery and equipment property tax value loss, the inventory property tax value loss, and the furniture and fixtures property tax value loss, and, for 2008 through 2010, the telephone property tax value loss of the district or unit multiplied by the sum of the fixed-sum tax rates of qualifying levies. For 2006 through 2010, this computation shall include all qualifying levies remaining in effect for the current tax year and any school district levies charged and payable under section 5705.194 or 5705.213 of the Revised Code that are qualifying levies not remaining in effect for the current year. For 2011 through 2017 in the case of school district levies charged and payable under section 5705.194 or 5705.213 of the Revised Code and for all years after 2010 in the case of other fixed-sum levies, this computation shall include only qualifying levies remaining in effect for the current year. For purposes of this computation, a qualifying school district levy charged and payable under section 5705.194 or 5705.213 of the Revised Code remains in effect in a year after 2010 only if, for that year, the board of education levies a school district levy charged and payable under section 5705.194, 5705.199, 5705.213, or 5705.219 of the Revised Code for an annual sum at least equal to the annual sum levied by the board in tax year 2004 less the amount of the payment certified under this division for 2006. (2) The total taxable value in tax year 2004 less the sum of the machinery and equipment, inventory, furniture and fixtures, and telephone property tax value losses in each school district, joint vocational school district, and local taxing unit multiplied by one-half of one mill per dollar. (3) For the calculations in divisions (E)(1) and (2) of this section, the tax value losses are those that would be calculated for tax year 2009 under divisions (C)(1), (2), and (3) of this section and for tax year 2011 under division (C)(4) of this section. (4) To facilitate the calculation under divisions (D) and (E) of this section, not later than September 1, 2005, any school district, joint vocational school district, or local taxing unit that has a qualifying levy that was approved at an election conducted during 2005 before September 1, 2005, shall certify to the tax commissioner a copy of the county auditor's certificate of estimated property tax millage for such levy as required under division (B) of section 5705.03 of the Revised Code, which is the rate that shall be used in the calculations under such divisions. If the amount determined under division (E) of this section for any school district, joint vocational school district, or local taxing unit is greater than zero, that amount shall equal the reimbursement to be paid pursuant to division (E) of section 5751.21 or division (A)(3) of section 5751.22 of the Revised Code, and the one-half of one mill that is subtracted under division (E)(2) of this section shall be apportioned among all contributing fixed-sum levies in the proportion that each levy bears to the sum of all fixed-sum levies within each school district, joint vocational school district, or local taxing unit. (F) If a school district levies a tax under section 5705.219 of the Revised Code, the fixed-rate levy loss for qualifying levies, to the extent repealed under that section, shall equal the sum of the following amounts in lieu of the amounts computed for such levies under division (D) of this section: (1) The sum of the rates of qualifying levies to the extent so repealed multiplied by the sum of the machinery and equipment, inventory, and furniture and fixtures tax value losses for 2009 as determined under that division; (2) The sum of the rates of qualifying levies to the extent so repealed multiplied by the telephone property tax value loss for 2011 as determined under that division. The fixed-rate levy losses for qualifying levies to the extent not repealed under section 5705.219 of the Revised Code shall be as determined under division (D) of this section. The revised fixed-rate levy losses determined under this division and division (D) of this section first apply in the year following the first year the district levies the tax under section 5705.219 of the Revised Code. (G) Not later than October 1, 2005, the tax commissioner shall certify to the department of education for every school district and joint vocational school district the machinery and equipment, inventory, furniture and fixtures, and telephone property tax value losses determined under division (C) of this section, the machinery and equipment, inventory, furniture and fixtures, and telephone fixed-rate levy losses determined under division (D) of this section, and the fixed-sum levy losses calculated under division (E) of this section. The calculations under divisions (D) and (E) of this section shall separately display the levy loss for each levy eligible for reimbursement. (H) Not later than October 1, 2005, the tax commissioner shall certify the amount of the fixed-sum levy losses to the county auditor of each county in which a school district, joint vocational school district, or local taxing unit with a fixed-sum levy loss reimbursement has territory. (I) Not later than the twenty-eighth day of February each year beginning in 2011 and ending in 2014, the tax commissioner shall certify to the department of education for each school district first levying a tax under section 5705.219 of the Revised Code in the preceding year the revised fixed-rate levy losses determined under divisions (D) and (F) of this section. (J)(1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the commercial activity tax motor fuel receipts fund. (2)(a) On or before June 15, 2014, the director of the Ohio public works commission shall certify to the director of budget and management the amount of debt service paid from the general revenue fund in fiscal years 2013 and 2014 on bonds issued to finance or assist in the financing of the cost of local subdivision public infrastructure capital improvement projects, as provided for in Sections 2k, 2m, 2p, and 2s of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, that are attributable to costs for construction, reconstruction, maintenance, or repair of public highways and bridges and other statutory highway purposes. That certification shall allocate the total amount of debt service paid from the general revenue fund and attributable to those costs in each of fiscal years 2013 and 2014 according to the applicable section of the Ohio Constitution under which the bonds were originally issued. (b) On or before June 30, 2014, the director of budget and management shall determine an amount up to but not exceeding the amount certified under division (J)(2)(a) of this section and shall reserve that amount from the cash balance in the commercial activity tax motor fuel receipts fund for transfer to the general revenue fund at times and in amounts to be determined by the director. The director shall transfer the cash balance in the commercial activity tax motor fuel receipts fund in excess of the amount so reserved to the highway operating fund on or before June 30, 2014. (3)(a) On or before the fifteenth day of June of each fiscal year beginning with fiscal year 2015, the director of the Ohio public works commission shall certify to the director of budget and management the amount of debt service paid from the general revenue fund in the current fiscal year on bonds issued to finance or assist in the financing of the cost of local subdivision public infrastructure capital improvement projects, as provided for in Sections 2k, 2m, 2p, and 2s, and 2t of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, that are attributable to costs for construction, reconstruction, maintenance, or repair of public highways and bridges and other statutory highway purposes. That certification shall allocate the total amount of debt service paid from the general revenue fund and attributable to those costs in the current fiscal year according to the applicable section of the Ohio Constitution under which the bonds were originally issued. (b) On or before the thirtieth day of June of each fiscal year beginning with fiscal year 2015, the director of budget and management shall determine an amount up to but not exceeding the amount certified under division (J)(3)(a) of this section and shall reserve that amount from the cash balance in the petroleum activity tax public highways fund or the commercial activity tax motor fuel receipts fund for transfer to the general revenue fund at times and in amounts to be determined by the director. The director shall transfer the cash balance in the petroleum activity tax public highways fund or the commercial activity tax motor fuel receipts fund in excess of the amount so reserved to the highway operating fund on or before the thirtieth day of June of the current fiscal year. Section 101.02. That existing sections 151.01, 151.08, 164.03, 164.08, 3318.042, 3318.49, 3343.05, 5751.02, and 5751.20 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 201.10. Except as otherwise provided in this act, all appropriations in this act are appropriated out of any moneys in the state treasury to the credit of the designated fund that are not otherwise appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2028. Section 203.10. 1 2 3 A ADJ ADJUTANT GENERAL B Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) C C74535 Renovations and Improvements $14,800,000 D Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $14,800,000 E Air National Guard Agreement Fund (Fund 3E80) F C74557 Air National Guard Renovations and Improvements - Federal $1,500,000 G Air National Guard Agreement Fund (Fund 3E80) Total $1,500,000 H Army National Guard Service Contract Fund (Fund 3420) I C74537 Renovation Projects - Federal Share $33,719,750 J C74539 Army National Guard Renovations and Improvements - Federal $2,780,250 K Army National Guard Service Contract Fund (Fund 3420) Total $36,500,000 L TOTAL ALL FUNDS $52,800,000 Section 203.15. RENOVATIONS AND IMPROVEMENTS – FEDERAL The foregoing appropriation items C74539, Army National Guard Renovations and Improvements – Federal, and C74557, Air National Guard Renovations and Improvements - Federal, shall be used to fund capital projects that are coded as receiving one hundred per cent federal support. Notwithstanding section 131.35 of the Revised Code, if, after the effective date of this section, additional federal funds are made available to the Adjutant General to carry out one hundred per cent federally supported projects, the Adjutant General may request that the Director of Budget and Management authorize expenditures in excess of the amounts appropriated to appropriation item C74539, Army National Guard Renovations and Improvements – Federal, and C74557, Air National Guard Renovations and Improvements - Federal. Upon approval of the Director of Budget and Management, the additional amounts are hereby appropriated. Section 205.10. 1 2 3 A AGO ATTORNEY GENERAL B Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) C C05517 General Building Renovations $356,673 D C05521 BCI London Renovations $3,375,000 E C05536 TTC Facility Renovations $600,000 F C05542 BCI Laboratory Equipment $1,668,327 G Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $6,000,000 H TOTAL ALL FUNDS $6,000,000 Section 207.00. DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION AND STATE INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION 1 2 3 A BOR DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION B Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) C C23501 Supercomputer Center Expansion $10,000,000 D C23516 Ohio Library and Information Network $15,187,486 E C23524 Library Depositories - Supplemental Renovations $512,514 F C23530 Technology Initiatives $1,000,000 G C23550 Small Campus Targeted Assistance $49,500,000 H C23566 Campus Safety Grant Program $7,500,000 I Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $83,700,000 J Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) K C23567 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $10,000,000 L C23568 OARnet - Taxable $10,000,000 M Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $20,000,000 N TOTAL ALL FUNDS $103,700,000 Section 207.01. WORKFORCE BASED TRAINING AND EQUIPMENT - TAXABLE (A) Capital appropriations in this act made from appropriation item C23567, Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable, shall be used to support the Regionally Aligned Priorities in Developing Skills (RAPIDS) program in the Department of Higher Education. The purpose of the RAPIDS program is to support collaborative projects among higher education institutions to strengthen education and training opportunities that maximize workforce development efforts in defined areas of the state. (B) Capital funds appropriated for this purpose by the General Assembly shall be distributed by the Chancellor of Higher Education to Ohio regions or subsets of regions. Regions or subsets of regions may be defined by the state's economic development strategy. (C) The Chancellor shall award capital funds within the program using an application and review process, as developed by the Chancellor. In reviewing applications and making awards, priority shall be given to proposals that demonstrate: (1) Collaboration among and between state institutions of higher education, as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code, Ohio Technical Centers, and other entities as determined to be appropriate by the Chancellor; (2) Evidence of meaningful business support and engagement; (3) Identification of targeted occupations and industries supported by data, which sources may include the Governor's Office of Workforce Transformation, OhioMeansJobs, labor market information from the Department of Job and Family Services, and lists of in-demand occupations; (4) Sustainability beyond the grant period with the opportunity to provide continued value and impact to the region. (D) In submitting proposals for consideration under the program, a state institution of higher education, as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code, shall be the lead applicant and preference shall be given to proposals in which equipment and technology acquired by capital funds awarded under the program are owned by a state institution of higher education. If equipment, technology, or facilities acquired by capital funds awarded under the program will be owned by a separate governmental or nonprofit entity, the state institution of higher education shall enter into a joint use agreement with the entity, which shall be approved by the Chancellor. CAMPUS SAFETY GRANT PROGRAM (A) The foregoing appropriation item C23566, Campus Safety Grant Program, shall be used to make competitive grants to state institutions of higher education for eligible security improvements that assist the institutions in improving the overall physical security and safety of their buildings on public campuses throughout Ohio. (B) The Director of Public Safety shall administer and award the grants described in division (A) of this section. The Director, in coordination with the Chancellor of Higher Education, shall establish procedures and forms by which applicants may apply for a grant, a competitive process for ranking applicants and awarding the grants, and procedures for distributing grants. The procedures shall require each applicant to do all of the following: (1) Describe how the grant will be used to integrate organizational preparedness with broader state and local preparedness efforts; (2) Submit a vulnerability assessment conducted by experienced security, law enforcement, or military personnel, and a description of how the grant will be used to address the vulnerabilities identified in the assessment. (C) Prior to the awarding of any funds under this section, the Director of Public Safety shall consult and share preliminary funding recommendations with the Chancellor. (D) Any grant submission that is created under this section that is determined to be a security record as defined in section 149.433 of the Revised Code is not a public record under section 149.43 of the Revised Code and is not subject to mandatory release or disclosure under that section. (E) Upon the completion of the application and review process as defined in division (B) of this section, the Chancellor shall seek the approval of the Controlling Board to transfer appropriation to any institution receiving an award under this section. (F) As used in this section: (1) "Eligible security improvements" means a physical security enhancement, equipment, or inspection and screening equipment included on the Authorized Equipment List published by the United States Department of Homeland Security that is also within the definition of "costs of capital facilities" under section 151.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "State institutions of higher education" has the same meaning as in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code. SMALL CAMPUS TARGETED ASSISTANCE Of the foregoing appropriation item C23550, Small Campus Targeted Assistance, up to $10,000,000 shall be used by Cincinnati State Community College to support building and infrastructure projects. Of the foregoing appropriation item C23550, Small Campus Targeted Assistance, up to $28,500,000 shall be used by Shawnee State University to support building and infrastructure projects. Of the foregoing appropriation item C23550, Small Campus Targeted Assistance, up to $7,500,000 shall be used by Rio Grande Community College to support building and infrastructure projects. Of the foregoing appropriation item C23550, Small Campus Targeted Assistance, up to $3,500,000 shall be used by Youngstown State University - Steubenville to support building and infrastructure projects at former Eastern Gateway Community College facilities. Section 207.02. 1 2 3 A BTC BELMONT TECHNICAL COLLEGE B Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) C C36800 Basic Renovations $742,366 D CP0060 Steubenville MEP Center GA136 $52,480 E Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $794,846 F TOTAL ALL FUNDS $794,846 Section 207.03. 1 2 3 A BGU BOWLING GREEN STATE UNIVERSITY B Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) C CP0056 Findlay Defense Incubator / SCIFF project-Taxable GA136 $1,200,000 D Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $1,200,000 E Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) F C24037 Academic Building Rehabilitation $11,211,450 G C24079 Critical Infrastructure Rehabilitation - Technology - Wired Network $6,000,000 H C24080 Academic Building Infrastructure and Space Rehabilitation - Firelands $800,000 I CP0057 BGSU Law Enforcement Training Center GA136 $700,000 J CP0058 Oregon Fire and Rescue Facility Improvements GA136 $200,000 K CP0059 Joint Watershed Greenhouse and Research Lab GA136 $100,000 L Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $19,011,450 M TOTAL ALL FUNDS $20,211,450 Section 207.04. 1 2 3 A COT CENTRAL OHIO TECHNICAL COLLEGE B Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) C CP0072 C-TEC Skilled Trades Workforce Lab-Taxable GA136 $500,000 D Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $500,000 E Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) F C36915 Basic Renovations - Newark $690,000 G C36932 Pavement Upgrades $250,000 H C36935 HVAC Replacements $525,000 I C36936 Classroom Renovations $906,850 J Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $2,371,850 K TOTAL ALL FUNDS $2,871,850 Section 207.05. 1 2 3 A CSU CENTRAL STATE UNIVERSITY B Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) C C25500 Basic Renovations $29,159,024 D Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $29,159,024 E TOTAL ALL FUNDS $29,159,024 BASIC RENOVATIONS Of the foregoing appropriation item C25500, Basic Renovations, up to $25,000,000 shall be used to support basic renovation projects at Central State University. Release of such funds is subject to the board of trustees of Central State University entering into an agreement with either the Department of Administrative Services or another governmental third party under section 3343.11 of the Revised Code. The Chancellor of Higher Education shall release the funds when the board of trustees of Central State University certifies to the Chancellor that it has entered into that agreement. The certification shall include a copy of the agreement and the resolution adopted by the board of trustees approving the agreement. Section 207.06. 1 2 3 A CTC CINCINNATI STATE COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) C C36140 Main Building Renovations $6,564,612 D CP0073 People Working Cooperatively (PWC) HQ GA136 $500,000 E CP0074 Art Academy of Cincinnati GA136 $300,000 F CP0075 Meals on Wheels HQ for SW Ohio GA136 $250,000 G Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $7,614,612 H TOTAL ALL FUNDS $7,614,612 Section 207.07. 1 2 3 A CLT CLARK STATE COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) C CP0070 Clark State Agriculture Center-Taxable GA136 $150,000 D CP0071 Clark State Performing Arts Center-Taxable GA136 $150,000 E Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $300,000 F Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) G C38527 Rhodes Hall and Applied Science Center Renovation $2,947,965 H C38536 Agriculture Center Renovations $500,000 I Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $3,447,965 J TOTAL ALL FUNDS $3,747,965 Section 207.08. 1 2 3 A CLS CLEVELAND STATE UNIVERSITY B Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) C C26000 Basic Renovations $3,000,000 D C26082 Campus-Wide Elevator Modifications $2,000,000 E C260A8 Mechanical, Electrical, Plumbing Improvements $6,000,000 F C260A9 Campus-Wide Building Envelopes Rehabilitation and Stabilization $1,093,635 G C260B1 Life Safety, IT, and Security Projects $1,000,000 H C260B8 Berkman Hall Foundation and Plaza $2,000,000 I CP0067 Baldwin Wallace University Campus and Community Access Initiative GA136 $750,000 J CP0068 Birthing Beautiful Communities Birth Center GA136 $150,000 K CP0069 Transplant House of Cleveland GA136 $100,000 L Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $16,093,635 M TOTAL ALL FUNDS $16,093,635 Section 207.09. 1 2 3 A CTI COLUMBUS STATE COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) C CP0076 Ohio Life Science Training Center-Taxable GA136 $1,500,000 D CP0077 Elevate Northland-Taxable GA136 $500,000 E CP0080 CCAD Digital Innovation Lab-Taxable GA136 $300,000 F CP0081 Service Innovation Kitchen Project-Taxable GA136 $300,000 G Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $2,600,000 H Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) I C38435 Student Success Renovations $16,902,015 J CP0078 Healthy New Albany Food Pantry Expansion GA136 $450,000 K CP0079 Fire & EMS Training Facility of Central Ohio GA136 $400,000 L Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $17,752,015 M TOTAL ALL FUNDS $20,352,015 Section 207.10. 1 2 3 A CCC CUYAHOGA COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) C CP0061 Cleveland Habitat for Humanity Building Project-Taxable GA136 $200,000 D CP0063 Argonaut Maritime Center of Excellence-Taxable GA136 $100,000 E CP0065 Lutheran Metro Ministry Workforce Training Center-Taxable GA136 $100,000 F Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $400,000 G Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) H C37800 Basic Renovations $11,480,992 I C37883 Public Safety IT and Media System Upgrades $1,200,000 J CP0062 Greenstone Historic Community Stabilization Project GA136 $200,000 K CP0064 Lakewood Family YMCA Expansion GA136 $100,000 L CP0066 Superior Farm Food Project GA136 $100,000 M Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $13,080,992 N TOTAL ALL FUNDS $13,480,992 Section 207.12. 1 2 3 A ESC EDISON STATE COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) C CP0476 Shelby County Workforce Training Center-Taxable GA136 $1,500,000 D Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $1,500,000 E Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) F C39000 Basic Renovations $400,000 G C39015 Information Technology Upgrade $350,000 H C39018 HVAC Upgrades and Replacements $400,000 I C39036 West, South, and East Hall Renovation $1,062,797 J C39037 Roof Replacement $600,000 K CP0477 Tipp City Grocery-Anchored Project GA136 $1,000,000 L CP0478 Hobart Institute of Welding Equipment Upgrades GA136 $475,000 M CP0479 Shelby County YMCA Child Development Center GA136 $400,000 N Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $4,687,797 O TOTAL ALL FUNDS $6,187,797 Section 207.13. 1 2 3 A HTC HOCKING TECHNICAL COLLEGE B Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) C CP0679 Fairfield County Radiology Lab-Taxable GA136 $750,000 D Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $750,000 E Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) F C36300 Basic Renovations $1,650,000 G C36339 Parking Lot Improvements $490,123 H C36341 Network Infrastructure Upgrade $150,000 I CP0680 McClenaghan Center for Hospitality Instructional Expansion GA136 $50,000 J Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $2,340,123 K TOTAL ALL FUNDS $3,090,123 Section 207.14. 1 2 3 A LTC JAMES RHODES STATE COLLEGE B Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) C C38100 Basic Renovations $850,000 D C38129 Technology Infrastructure Upgrades $590,000 E C38130 Classroom and Laboratory Space Renovations $750,000 F C38133 Mechanical, Electrical, and Plumbing Improvements $174,985 G Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $2,364,985 H TOTAL ALL FUNDS $2,364,985 Section 207.15. 1 2 3 A KSU KENT STATE UNIVERSITY B Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) C CP0681 Ashtabula County Animal Shelter Facility-Taxable GA136 $400,000 D CP0682 Elevator Modernizations for Ashtabula Regional Medical Center-Taxable GA136 $300,000 E CP0683 Auburn Career Center Workforce Center-Taxable GA136 $200,000 F CP0685 Aultman Health and Community Care Facility-Taxable GA136 $100,000 G Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $1,000,000 H Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) I C270I5 White Hall Rehabilitation - Kent $12,000,000 J C270K3 Critical Deferred Upgrades - Kent $4,757,175 K C270N2 IT Network Access Enhancement in Academic Buildings - Kent $3,588,475 L C270O3 Purinton Hall Renovations - East Liverpool $450,000 M C270O5 University Library Tower Renovations and Elevator Modernization-Kent $7,000,000 N C270O7 Central Chiller Plant Replacement-Stark $900,000 O C270P9 Main Classroom HVAC - Salem $450,000 P C270Q1 Stewart Hall HVAC Replacement - Kent $1,193,354 Q CP0684 Girl Scout DreamLab Stark County GA136 $150,000 R CP0686 Clothed In Strength Facility Improvements GA136 $100,000 S CP0687 YMCA of Western Stark County GA136 $100,000 T CP0688 JR Coleman 14th Street Campus Improvements GA136 $50,000 U Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $30,739,004 V TOTAL ALL FUNDS $31,739,004 Section 207.16. 1 2 3 A LCC LAKELAND COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) C C37900 Basic Renovations $1,000,000 D C37935 Mechanical Infrastructure Replacement $1,722,780 E C37936 Electric Infrastructure Replacement $1,000,000 F Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $3,722,780 G TOTAL ALL FUNDS $3,722,780 Section 207.17. 1 2 3 A LOR LORAIN COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) C CP0689 Cleveland Clinic Richard E. Jacobs Health Center Cancer Services-Taxable GA136 $175,000 D Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $175,000 E Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) F C38339 Basic Renovations $6,392,301 G Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $6,392,301 H TOTAL ALL FUNDS $6,567,301 Section 207.18. 1 2 3 A MTC MARION TECHNICAL COLLEGE B Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) C CP0753 Central Ohio Agri-Workforce Initiative-Taxable GA136 $500,000 D Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $500,000 E Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) F C35920 Campus Library Upgrades $750,000 G C35923 Bryson Hall Renovations $428,855 H C35925 Enhanced Wayfinding Signage $300,000 I C35926 Alber Student Center Generator $200,000 J C35927 Maintenance Building Generator Upgrades $200,000 K CP0754 Downtown Marion Entrance Improvements GA136 $50,000 L Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $1,928,855 M TOTAL ALL FUNDS $2,428,855 Section 207.19. 1 2 3 A MUN MIAMI UNIVERSITY B Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) C CP0755 Advanced Manufacturing Hub Technology Project-Taxable GA136 $1,000,000 D CP0756 Butler Tech Aviation Hangar Expansion-Taxable GA136 $500,000 E Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $1,500,000 F Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) G C285A1 School of Business Innovation, Entrepreneurship, and Industry Engagement Facility $23,747,022 H Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $23,747,022 I TOTAL ALL FUNDS $25,247,022 Section 207.20. 1 2 3 A NCC NORTH CENTRAL TECHNICAL COLLEGE B Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) C C38019 Kee Hall Renovation Project $750,000 D C38029 Fallerius Center Basic Renovations $876,221 E C38038 Health Sciences Building - Boilers and Pumps Replacement $400,000 F Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $2,026,221 G TOTAL ALL FUNDS $2,026,221 Section 207.21. 1 2 3 A NEM NORTHEAST OHIO MEDICAL UNIVERSITY B Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) C CP0757 Seidman Cancer Center at UH TriPoint Medical-Taxable GA136 $1,000,000 D CP0759 Akron Children's Warren Health Center Expansion-Taxable GA136 $400,000 E Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $1,400,000 F Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) G C30565 Roof Replacements $800,000 H C30566 Air Handling Replacements $500,000 I C30567 Research Replacement and Upgrades $199,283 J CP0758 Future of Healthcare Simulation Center GA136 $500,000 K Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $1,999,283 L TOTAL ALL FUNDS $3,399,283 Section 207.22. 1 2 3 A NTC NORTHWEST STATE COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) C CP0760 Northwest State Workforce Development Center-Taxable GA136 $500,000 D Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $500,000 E Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) F C38200 Basic Renovations $3,375,980 G CP0761 Newark Electrical JATC Regional Training Center Expansion GA136 $230,000 H Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $3,605,980 I TOTAL ALL FUNDS $4,105,980 Section 207.23. 1 2 3 A OSU OHIO STATE UNIVERSITY B Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) C CP0769 EWI Lab Safety & Air Quality Upgrades-Taxable GA136 $200,000 D Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $200,000 E Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) F C315DM Roof Upgrades and Replacements - Newark $290,000 G C315DP HVAC Upgrades and Replacements - Newark $525,000 H C315HJ Hopewell Hall Improvements - Newark $835,000 I C315HM Fisher Hall Renovation - Wooster $3,600,000 J C315JK Campus-Wide Upgrades - Mansfield $1,400,000 K C315JQ Science Building Safety and Renovations - Lima $1,000,000 L C315JS Galvin Hall Phase 2 - Lima $300,000 M C315JW Morrill Hall Renovations - Marion $450,000 N C315JX Maynard Hall Renovations - Marion $100,000 O C315JY Library Classroom Building Renovations - Marion $750,000 P C315KB Pavement Improvements - Newark $250,000 Q C315KM Hughes Hall Renovation $30,000,000 R C315KN Ramseyer Hall Renovation $31,047,652 S C315KO Elevator Upgrades - Lima $250,000 T C315KP Fire System Upgrades - Lima $450,000 U C315KQ Eisenhower Memorial Center Upgrades - Mansfield $600,000 V C315KR Generator Upgrades and Replacement - Marion $400,000 W C315KS Signage and Wayfinding - Marion $300,000 X C315KT Renovations - Wooster $2,400,000 Y C315KU Generator Upgrades and Replacement - Newark $100,000 Z CP0767 Junior Achievement of Central Ohio Project GA136 $500,000 AA CP0768 LifeCare Alliance Improvements GA136 $450,000 AB CP0770 Village of Life GA136 $200,000 AC CP0771 Bellville Neighborhood Outreach Center GA136 $100,000 AD CP0772 Heidelberg Water Quality Facility GA136 $68,000 AE Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $76,365,652 AF TOTAL ALL FUNDS $76,565,652 Section 207.24. 1 2 3 A OHU OHIO UNIVERSITY B Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) C CP0763 Upcycle Campus-Taxable GA136 $100,000 D CP0764 Fairfield County Respiratory Therapy Lab-Taxable GA136 $91,000 E CP0766 ACEnet Incubator Infrastructure Improvements-Taxable GA136 $15,000 F Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $206,000 G Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) H C30157 Building and Safety System Improvements $10,539,000 I C30158 Academic Space Renewal $13,385,807 J C30164 Building Exterior Improvements - Regional Campuses $2,276,800 K C30171 Campus Infrastructure Improvements - Regional Campuses $2,801,715 L CP0762 OU Lancaster Wagner Theatre GA136 $300,000 M CP0765 Lancaster Greenhouse Renovations GA136 $50,000 N Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $29,353,322 O TOTAL ALL FUNDS $29,559,322 Section 207.25. 1 2 3 A OTC OWENS COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) C C38824 Access Improvement Projects $1,420,000 D C38835 Roof Renovations $1,420,000 E C38854 Engineering Technologies Renovation $2,439,495 F C38855 Administration Hall Renovation $360,000 G CP0773 Owens State Center of Emergency Preparedness GA136 $100,000 H Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $5,739,495 I TOTAL ALL FUNDS $5,739,495 Section 207.26. 1 2 3 A RGC RIO GRANDE COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) C C35630 Basic Renovations-Taxable $1,458,724 D Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $1,458,724 E TOTAL ALL FUNDS $1,458,724 Section 207.27. 1 2 3 A SSC SHAWNEE STATE UNIVERSITY B Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) C C32400 Basic Renovations $3,336,182 D Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $3,336,182 E TOTAL ALL FUNDS $3,336,182 Section 207.28. 1 2 3 A SCC SINCLAIR COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) C CP0774 Dwight L. Barnes Building Revitalization-Taxable GA136 $550,000 D CP0776 Dayton Kitchen Incubator Project-Taxable GA136 $250,000 E CP0777 UD Semiconductor Lab HVAC System-Taxable GA136 $250,000 F CP0779 Miami Valley Meals-Taxable GA136 $100,000 G CP0780 Aviation Maintenance Technology Project-Taxable GA136 $75,000 H Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $1,225,000 I Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) J C37768 Campus Wide General Plumbing Replacement $1,500,000 K C37773 Learning Environment Renovations $2,000,000 L C37782 Fire System Upgrades $6,501,216 M C37783 HVAC Replacement & Upgrades $2,500,000 N CP0775 Crash Course Village Public Safety Training Facility GA136 $300,000 O CP0778 West Carrollton First Responder Training Center GA136 $150,000 P Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $12,951,216 Q TOTAL ALL FUNDS $14,176,216 Section 207.29. 1 2 3 A SOC SOUTHERN STATE COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) C CP0781 Wilmington College Agri-Science Complex-Taxable GA136 $650,000 D CP0782 Information Technology Center of Excellence-Taxable GA136 $250,000 E Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $900,000 F Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) G C32200 Basic Renovations $1,136,322 H C32224 Instructional & Campus Technology Project $400,000 I CP0783 Chesapeake Community Center GA136 $100,000 J Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $1,636,322 K TOTAL ALL FUNDS $2,536,322 Section 207.30. 1 2 3 A STC STARK TECHNICAL COLLEGE B Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) C C38921 HVAC Upgrades and Replacements $1,402,500 D C38924 Parking Lot Upgrades and Improvements $2,941,472 E C38935 Roof Replacements $2,515,275 F CP0784 Canton Public Safety Center GA136 $125,000 G Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $6,984,247 H TOTAL ALL FUNDS $6,984,247 Section 207.31. 1 2 3 A TTC TERRA STATE COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) C C36420 Building E Renovations $366,000 D C36435 Roof Replacements $146,522 E C36436 Exterior Safety Improvements $274,500 F C36437 Network Infrastructure Upgrade $305,000 G C36438 Building A Boiler Upgrade $305,000 H Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $1,397,022 I TOTAL ALL FUNDS $1,397,022 Section 207.32. 1 2 3 A UAK UNIVERSITY OF AKRON B Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) C CP0788 Orrville Area Boys and Girls Club Facility Improvements-Taxable GA136 $94,488 D Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $94,488 E Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) F C25011 Schrank Hall Renovations $15,866,897 G CP0785 EJ Thomas Performing Arts Improvements GA136 $1,000,000 H CP0786 Polsky Building Improvements GA136 $650,000 I CP0787 Dan Street Public Safety Training Center GA136 $400,000 J CP0789 Wagstaff Way Trail Improvements GA136 $60,000 K Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $17,976,897 L TOTAL ALL FUNDS $18,071,385 Section 207.33. 1 2 3 A UCN UNIVERSITY OF CINCINNATI B Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) C CP0793 Cold Chain Infrastructure Upgrade-Taxable GA136 $203,000 D CP0795 Cintrifuse Union Hall-Taxable GA136 $100,000 E Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $303,000 F Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) G C266E3 Holmes Hospital Renovation $30,000,000 H C266E4 Medical Sciences Building Labs Renovation $13,248,250 I CP0790 Delhi Park Sports Complex GA136 $850,000 J CP0791 Uptown Innovation District Food Hall and Kitchen GA136 $750,000 K CP0792 Xavier University Center for Community Health GA136 $250,000 L CP0794 Santa Maria Building Improvements GA136 $200,000 M Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $45,298,250 N TOTAL ALL FUNDS $45,601,250 Section 207.34. 1 2 3 A UTO UNIVERSITY OF TOLEDO B Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) C C34080 Building Envelope/Weatherproofing $10,000,000 D C340A7 Underground Utility Infrastructure Improvements $8,119,899 E CP0796 Toledo Mosaic Community Zone GA136 $150,000 F Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $18,269,899 G TOTAL ALL FUNDS $18,269,899 Section 207.35. 1 2 3 A WTC WASHINGTON STATE COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) C CP0799 Marietta College Nursing Program Facilities Improvements-Taxable GA136 $200,000 D CP0800 Washington County Career Center-Taxable GA136 $100,000 E Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $300,000 F Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) G C35827 Child Development Facility Renovation $1,250,000 H C35828 Data Center Modernization and IT Infrastructure Renovation $383,520 I Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $1,633,520 J TOTAL ALL FUNDS $1,933,520 Section 207.36. 1 2 3 A WSU WRIGHT STATE UNIVERSITY B Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) C C275D6 Workforce Development Center - Taxable $500,000 D CP0798 Riverside STEM Talent Development Complex-Taxable GA136 $100,000 E Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $600,000 F Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) G C27510 Rike Hall Renovation $750,000 H C27550 Creative Arts Center $800,000 I C27570 Building Renovations $1,750,000 J C27578 University Safety Initiative $500,000 K C27582 Campus Paving and Grounds $500,000 L C27593 IT Infrastructure Upgrades $1,370,858 M C275A2 Lake Campus Infrastructure $500,000 N C275B6 Laboratory Animal Resources Occupational Safety $250,000 O C275D9 Health Sciences Regional Boiler Plant $3,500,000 P C275E1 Lake Campus Agriculture and Water Quality Building HVAC Replacement $1,000,000 Q C275E2 Campus Air Handler Control Upgrades $400,000 R CP0797 WSU Wright Brothers Collection GA136 $450,000 S Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $11,770,858 T TOTAL ALL FUNDS $12,370,858 Section 207.37. 1 2 3 A YSU YOUNGSTOWN STATE UNIVERSITY B Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) C CP0801 Youngstown Innovation Hub for Aerospace and Defense-Taxable GA136 $750,000 D Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $750,000 E Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) F C34515 Dental Hygiene Expansion $1,170,000 G C34518 Campus-Wide Building Systems Upgrades $375,000 H C34523 Campus Development $500,000 I C34524 Instructional Space Upgrades $1,170,000 J C34544 Restroom Renovations $800,000 K C34560 Campus Roof Replacements $3,300,000 L C34564 Elevator Safety Upgrades and Replacements $1,800,000 M C34565 IT Infrastructure Upgrades $592,522 N C34569 Campus Life Safety Upgrades $1,000,000 O CP0802 Trumbull County Regional Fire Training Facility GA136 $450,000 P CP0803 Youngstown Area Jewish Federation Food Service GA136 $200,000 Q Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $11,357,522 R TOTAL ALL FUNDS $12,107,522 Section 207.38. 1 2 3 A MAT ZANE STATE COLLEGE B Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) C C36218 Zanesville Campus Renovations $489,300 D C36219 Cambridge Campus Renovations $431,000 E C36224 IT Infrastructure $480,312 F Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $1,400,612 G TOTAL ALL FUNDS $1,400,612 Section 207.41. For all appropriations in this act from the Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) or the Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) that require local funds to be contributed by any state-supported or state-assisted institution of higher education, the Department of Higher Education shall not recommend that any funds be released until the recipient institution demonstrates to the Department of Higher Education and the Office of Budget and Management that the local funds contribution requirement has been secured or satisfied. The local funds shall be in addition to the appropriations in this act. Section 207.42. None of the capital appropriations in this act for state-supported or state-assisted institutions of higher education shall be expended until the particular appropriation has been recommended for release by the Department of Higher Education and released by the Director of Budget and Management or the Controlling Board. Either the institution concerned, or the Department of Higher Education with the concurrence of the institution concerned, may initiate the request to the Director of Budget and Management or the Controlling Board for the release of the particular appropriation. Section 207.43. (A) No capital appropriations in this act made from the Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) or the Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) shall be released for planning or for improvement, renovation, construction, or acquisition of capital facilities if the institution of higher education or the state does not own the real property on which the capital facilities are or will be located. This restriction does not apply in any of the following circumstances: (1) The institution has a long-term lease of, or other interest (such as an easement) in, the real property. (2) The Department of Higher Education certifies to the Controlling Board that undue delay will occur if planning does not proceed while the property or property interest acquisition process continues. In this case, funds may be released upon approval of the Controlling Board to pay for planning through the development of schematic drawings only. (3) In the case of an appropriation for capital facilities that, because of their unique nature or location, will be owned or will be part of facilities owned by a separate nonprofit organization or public body and will be made available to the institution of higher education for its use or benefit, the nonprofit organization or public body either owns or has a long-term lease of the real property or other capital facility to be improved, renovated, constructed, or acquired and has entered into a joint or cooperative use agreement with the institution of higher education that meets the requirements of division (C) of this section. (B) Any appropriations that require cooperation between a technical college and a branch campus of a university may be released by the Controlling Board upon recommendation by the Department of Higher Education that the facilities proposed by the institutions are all of the following: (1) The result of a joint planning effort by the university and the technical college, satisfactory to the Department of Higher Education; (2) Facilities that will meet the needs of the region in terms of technical and general education, taking into consideration the totality of facilities that will be available after the completion of the projects; (3) Planned to permit maximum joint use by the university and technical college of the totality of facilities that will be available upon their completion; (4) To be located on or adjacent to the branch campus of the university. (C) The Department of Higher Education shall adopt and maintain rules regarding the release of moneys from all the appropriations for capital facilities for all state-supported or state-assisted institutions of higher education. In the case of capital facilities referred to in division (A)(3) of this section, the joint or cooperative use agreements shall include, as a minimum, provisions that: (1) Specify the extent and nature of that joint or cooperative use, extending for not fewer than twenty years, with the value of such use or benefit or right to use to be, as is determined by the parties and approved by the Department of Higher Education, reasonably related to the amount of the appropriations; (2) Provide for pro rata reimbursement to the state should the arrangement for joint or cooperative use be terminated prior to the expiration of its full term; (3) Provide that procedures to be followed during the capital improvement process will comply with appropriate applicable state statutes and rules, including the provisions of this act; (4) Provide for payment or reimbursement to the institution of its administrative costs incurred as a result of the facilities project, not to exceed 1.5 per cent of the appropriated amount. (D) Upon the recommendation of the Department of Higher Education, the Controlling Board may approve the transfer of appropriations for projects requiring cooperation between institutions from one institution to another institution with the approval of both institutions. (E) Notwithstanding section 127.14 of the Revised Code, the Controlling Board, upon the recommendation of the Department of Higher Education, may transfer amounts appropriated to the Department of Higher Education to accounts of state-supported or state-assisted institutions created for that same purpose. Section 207.44. The Ohio Public Facilities Commission is hereby authorized to issue and sell, in accordance with Section 2n of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, and Chapter 151. and particularly sections 151.01 and 151.04 of the Revised Code, original obligations in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $461,000,000 in addition to the original issuance of obligations heretofore authorized by prior acts of the General Assembly. These authorized obligations shall be issued, subject to applicable constitutional and statutory limitations, as needed to provide sufficient moneys to the credit of the Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) and the Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) to pay costs of capital facilities for state-supported and state-assisted institutions of higher education. Section 207.45. The requirements of Chapters 123. and 153. of the Revised Code, with respect to the powers and duties of the Executive Director of the Ohio Facilities Construction Commission as they relate to the procedure and awarding of contracts for capital improvement projects, and the requirements of section 127.16 of the Revised Code, with respect to the Controlling Board, do not apply to projects of community college districts and technical college districts. Section 207.46. Those institutions locally administering capital improvement projects pursuant to sections 3345.50 and 3345.51 of the Revised Code may: (A) Establish charges for recovering costs directly related to project administration as defined by the Executive Director of the Ohio Facilities Construction Commission. The Ohio Facilities Construction Commission, in consultation with the Office of Budget and Management, shall review and approve these administrative charges when the charges are in excess of 1.5 per cent of the total construction budget, provided that total administrative charges paid by the state do not exceed four per cent of the state's contribution to the total construction budget. (B) Seek reimbursement from state capital appropriations to the institution for the in-house design services performed by the institution for the capital projects. Acceptable charges are limited to design document preparation work that is done by the institution. These reimbursable design costs shall be shown as "A/E fees" within the project's budget that is submitted to the Controlling Board or the Director of Budget and Management as part of a request for release of funds. The reimbursement for in-house design shall not exceed seven per cent of the estimated construction cost. Section 207.47. TRANSFERS OF HIGHER EDUCATION CAPITAL APPROPRIATIONS The Director of Budget and Management may as necessary to maintain the exclusion from the calculation of gross income for federal income taxation purposes under the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 26 U.S.C. 1 et seq., with respect to obligations issued to fund projects appropriated from the Higher Education Improvement Fund: (A) Transfer appropriations between the Higher Education Improvement Fund and the Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund; (B) Create new appropriation items within the Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund and make transfers of appropriations to them for projects originally funded from appropriations made from the Higher Education Improvement Fund. The projects that are funded under new appropriation items created in this manner shall automatically be designated as specific for purposes of section 126.14 of the Revised Code. Section 209.10. 1 2 3 A ETC BROADCAST EDUCATIONAL MEDIA COMMISSION B Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) C C37426 Ohio Government Telecommunications Service - Facilities and Equipment $421,000 D Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $421,000 E Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) F C37406 Network Operations Center Upgrades $1,708,000 G Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $1,708,000 H TOTAL ALL FUNDS $2,129,000 Section 211.10. 1 2 3 A CSR CAPITOL SQUARE REVIEW AND ADVISORY BOARD B Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) C C87407 Statehouse Repair and Improvements $25,000,000 D C87412 Capitol Square Security $10,000,000 E Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $35,000,000 F TOTAL ALL FUNDS $35,000,000 Section 213.10. 1 2 3 A DAS DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES B Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) C C10020 North High Building Complex Renovations $2,050,000 D C10034 Aronoff Center Systems Replacements and Upgrades $375,000 E C10036 Rhodes Tower Renovations $17,300,000 F C10038 Riffe Renovations $33,450,000 G C10064 Enterprise Block Storage Modernization $2,500,000 H C10065 Ohio One Network Modernization $3,000,000 I Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $58,675,000 J Administrative Building Taxable Bond Fund (Fund 7016) K C10041 MARCS - Taxable $15,000,000 L CP0082 Logan County MARCS Project-Taxable GA136 $225,000 M Administrative Building Taxable Bond Fund (Fund 7016) Total $15,225,000 N Building Improvement Fund (Fund 5KZ0) O C10035 Building Improvement $48,670,000 P Building Improvement Fund (Fund 5KZ0) Total $48,670,000 Q TOTAL ALL FUNDS $122,570,000 Section 213.15. ENTERPRISE BLOCK STORAGE MODERNIZATION AND OHIO ONE NETWORK MODERNIZATION Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, if the Director of Budget and Management, in consultation with the Director of Administrative Services, determines that sufficient cash is available in any fund used by the Department of Administrative Services, except the General Revenue Fund, the Director of Budget and Management may establish new line items in the fund for the same purposes as appropriation items C10064, Enterprise Block Storage Modernization, and C10065, Ohio One Network Modernization. Such amounts are hereby appropriated. MARCS - TAXABLE The foregoing appropriation item C10041, MARCS - Taxable, shall be used to purchase or construct the components of MARCS that are not specific to any one agency. The equipment may include, but is not limited to, computer and telecommunications equipment used for the functioning and integration of the system, communications towers, tower sites, tower equipment, and linkages among towers. The Director of Administrative Services shall determine the specific use of funds. Expenditures from this appropriation are not subject to Chapters 123. and 153. of the Revised Code. Section 213.20. The Treasurer of State is hereby authorized to issue and sell, in accordance with Section 2i of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, Chapter 154. of the Revised Code, and other applicable sections of the Revised Code, original obligations in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $237,500,000 in addition to the original issuance of obligations heretofore authorized by prior acts of the General Assembly. These authorized obligations shall be issued, subject to applicable constitutional and statutory limitations, as needed to provide sufficient moneys to the credit of the Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) and the Administrative Building Taxable Bond Fund (Fund 7016) to pay costs associated with previously authorized capital facilities for the housing of branches and agencies of state government or their functions. Section 215.10. 1 2 3 A AGR DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE B Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) C C70007 Building and Grounds Renovations $8,090,000 D C70023 Building #22 OEPA Laboratory Equipment $140,000 E C70024 Building #22 Renovation $4,615,000 F C70030 Agriculture Equipment $2,310,000 G CP0001 Hardin County Fairgrounds 4-H Livestock Project GA136 $750,000 H CP0002 Geauga County Fairgrounds Building Project GA136 $700,000 I CP0003 Morrow County Fairgrounds Grandstand Project GA136 $700,000 J CP0004 Clermont County Fairgrounds Community Cattle and Show Pavilion GA136 $600,000 K CP0005 Sandusky County Fairgrounds Infrastructure GA136 $530,000 L CP0006 Holmes County Exposition Center Expansion GA136 $500,000 M CP0007 Logan County Fairgrounds Restroom Project GA136 $500,000 N CP0008 Pickaway Agriculture and Events Center GA136 $500,000 O CP0009 Carroll County Fairgrounds Grandstands Rehab GA136 $450,000 P CP0010 Belmont County Fairgrounds Improvements GA136 $400,000 Q CP0011 Delaware County Fairgrounds 4-H Agriculture Barn Improvements GA136 $400,000 R CP0012 Gallia County Junior Fair & Event Center Project GA136 $400,000 S CP0013 Ross County Fairgrounds PA System Project GA136 $400,000 T CP0014 Brown County Fairgrounds Bleacher Project GA136 $350,000 U CP0015 Harrison County Fairgrounds Improvements GA136 $350,000 V CP0016 Shelby County Fair Multi-Livestock Project GA136 $350,000 W CP0017 Brown County Fairgrounds Restroom Project GA136 $300,000 X CP0018 Butler County Fairgrounds Swine / Sheep Barn GA136 $300,000 Y CP0019 Lancaster Fairfield County Fairgrounds GA136 $300,000 Z CP0020 Portage County Fairground Improvements GA136 $300,000 AA CP0021 Hilliard Brundige 4-H Youth Innovation Center GA136 $278,500 AB CP0022 Butler County Fairgrounds Grandstand Seating GA136 $250,000 AC CP0023 Monroe County Fairgrounds Improvements GA136 $250,000 AD CP0024 Noble County Agriculture Society Improvements GA136 $205,000 AE CP0025 Coshocton County Fairgrounds Improvements GA136 $200,000 AF CP0026 Medina County Fairground Improvements GA136 $200,000 AG CP0027 Ottawa County Fairgrounds Safety & Energy Project GA136 $200,000 AH CP0028 Preble County Historical Society Agriculture Barn GA136 $200,000 AI CP0029 Trumbull County Fairground Improvements GA136 $200,000 AJ CP0030 Washington County Fair Improvements GA136 $200,000 AK CP0031 Richwood Junior Fair Restroom Project GA136 $165,000 AL CP0032 Historic Ranzau Blacksmith Shop GA136 $156,500 AM CP0033 Highland County Agriculture Society Improvements GA136 $150,000 AN CP0034 Lawrence County Fairgrounds Improvements GA136 $149,600 AO CP0035 Wayne County Fairgrounds Parking Lot Resurfacing GA136 $139,880 AP CP0036 Paulding County Fairgrounds Restroom Improvements GA136 $121,193 AQ CP0037 Geauga County Fair Electrical Upgrades GA136 $111,000 AR CP0038 Columbiana County Fairgrounds Junior Fair Multi-Species Livestock Facility GA136 $110,000 AS CP0039 Auglaize County Fairgrounds Buildings and Grounds Improvements GA136 $100,000 AT CP0040 Clark County Fairgrounds Youth Building Improvements GA136 $100,000 AU CP0041 Equine Barn at Warren Fairgrounds Training Center GA136 $100,000 AV CP0042 Scioto County Fairgrounds Building Renovations GA136 $100,000 AW CP0043 Highland County Fair Improvements GA136 $75,000 AX CP0044 Highland County Fairgrounds - Flora Hall Upgrades GA136 $75,000 AY CP0045 Wayne County Fairgrounds Lighting Upgrades GA136 $60,000 AZ CP0046 Adams County Fairgrounds Improvements GA136 $50,000 BA CP0047 Meigs County Fairground Improvements GA136 $50,000 BB CP0048 Summit County Fairgrounds 4-H Project GA136 $50,000 BC CP0049 Jackson County Fairgrounds Grandstand GA136 $48,500 BD CP0050 Wayne County Fairgrounds Gate and Fence Improvements GA136 $45,240 BE CP0051 Wauseon Historical 4-H Steer Barn GA136 $42,500 BF CP0052 Wayne County Fairgrounds Buss Hall Improvements GA136 $42,260 BG CP0053 Wyandot County Fairground Improvements GA136 $35,500 BH CP0054 Wayne County Fairgrounds Barn Improvements GA136 $27,500 BI CP0055 Lorain County Fairgrounds Helipad GA136 $10,000 BJ Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $28,533,173 BK Clean Ohio Agricultural Easement Fund (Fund 7057) BL C70009 Clean Ohio Agricultural Easement Fund $12,500,000 BM Clean Ohio Agricultural Easement Fund (Fund 7057) Total $12,500,000 BN TOTAL ALL FUNDS $41,033,173 Section 217.10. 1 2 3 A COM DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE B State Fire Marshal Fund (Fund 5460) C C80023 SFM Renovations and Improvements $7,500,000 D C80034 Fire Training Apparatus $2,875,000 E C80042 Fire Training Structure $26,774,643 F State Fire Marshal Fund (Fund 5460) Total $37,149,643 G TOTAL ALL FUNDS $37,149,643 Section 219.10. 1 2 3 A DDD DEPARTMENT OF DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES B Mental Health Facilities Improvement Fund (Fund 7033) C C59004 Community Assistance Projects $25,000,000 D C59034 Statewide Developmental Centers $208,000,000 E CP0083 Bellefaire JCB GA136 $650,000 F CP0084 Taking Root Farms - Field of Opportunities GA136 $400,000 G CP0085 Flying Horse Farms GA136 $350,000 H CP0086 Stockhands Horses for Healing GA136 $350,000 I CP0087 Robert Fox YMCA Recreation Improvements GA136 $325,000 J CP0088 Easter Seals First Child Care Project GA136 $300,000 K CP0089 Morrow County Neil Avenue Facility Renovations GA136 $250,000 L CP0090 Linden Grove School Autism Expansion GA136 $200,000 M CP0091 Adams County Association for DD Accessibility Project GA136 $167,000 N CP0092 Children's Home of Cincinnati GA136 $150,000 O CP0093 Huron AOS Community Arts Facility GA136 $200,000 P CP0094 New Hope Accessible Classroom Project GA136 $100,000 Q CP0095 DDC Clinic for Special Needs Children GA136 $100,000 R Mental Health Facilities Improvement Fund (Fund 7033) Total $236,542,000 S TOTAL ALL FUNDS $236,542,000 Section 219.15. COMMUNITY ASSISTANCE PROJECTS Capital appropriations in this act made from appropriation item C59004, Community Assistance Projects, may be used to provide community assistance funds to county boards of developmental disabilities, nonprofits, and housing corporations for the development, purchase, construction, or renovation of community housing for people with developmental disabilities who are or will be receiving home and community-based waiver services. Funds shall be distributed by the Department of Developmental Disabilities subject to Controlling Board approval. Section 221.10. 1 2 3 A MHA DEPARTMENT OF BEHAVIORAL HEALTH B Mental Health Facilities Improvement Fund (Fund 7033) C C58007 Infrastructure Renovations $346,500,000 D C58048 Community Resiliency Projects $3,500,000 E C58052 Psychiatric Specialty Care for Youth Facility $35,000,000 F CP0690 Hillcrest Renovations GA136 $1,500,000 G CP0691 Emerge Emancipation Project GA136 $850,000 H CP0692 Community Housing Network Deer Hill Place GA136 $750,000 I CP0693 Bridgeway Academy Renovation GA136 $600,000 J CP0694 Maryhaven Comprehensive Addiction Center GA136 $500,000 K CP0695 Neighborhood Alliance Early Childhood Enhancement Initiative GA136 $500,000 L CP0696 Price Hill Learning Grove GA136 $500,000 M CP0697 Cornerstone of Hope Emancipation Project GA136 $450,000 N CP0698 Mission Point / Cherry Street Mission GA136 $407,500 O CP0699 Akron Children's Hospital - Belpre Pediatric Primary Care Office Project GA136 $400,000 P CP0700 Domestic Violence/Human Trafficking Shelter GA136 $400,000 Q CP0701 Unison Health Improvements Project GA136 $400,000 R CP0702 Brown Manor Improvements GA136 $354,000 S CP0703 IBH Addiction Recovery Centers GA136 $350,000 T CP0704 Van Buren Community Shelter Improvements GA136 $350,000 U CP0705 Haven House Renovations GA136 $345,000 V CP0706 ACCESS Shelter for Women and Children Expansion Project GA136 $250,000 W CP0707 Buddy LaRosa Center for Youth GA136 $250,000 X CP0708 Lower Lights Behavioral Health & Recovery Center GA136 $250,000 Y CP0709 Riveon Primary Care Services GA136 $250,000 Z CP0710 YWCA of Van Wert County Facility and Clinic GA136 $250,000 AA CP0711 Saint Vincent de Paul Community Donation Intake Facility GA136 $225,000 AB CP0712 Appleseed Community Mental Health Center GA136 $210,000 AC CP0713 Best Point Historic Harbor Addiction Project GA136 $200,000 AD CP0714 Broadway Recovery Services Health Hub Renovation GA136 $200,000 AE CP0715 CommQuest Canton Facility Upgrades GA136 $200,000 AF CP0716 CommQuest Massillon Family Living Center GA136 $200,000 AG CP0717 Dreams on Horseback Modernization GA136 $200,000 AH CP0718 Felicity Apartments Housing Project GA136 $200,000 AI CP0719 HEART Market and Resource Hub Pantry GA136 $200,000 AJ CP0720 Hope & Healing Emergency Shelter Safety & Restoration Project GA136 $200,000 AK CP0721 Providence House Community Healthcare Hub GA136 $200,000 AL CP0722 St. Rita Medical Adolescent Behavioral Unit GA136 $200,000 AM CP0723 The Buckeye Ranch GA136 $200,000 AN CP0724 Avondale Boys & Girls Clubs of Greater Cincinnati GA136 $150,000 AO CP0725 Bridges of Hope Shelter Adequacy and Safety GA136 $150,000 AP CP0726 Child Guidance and Family Solutions - Akron GA136 $150,000 AQ CP0727 Lorain County Safe Harbor GA136 $150,000 AR CP0728 Preble County Success Academy GA136 $150,000 AS CP0729 Safer Futures GA136 $150,000 AT CP0730 Valley Interfaith Community Building Renovation GA136 $150,000 AU CP0731 Vista Village: Tiny Home Project GA136 $150,000 AV CP0732 Field of Hope Triple Duty Fitness Project GA136 $130,000 AW CP0733 A Home 4 Me Facility GA136 $100,000 AX CP0734 CATS Safety & Security Project GA136 $100,000 AY CP0735 CHC Addiction Recovery GA136 $100,000 AZ CP0736 Gilgal House Victims of Abuse Project GA136 $100,000 BA CP0737 Magnolia Clubhouse Facilities Improvements GA136 $100,000 BB CP0738 Serving Area Military (SAM) and Veterans Center GA136 $100,000 BC CP0739 The Woods at Dairy Lane GA136 $100,000 BD CP0740 Veterans Village Clubhouse GA136 $100,000 BE CP0741 Wooster OneEighty Roof Project GA136 $100,000 BF CP0742 Crawford County JFS ADA Ramp GA136 $85,000 BG CP0743 IConnect – Lorain GA136 $75,000 BH CP0744 Struthers Ranch: Dylan's House GA136 $75,000 BI CP0745 Vinton County Health Facility Improvements GA136 $75,000 BJ CP0746 Alliance Area Habitat for Humanity GA136 $50,000 BK CP0747 Child Guidance and Family Solutions - Cuyahoga Falls and Barberton GA136 $50,000 BL CP0748 Greater Alliance Commons Safety and Infrastructure Project GA136 $50,000 BM CP0749 NCA Iconnect Richland GA136 $50,000 BN CP0750 SAOP Housing Facility Improvements GA136 $50,000 BO CP0751 The Ridge Project GA136 $50,000 BP CP0752 Tri County Rooted in Safety Help Center GA136 $25,000 BQ Mental Health Facilities Improvement Fund (Fund 7033) Total $400,406,500 BR TOTAL ALL FUNDS $400,406,500 Section 221.13. COMMUNITY RESILIENCY PROJECTS The foregoing appropriation item C58048, Community Resiliency Projects, shall be used to establish, expand, or renovate programming spaces for individuals affected by behavioral health related issues, specifically targeting, to the extent possible, programming spaces for middle and high school age youth affected by behavioral health related issues. Funds shall be awarded to projects through a process to be developed by the Department of Behavioral Health that may take into account, but is not limited to, the following factors: (A) the poverty rate of the community in which the facility is to be located, (B) the breadth and nature of the plan to engage a broad spectrum of at-risk youth, (C) support of community partners, (D) readiness of the funding applicant to move forward with the project, and (E) the array of supportive programming to be offered by the applicant. All projects shall comply with the community project standards and guidelines of the Department of Behavioral Health. Section 221.20. The Treasurer of State is hereby authorized to issue and sell in accordance with Section 2i of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, and Chapter 154. of the Revised Code, particularly section 154.20 and other applicable sections of the Revised Code, original obligations in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $621,000,000 in addition to the original issuance of obligations heretofore authorized by prior acts of the General Assembly. These authorized obligations shall be issued, subject to applicable constitutional and statutory limitations, as needed to provide sufficient moneys to the credit of the Mental Health Facilities Improvement Fund (Fund 7033) to pay costs of capital facilities as defined in section 154.01 of the Revised Code for behavioral health and developmental disability purposes. Section 223.10. 1 2 3 A DNR DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES B Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) C C725D5 Fountain Square Building Improvements $5,068,000 D C725D7 Statewide Law Enforcement Equipment $275,000 E C725E0 ODNR Fairgrounds Areas Upgrading $600,000 F Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $5,943,000 G Clean Ohio Trail Fund (Fund 7061) H C72514 Clean Ohio Trail Fund $12,500,000 I Clean Ohio Trail Fund (Fund 7061) Total $12,500,000 J Ohio Parks and Natural Resources Fund (Fund 7031) K C72549 ODNR Facilities Development $5,150,000 L C725E1 Local Parks Projects - Statewide $4,449,638 M C725E5 Project Planning $847,550 N C725J0 Natural Areas/Preserves Maintenance/Facilities $3,237,000 O C725J6 Ohio and Erie Canal $3,940,000 P C725K0 State Park Renovations and Upgrading $2,000,000 Q C725N8 Division of Forestry $2,624,000 R Ohio Parks and Natural Resources Fund (Fund 7031) Total $22,248,188 S Parks and Recreation Improvement Fund (Fund 7035) T C725A0 State Parks Campgrounds, Lodges, and Cabins $40,192,000 U C725B2 Parks Equipment $3,500,000 V C725C4 Muskingum River Lock and Dam $10,000,000 W C725E6 Project Planning $9,904,088 X C725L8 Statewide Trails Program $1,072,000 Y C725N6 Wastewater/Water Systems Upgrades $23,103,000 Z C725R3 State Parks Renovations and Upgrades $76,912,750 AA C725R4 Dam Rehabilitation - Parks $37,977,000 AB C725U9 Recreation Facilities $9,500,000 AC C725W2 State Forest Land Conservation $25,000,000 AD CP0096 Barthelmas Park Aquatic Facility GA136 $2,000,000 AE CP0097 Columbus Zoo Aquarium Renovation GA136 $2,000,000 AF CP0098 Champion City Sports & Wellness Center GA136 $1,500,000 AG CP0099 Cheryl Allen Center Improvements GA136 $1,300,000 AH CP0100 Lima Town Square Park GA136 $1,300,000 AI CP0101 City of Lima Parks and Recreation Improvements GA136 $1,250,000 AJ CP0102 Aurora Park Improvements GA136 $1,000,000 AK CP0103 Buckeye Lake North Shore Park GA136 $1,000,000 AL CP0104 Prairie Township Sports Complex Amenities Project GA136 $1,000,000 AM CP0105 Veteran's Park Multi-Sport Turf Fields GA136 $900,000 AN CP0106 Village of Spencerville Swimming Pool Enhancements and Renovations GA136 $900,000 AO CP0107 Harrison Community Center Park Improvements GA136 $850,000 AP CP0108 Middletown Community Foundation Park GA136 $800,000 AQ CP0109 Brecksville Community Center Improvement GA136 $758,000 AR CP0110 Berea Recreation Center Expansion GA136 $750,000 AS CP0111 Cincinnati Grant Park Renovation GA136 $750,000 AT CP0112 Cleveland Metroparks Public Sailing Center GA136 $750,000 AU CP0113 Cleveland Metroparks Zoo Primate Forest GA136 $750,000 AV CP0114 Reservoir Park Revitalization GA136 $750,000 AW CP0115 Sharon Woods Harbor Revitalization Project GA136 $750,000 AX CP0116 Toledo Summit Riverfront Corridor GA136 $750,000 AY CP0117 Akron Zoo Giraffe Journey GA136 $740,000 AZ CP0118 North Royalton Memorial Park Pavilion GA136 $700,000 BA CP0119 Sims Park Playground Improvements GA136 $700,000 BB CP0120 City of Niles Park Improvements GA136 $650,000 BC CP0121 East Park Pool and Rec Improvements GA136 $650,000 BD CP0122 Price Hill Athletics Complex GA136 $650,000 BE CP0123 Giraffe Habitat at the Cincinnati Zoo GA136 $600,000 BF CP0124 Salem City Village Green Park (Lincoln Plaza) GA136 $600,000 BG CP0125 William Henry Harrison Riverfront Park GA136 $600,000 BH CP0126 Moats Park Expansion GA136 $575,000 BI CP0127 Armco Park Infrastructure Upgrades GA136 $550,000 BJ CP0128 West Carrollton Dam Safety Improvements GA136 $502,215 BK CP0129 Avon Traxler Preserve Project GA136 $500,000 BL CP0130 Bridge Park Park GA136 $500,000 BM CP0131 Chagrin River Pedestrian Bridge at Daniels Park GA136 $500,000 BN CP0132 Cincinnati Nature Center Parking Lot Improvements GA136 $500,000 BO CP0133 Countryside YMCA Splash Pad & Playground GA136 $500,000 BP CP0134 Gibsonburg Flood Mitigation Project GA136 $500,000 BQ CP0135 Great Southern Metro Park Improvements GA136 $500,000 BR CP0136 Irishtown Bend Park Heritage Site GA136 $500,000 BS CP0137 Lake Metroparks Park Improvements GA136 $500,000 BT CP0138 Liberty Park Playground Project GA136 $500,000 BU CP0139 Pacesetter Park Inclusive Playground GA136 $500,000 BV CP0140 Town Center Park Improvements GA136 $500,000 BW CP0141 Pioneer Clearfork Nature Trail GA136 $472,500 BX CP0142 Rutland Civic Center Project GA136 $465,860 BY CP0143 Legacy Center Recreation Improvements GA136 $461,125 BZ CP0144 Historic Bear's Mill Improvements GA136 $450,000 CA CP0145 Oakwood and Shafor Park Improvements GA136 $450,000 CB CP0146 Palmer Field Youth Safety Project GA136 $450,000 CC CP0147 Port Clinton Waterworks Park Improvements GA136 $450,000 CD CP0148 Sandy Valley Trail Connection Project GA136 $450,000 CE CP0149 Brunswick North Carpenter Park Expansion GA136 $400,000 CF CP0150 Bucyrus Norton Park GA136 $400,000 CG CP0151 Germantown Kercher Park Tennis/Pickleball Court Expansion GA136 $400,000 CH CP0152 Medina Softball and Baseball Fields GA136 $400,000 CI CP0153 Oxbow Meadow Project GA136 $400,000 CJ CP0154 SPIRE Institute and Academy Soccer Complex GA136 $400,000 CK CP0155 The Becks Pool Modernization GA136 $400,000 CL CP0156 The WILDS Facility Improvements GA136 $400,000 CM CP0157 Washington Township Countryside Park Improvements GA136 $400,000 CN CP0158 J.R. Smith Park Improvements GA136 $375,000 CO CP0159 Big Muskie Heritage Park GA136 $375,000 CP CP0160 Village of Cridersville Legacy Park Improvements GA136 $375,000 CQ CP0161 Deters Park Expansion GA136 $362,500 CR CP0162 Blue Ash Summit Park Improvements GA136 $350,000 CS CP0163 Brown Township Park Improvements GA136 $350,000 CT CP0164 Chardon Pocket Park Project GA136 $350,000 CU CP0165 Cincinnati Tennis Foundation: Inspiration Center GA136 $350,000 CV CP0166 Edgerton River Park GA136 $350,000 CW CP0167 Ellison Landing Park Improvements GA136 $350,000 CX CP0168 Holden Arboretum Visitor Experience Hub GA136 $350,000 CY CP0169 Mount Vernon West End Park Improvements GA136 $350,000 CZ CP0170 Nebo Park Miracle League Project GA136 $350,000 DA CP0171 Reading Public Recreation Complex Improvements GA136 $350,000 DB CP0172 Uptown Centerville Greenspace Project GA136 $350,000 DC CP0173 Yoctangee Park Improvements GA136 $350,000 DD CP0174 4-H Camp Clifton GA136 $333,690 DE CP0175 Voice of America Athletic Field Improvements GA136 $325,000 DF CP0176 Ottawa Memorial Park GA136 $301,600 DG CP0177 City of Piqua - Canalley Project GA136 $300,000 DH CP0178 Cleveland Heights Cumberland Aquatic Facility GA136 $300,000 DI CP0179 Close the Gap London GA136 $300,000 DJ CP0180 Columbiana Project Playground GA136 $300,000 DK CP0181 CROWN Oasis / Ohio River Trail GA136 $300,000 DL CP0182 Dover City Park Playground Improvement Project GA136 $300,000 DM CP0183 Hamilton BMX Facility Upgrades GA136 $300,000 DN CP0184 Hancock Park District Pond Improvement Project GA136 $300,000 DO CP0185 Kelleys Island Community Park Improvements GA136 $300,000 DP CP0186 Kirk Schuring Park Improvements GA136 $300,000 DQ CP0187 Northwood Inclusive Playground GA136 $300,000 DR CP0188 Riverside Park Connector GA136 $300,000 DS CP0189 Waddell Park Baseball Fields GA136 $300,000 DT CP0190 Waverly Community Park Upgrades GA136 $300,000 DU CP0191 Central Greenway Bike Trail Extension GA136 $275,000 DV CP0192 Lancaster Rising Park GA136 $275,000 DW CP0193 Spotted Turtle Trail GA136 $275,000 DX CP0194 Jenera Arlington Park Safety and Connectivity GA136 $255,000 DY CP0195 Bowling Green Chessie Circle Trail extension GA136 $250,000 DZ CP0196 Bremen Skate Park GA136 $250,000 EA CP0197 Cambridge Community Park GA136 $250,000 EB CP0198 Canal Basin Park GA136 $250,000 EC CP0199 Canter's Cave 4-H Camp improvements GA136 $250,000 ED CP0200 Clarksburg Community Renewal Project GA136 $250,000 EE CP0201 Cleveland Rowing Foundation GA136 $250,000 EF CP0202 Conneaut Harbor Dredging and Marina Renovation GA136 $250,000 EG CP0203 Coy Park Improvements GA136 $250,000 EH CP0204 Eagle Ridge Park Improvements GA136 $250,000 EI CP0205 Findlay Greenspace Improvement Project GA136 $250,000 EJ CP0206 Franklin Township Public Park GA136 $250,000 EK CP0207 Great Miami River Trail Connector GA136 $250,000 EL CP0208 Harrod Park Improvements GA136 $250,000 EM CP0209 Havener Park Improvements GA136 $250,000 EN CP0210 Hilliard Wellness Campus Trail Connector / Renovation GA136 $250,000 EO CP0211 Hinckley Lake Facilities Renovation GA136 $250,000 EP CP0212 Keehner Park Infrastructure Improvements GA136 $250,000 EQ CP0213 Lock 2 Park GA136 $250,000 ER CP0214 Mahoning River Water Trail GA136 $250,000 ES CP0215 Market Square Park Improvements GA136 $250,000 ET CP0216 McDowell Athletic Complex Renovation GA136 $250,000 EU CP0217 McGill Park Old Town Connector GA136 $250,000 EV CP0218 Medina Rec Center and Turf Project GA136 $250,000 EW CP0219 New Philadelphia South Side Perimeter Trail GA136 $250,000 EX CP0220 Plain City Splash Pad in Public Square GA136 $250,000 EY CP0221 Quail Hollow Park Improvements GA136 $250,000 EZ CP0222 Ralph J. Ficke Park Upgrades GA136 $250,000 FA CP0223 Redgate Farm Community Park Upgrades GA136 $250,000 FB CP0224 Riverside Crossing Park Improvements GA136 $250,000 FC CP0225 Sharonville Gower Park Improvements GA136 $250,000 FD CP0226 Stadium Park Shelter House GA136 $250,000 FE CP0227 Sugarcreek Township Feedwire Road Pedestrian Bridge GA136 $250,000 FF CP0228 Synthetic Play Field Oxford Community Park GA136 $250,000 FG CP0229 Tuscarawas Memorial Park Improvements GA136 $250,000 FH CP0230 Winesburg Park Improvement Project GA136 $250,000 FI CP0231 YMCA of Putnam County Recreation Project GA136 $240,000 FJ CP0232 Cannonball - Wabash Trail Project GA136 $230,000 FK CP0233 Lions Park Trail Improvements GA136 $220,000 FL CP0234 McComb Cloe Greiner Park Amphitheater GA136 $220,000 FM CP0235 Richwood Lake Park Playground Improvements GA136 $215,000 FN CP0236 Stokes Lakeview Park Improvement Project GA136 $212,500 FO CP0237 Mt. Blanchard Community Pool Improvements GA136 $210,500 FP CP0238 Ashtabula County Metroparks Pymatuning Valley Greenway GA136 $200,000 FQ CP0239 Athens Lumber Company (ALCO) Boat Ramp GA136 $200,000 FR CP0240 Clauge Park Cabin Renovations GA136 $200,000 FS CP0241 Concord Park Improvements GA136 $200,000 FT CP0242 Coshocton Canal Restoration Project GA136 $200,000 FU CP0243 Cuyahoga Riverfront Development Project GA136 $200,000 FV CP0244 Germantown Kercher & Weber Park Improvements GA136 $200,000 FW CP0245 Hoffman Pool Replacement GA136 $200,000 FX CP0246 Jackson Park Bathroom and Other Improvements GA136 $200,000 FY CP0247 Keep Cincinnati Beautiful - Pocket Parks GA136 $200,000 FZ CP0248 Lake County YMCA Recreation Project GA136 $200,000 GA CP0249 Lebanon Colonial Park Welcome Center GA136 $200,000 GB CP0250 Maple Heights Playground Improvements GA136 $200,000 GC CP0251 Mingo Park Revitalization GA136 $200,000 GD CP0252 Montpelier Community Aquatic Center GA136 $200,000 GE CP0253 Munroe Falls Community Park Playground Improvements GA136 $200,000 GF CP0254 Ohio Premier Training Facility GA136 $200,000 GG CP0255 Pickerington Connects GA136 $200,000 GH CP0256 Pickerington Covered Bridge GA136 $200,000 GI CP0257 Powell Arbor Ridge Park Path GA136 $200,000 GJ CP0258 Putnam Hill Abolitionist Park Recreation Project GA136 $200,000 GK CP0259 Sandusky Lions Park Improvements GA136 $200,000 GL CP0260 Sardis Broken Timber Outdoor Education Project GA136 $200,000 GM CP0261 Sylvania Seney Park Improvements GA136 $200,000 GN CP0262 Village of Hamden Park Revitalization GA136 $200,000 GO CP0263 Willowick Municipal Center Parking Lot GA136 $200,000 GP CP0264 Bicentennial Park Inclusive Playground GA136 $199,000 GQ CP0265 Geneva Recreation Center GA136 $196,250 GR CP0266 Henry County Hamler Memorial Park GA136 $192,100 GS CP0267 Phillipsburg Community Park & Pickleball Court GA136 $188,000 GT CP0268 Freer Field Community Access Improvements GA136 $175,000 GU CP0269 Highland Heights Playground Renovation GA136 $175,000 GV CP0270 Mentor Splash Pads GA136 $175,000 GW CP0271 Miami Park Improvements GA136 $175,000 GX CP0272 Millersport Lions Park Improvements GA136 $175,000 GY CP0273 Whitehouse Park and Monument Upgrades GA136 $175,000 GZ CP0274 Coshocton Lake Park Improvements GA136 $166,000 HA CP0275 Parkman TWP Community House Rehabilitation Project GA136 $162,500 HB CP0276 Fairport Harbor Orchard Park Flood Mitigation GA136 $161,700 HC CP0277 Freeman's Farm GA136 $151,204 HD CP0278 Barlow Farm Park Trail GA136 $150,000 HE CP0279 Basin Park Erosion Project GA136 $150,000 HF CP0280 Batavia Township Park Improvements GA136 $150,000 HG CP0281 Boy Scout Dan Beard and Boone Cabin Projects GA136 $150,000 HH CP0282 Boys & Girls Club of West Chester/Liberty GA136 $150,000 HI CP0283 Cambridge Area YMCA Aquatics GA136 $150,000 HJ CP0284 Centerville Grant Park Improvements GA136 $150,000 HK CP0285 Clintonville Beechwold Community Center GA136 $150,000 HL CP0286 Evendale Pool Upgrades GA136 $150,000 HM CP0287 Garfield Heights Parks and Recreation Project GA136 $150,000 HN CP0288 Jefferson Township Community Facility Expansion Project GA136 $150,000 HO CP0289 Lewisburg Soccer Park and Walking Path GA136 $150,000 HP CP0290 Lisbon Swimming Pool Improvements GA136 $150,000 HQ CP0291 Loveland Nisbet Park Playground GA136 $150,000 HR CP0292 Maverick's Creek Unlimited Playground GA136 $150,000 HS CP0293 Mayfield Heights Baseball Fields GA136 $150,000 HT CP0294 Mayfield Heights Trail Improvements GA136 $150,000 HU CP0295 McGregor PACE Landing Walking Trails GA136 $150,000 HV CP0296 Miller Road Boat Launch Improvements GA136 $150,000 HW CP0297 Minerva Park Pathways & Trail Improvements GA136 $150,000 HX CP0298 Mirolo Sensory Park Project GA136 $150,000 HY CP0299 Montgomery Promenade Park GA136 $150,000 HZ CP0300 Old North Dayton Park Project GA136 $150,000 IA CP0301 Pataskala Foundation Park Soccer Fields GA136 $150,000 IB CP0302 Pratt Land Grant Park Project GA136 $150,000 IC CP0303 Showse Park Revitalization GA136 $150,000 ID CP0304 Sisler Park Improvements GA136 $150,000 IE CP0305 Sprigg TWP Old Bentonville Community Park GA136 $150,000 IF CP0306 Springdale Accessible Recreation Project GA136 $150,000 IG CP0307 Stavich Trail Improvements GA136 $150,000 IH CP0308 Steubenville Community Connector GA136 $150,000 II CP0309 Strongsville Community Dog Park GA136 $150,000 IJ CP0310 Village of Mount Orab Bruce Lunsford Park Inclusive Playground GA136 $150,000 IK CP0311 West Union Biking Path GA136 $150,000 IL CP0312 Canfield Township Community Park Upgrades GA136 $146,079 IM CP0313 Wickliffe Coulby Park Revitalization GA136 $137,500 IN CP0314 Centerburg Ohio to Erie Trailheads Project GA136 $135,000 IO CP0315 Grand River Trail Restoration GA136 $130,000 IP CP0316 End of the Line Park Improvements GA136 $127,000 IQ CP0317 North Lawrence Park Project GA136 $127,000 IR CP0318 Birchard Park Improvements GA136 $125,000 IS CP0319 Chardon Township Park Restrooms GA136 $125,000 IT CP0320 Clyde Community Park Nature Trail GA136 $125,000 IU CP0321 Dial Park Nature-Themed Playground GA136 $125,000 IV CP0322 Harry Wolfe Park Playground Improvements GA136 $125,000 IW CP0323 Highland Heights Connector GA136 $125,000 IX CP0324 Macedonia Longwood Park Pickleball Courts GA136 $125,000 IY CP0325 Ted Lewis Park Improvements GA136 $125,000 IZ CP0326 Deshler Community Recreation Center GA136 $124,312 JA CP0327 Allen Township Park Improvements GA136 $121,000 JB CP0328 Freedom Township Community Park Improvements GA136 $121,000 JC CP0329 Champaign Family YMCA Recreation GA136 $120,000 JD CP0330 Warren Historic Park Improvements GA136 $120,000 JE CP0331 Wurster Memorial Splashpad & Amphitheater Improvements GA136 $115,000 JF CP0332 Ashland PumpHouse District Freedom Park and Street Improvements GA136 $100,000 JG CP0333 Attica Waterfront Walking Path GA136 $100,000 JH CP0334 Beach City Park Improvements GA136 $100,000 JI CP0335 Bedford Historic District / Metroparks Connectivity GA136 $100,000 JJ CP0336 Brownhelm Township Schoolhouse Park Improvements GA136 $100,000 JK CP0337 Cahoon Memorial Park Stabilization & Access Project GA136 $100,000 JL CP0338 Camp Braveheart Pavilion and Trails Project GA136 $100,000 JM CP0339 Camp Stonybrook ADA Aquatics Project GA136 $100,000 JN CP0340 Cave Lake Dam Improvements GA136 $100,000 JO CP0341 Central Ohio Boating Education Center GA136 $100,000 JP CP0342 Clark Park - Shoreline Restoration and Preservation GA136 $100,000 JQ CP0343 Cleveland Edgewater Park Shared Use Path GA136 $100,000 JR CP0344 Copley Township Park Improvements GA136 $100,000 JS CP0345 Deer Park Chamberlin Park Equipment Upgrades GA136 $100,000 JT CP0346 Don W. Miller Memorial Park Improvements GA136 $100,000 JU CP0347 East Palestine Pavilion Restoration Project GA136 $100,000 JV CP0348 Enright Park Improvements GA136 $100,000 JW CP0349 Epworth Park Auditorium GA136 $100,000 JX CP0350 Euclid Heritage Trail Project GA136 $100,000 JY CP0351 Euclid Memorial Pool Renovation GA136 $100,000 JZ CP0352 Farmersville /Jackson TWP Joint Park Recreation GA136 $100,000 KA CP0353 Findlay Discovery Play Area GA136 $100,000 KB CP0354 Fort Loramie Community Park Project GA136 $100,000 KC CP0355 Friendship Circle Improvements GA136 $100,000 KD CP0356 Friendship Park Restroom Project GA136 $100,000 KE CP0357 Gahanna Creekside Park GA136 $100,000 KF CP0358 Greater Dayton YMCA Community Wellness Campus GA136 $100,000 KG CP0359 Greater Lima Region Park Playground GA136 $100,000 KH CP0360 Greek Cultural Garden of Cleveland Restoration GA136 $100,000 KI CP0361 Heritage Park Bouldering Course GA136 $100,000 KJ CP0362 Hyland Glen Park Improvements GA136 $100,000 KK CP0363 John M Coyne Recreation Center GA136 $100,000 KL CP0364 Kelly Osborne Legacy Trail Improvements GA136 $100,000 KM CP0365 Madison Township Community Park Improvements GA136 $100,000 KN CP0366 Mason Gould Park GA136 $100,000 KO CP0367 Mentor-on-the-Lake Overlook Beach Park Improvements GA136 $100,000 KP CP0368 Miami Township Community Park Playground GA136 $100,000 KQ CP0369 Miami View Park Accessibility Upgrades GA136 $100,000 KR CP0370 Miami View Park Improvements GA136 $100,000 KS CP0371 Milford Pickleball Courts GA136 $100,000 KT CP0372 Mill Creek Restoration Project GA136 $100,000 KU CP0373 Morrow Veterans' Park Restroom GA136 $100,000 KV CP0374 Nature Center Education Pavilion Replacement GA136 $100,000 KW CP0375 North Olmsted Veteran's Memorial GA136 $100,000 KX CP0376 Olmsted Township Greenway Trail GA136 $100,000 KY CP0377 Orange Village Headwaters Preserve GA136 $100,000 KZ CP0378 Ottawa Hills White Field Improvements GA136 $100,000 LA CP0379 Perrysburg Township Park GA136 $100,000 LB CP0380 Pickerington Sycamore Creek Park GA136 $100,000 LC CP0381 Radnor Township Community Park GA136 $100,000 LD CP0382 Seven Hills Community Recreation Center Improvements GA136 $100,000 LE CP0383 Shanes Park Improvements GA136 $100,000 LF CP0384 Shoreland Park Beautification GA136 $100,000 LG CP0385 St. Clairsville Community Center GA136 $100,000 LH CP0386 Streetsboro City Center Park Playground GA136 $100,000 LI CP0387 Union School Park Improvements GA136 $100,000 LJ CP0388 University Circle Wade Oval Project GA136 $100,000 LK CP0389 University Heights Community Park GA136 $100,000 LL CP0390 University Parks Trail Extension GA136 $100,000 LM CP0391 Village of New Knoxville Community Park Improvements GA136 $100,000 LN CP0392 Village of New Richmond Building Restoration Project GA136 $100,000 LO CP0393 Village of West Lafayette Waterworks Park Improvements GA136 $100,000 LP CP0394 Walnut Hills Community Park GA136 $100,000 LQ CP0395 Wapakoneta Veteran's Memorial Park Playground GA136 $100,000 LR CP0396 Wax Park Facility Improvements GA136 $100,000 LS CP0397 Xenia Independence Park Improvements GA136 $100,000 LT CP0398 YMCA of Bucyrus-Tiffin / Bucyrus Facility GA136 $100,000 LU CP0399 Liverpool Township Park Improvements GA136 $90,000 LV CP0400 North Fairfield ADA Restroom Project GA136 $90,000 LW CP0401 Bradfield Community Recreation Center GA136 $86,765 LX CP0402 Ansonia Ballpark Improvements GA136 $85,000 LY CP0403 Delhi Park Tennis Courts GA136 $80,000 LZ CP0404 Friendship Park & Community Center Improvements GA136 $80,000 MA CP0405 Richland Carrousel Park GA136 $80,000 MB CP0406 Crouse Pond Dam Removal and Stream Restoration GA136 $79,520 MC CP0407 Clingman Mountain Bike Skills Loop GA136 $75,000 MD CP0409 Cuyahoga Heights Bacci Park Trail GA136 $75,000 ME CP0410 Jefferson Township Blairwood Park Upgrades GA136 $75,000 MF CP0411 Mounts Park Trailhead Connector GA136 $75,000 MG CP0412 North Industry Park and Recreation Area GA136 $75,000 MH CP0413 Rock Mill Park Improvements GA136 $75,000 MI CP0414 Shelly Park Improvements GA136 $75,000 MJ CP0415 Wadsworth Historic Downtown Upgrades GA136 $75,000 MK CP0416 Hedges Hills Pump Track GA136 $74,000 ML CP0417 Leesburg Township Pickleball Courts GA136 $69,000 MM CP0418 Longwood Park ADA Playground Improvements GA136 $65,000 MN CP0419 West Unity Park Recreational Trail GA136 $65,000 MO CP0420 Carroll County Dog Park GA136 $63,000 MP CP0421 Payne Community Park Accessibility Project GA136 $60,000 MQ CP0422 Steubenville Downtown Green Campus / Park Project GA136 $60,000 MR CP0423 Wadsworth Pedestrian Safety Project GA136 $60,000 MS CP0424 Riverside Memorial Park Pavilion GA136 $58,000 MT CP0425 Creston Park Accessibility Improvements GA136 $57,000 MU CP0426 Greenville Shelter Replacement GA136 $57,000 MV CP0427 Loveland Phillips Park Improvements GA136 $56,800 MW CP0428 Arcanum Community Splash Pad GA136 $53,000 MX CP0429 Alliance Family YMCA Recreation GA136 $50,000 MY CP0430 Auburn Community Park Restroom Facility GA136 $50,000 MZ CP0431 Colonel Higgins Pickleball Court Project GA136 $50,000 NA CP0432 Franklin Township Community Park (Farmer Barger) Improvements GA136 $50,000 NB CP0433 Gnadenhutten Pickleball Court GA136 $50,000 NC CP0434 Ironton Recreation Facility Improvements GA136 $50,000 ND CP0435 James Day Park Improvements GA136 $50,000 NE CP0436 James Day Park Renovation Project GA136 $50,000 NF CP0437 Kathryn Hanlon Park Tennis Court Project GA136 $50,000 NG CP0438 Kettlersville Village Park Improvements GA136 $50,000 NH CP0439 Leroy School Park Restoration GA136 $50,000 NI CP0440 Lincoln Park Trail GA136 $50,000 NJ CP0441 Maria Stein Playground Remodel GA136 $50,000 NK CP0442 Mayfield Village Wiley Park Restrooms GA136 $50,000 NL CP0443 Rotary Park Improvements GA136 $50,000 NM CP0444 Shalersville Township Park Enhancement GA136 $50,000 NN CP0445 Springfield Township Pickleball Project GA136 $50,000 NO CP0446 Stow Bike & Hike Spur Project GA136 $50,000 NP CP0447 Village of Ashley Pocket Park GA136 $50,000 NQ CP0448 Village of Cadiz Park Improvements GA136 $50,000 NR CP0449 Woody Hayes Cabin Park Enhancements GA136 $50,000 NS CP0450 Perry Township Recreation Center GA136 $47,300 NT CP0451 Paint Township Walking Path GA136 $45,540 NU CP0452 Oak Grove Pickle Ball and Recreation Center GA136 $45,000 NV CP0453 Flatrock Park Improvement Project GA136 $37,500 NW CP0454 Lakemore Springfield Lake Point Improvements GA136 $34,965 NX CP0455 Indian Lake Gateway Sign GA136 $30,000 NY CP0456 Deshler Community Pool and Parks Improvements GA136 $29,587 NZ CP0457 Greenville Park Improvements GA136 $25,050 OA CP0458 Rittman Morton Salt Park GA136 $25,000 OB CP0459 Roswell Park Improvements GA136 $25,000 OC CP0460 Westfield Center Village Park Upgrades GA136 $25,000 OD CP0461 Rootstown Community Park & Playground GA136 $23,000 OE CP0462 Storybook Trail Improvements GA136 $20,000 OF CP0463 Village of Alger Park Project GA136 $20,000 OG CP0464 Indian Lake Chippewa Kayak Launch GA136 $17,000 OH CP0465 Community Park Disc Golf Course Improvements GA136 $15,000 OI CP0466 Apple Creek Watershed Flood Control GA136 $14,500 OJ CP0467 City of Kirtland Youth Baseball Project GA136 $13,270 OK CP0468 Roehm Field Reclamation Project GA136 $12,500 OL CP0469 SW Ohio Scout Achievement Center (Dan Beard Council) GA136 $250,000 OM CP0470 Morningside Community Park Development GA136 $125,000 ON CP0471 Urban Promise Community Gym & Rec Facility GA136 $50,000 OO CP0472 Woodland Park Pickleball Court Restoration GA136 $27,500 OP Parks and Recreation Improvement Fund (Fund 7035) Total $328,278,770 OQ TOTAL ALL FUNDS $368,969,958 STATE PARKS RENOVATIONS/UPGRADES Of the foregoing appropriation item C725R3, State Parks Renovations/Upgrades, $1,750,000 shall be used for a police boathouse at Portage Lakes State Park. Of the foregoing appropriation item C725R3, State Parks Renovations/Upgrades, $800,000 shall be used for improvements to East Bank Road at Grand Lake St. Marys State Park. Of the foregoing appropriation item C725R3, State Parks Renovations/Upgrades, $525,000 shall be used for Rocky Fork State Park East Shore Marina lighting and other improvements. Of the foregoing appropriation item C725R3, State Parks Renovations/Upgrades, $350,000 shall be used for the Wolf Run State Park campground and beach improvements. Of the foregoing appropriation item C725R3, State Parks Renovations/Upgrades, $300,000 shall be used for the Buckeye Lake State Park north shore bathroom project. Of the foregoing appropriation item C725R3, State Parks Renovations/Upgrades, $250,000 shall be used for the Appalachian Hills Wildlife Area Archery Range. Of the foregoing appropriation item C725R3, State Parks Renovations/Upgrades, $200,000 shall be used for the Hargus Lake Kayak ramp at A.W. Marion State Park. Section 223.13. FEDERAL REIMBURSEMENT All reimbursements received from the federal government for any expenditures made pursuant to section 223.10 of this act shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the fund from which the expenditure originated. Upon request of the Director of Natural Resources, the Director of Budget and Management shall determine if the reimbursements are necessary to support existing appropriations. If the Director of Budget and Management determines that reimbursements are available to support additional appropriations, the amounts available are hereby appropriated. Section 223.20. For the projects for which appropriations are made in this act from the Parks and Recreation Improvement Fund (Fund 7035), the Department of Natural Resources shall periodically prepare and submit to the Director of Budget and Management the estimated design, planning, and engineering costs of capital-related work to be done by the Department of Natural Resources for each project. Based on the estimates, the Director of Budget and Management may release appropriations from appropriation item C725E6, Project Planning, within Fund 7035, to pay for design, planning, and engineering costs incurred by the Department of Natural Resources for the projects. Upon release of the appropriations by the Director of Budget and Management, the Department of Natural Resources shall pay for these expenses from the Parks Capital Expenses Fund (Fund 2270) and be reimbursed by Fund 7035 using an intrastate voucher. Section 223.30. For the projects for which appropriations are made in this act from the Ohio Parks and Natural Resources Fund (Fund 7031), the Ohio Department of Natural Resources shall periodically prepare and submit to the Director of Budget and Management the estimated design, planning, and engineering costs of capital-related work to be done by the Department of Natural Resources for each project. Based on those estimates, the Director of Budget and Management may release appropriations from appropriation item C725E5, Project Planning, within Fund 7031 to pay for design, planning, and engineering costs incurred by the Department of Natural Resources for the projects. Upon release of the appropriations by the Director of Budget and Management, the Department of Natural Resources shall pay for these expenses from the Capital Expenses Fund (Fund 4S90) and be reimbursed by Fund 7031 using an intrastate voucher. Section 223.40. The Ohio Public Facilities Commission is hereby authorized to issue and sell, in accordance with Section 2l of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, and Chapter 151. and particularly sections 151.01 and 151.05 of the Revised Code, original obligations in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $21,800,000 in addition to the original issuance of obligations heretofore authorized by prior acts of the General Assembly. These authorized obligations shall be issued, subject to applicable constitutional and statutory limitations, as needed to provide sufficient moneys to the credit of the Ohio Parks and Natural Resources Fund (Fund 7031) to pay costs of capital facilities that enhance the use or enjoyment of Ohio's natural resources. Section 223.50. The Treasurer of State is hereby authorized to issue and sell, in accordance with Section 2i of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, and Chapter 154. of the Revised Code, particularly section 154.22, and other applicable sections of the Revised Code, original obligations in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $329,500,000 in addition to the original issuance of obligations heretofore authorized by prior acts of the General Assembly. These authorized obligations shall be issued, subject to applicable constitutional and statutory limitations, as needed to provide sufficient moneys to the credit of the Parks and Recreation Improvement Fund (Fund 7035) to pay the costs of capital facilities for parks and recreation purposes. Section 224.10. 1 2 3 A TAX DEPARTMENT OF TAXATION B Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) C C11001 Enhanced Electronic Filing $24,000,000 D Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $24,000,000 E TOTAL ALL FUNDS $24,000,000 Section 224.15. ENHANCED ELECTRONIC FILING Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary and in addition to Section 409.20 of H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly, if the Director of Budget and Management determines that sufficient cash is available, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer cash from any fund used by the Department of Taxation, except for the General Revenue Fund, to the Ohio Tax System Support Fund for the same purposes as appropriation item C11001, Enhanced Electronic Filing. Such amounts are hereby appropriated. Section 227.10. 1 2 3 A DPS DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY B Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) C C76000 Platform Scales Improvements $250,000 D C76035 Alum Creek Facilities Renovations and Improvements $700,000 E C76036 ODPS Hilltop Complex $4,950,000 F C76044 Patrol District Headquarters Post Renovation and Improvement $5,000,000 G C76045 Ohio State Highway Patrol Academy Renovation and Improvement $500,000 H C76049 EMA Building Renovation and Improvement $1,100,000 I CP0473 Atrium Medical Center Care Flight Project GA136 $200,000 J Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $12,700,000 K TOTAL ALL FUNDS $12,700,000 Section 228.10. 1 2 3 A JSC THE JUDICIARY/SUPREME COURT B Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) C C00502 General Building Renovations $7,087,650 D Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $7,087,650 E TOTAL ALL FUNDS $7,087,650 Section 229.10. 1 2 3 A DRC DEPARTMENT OF REHABILITATION AND CORRECTION B Adult Correctional Building Fund (Fund 7027) C C50101 Community-Based Correctional Facilities $9,322,522 D C50136 General Building Renovation $236,877,478 E CP0474 Morgan County Jail Fire Safety and Booking Area GA136 $200,000 F CP0475 Medina County Jail Platform Safety Project GA136 $100,000 G Adult Correctional Building Fund (Fund 7027) Total $246,500,000 H TOTAL ALL FUNDS $246,500,000 Section 229.25. COMMUNITY-BASED CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES For capital appropriations in this act made from appropriation item C50101, Community-Based Correctional Facilities, the Department of Rehabilitation and Correction shall designate the projects involving the construction and renovation of single-county and district community-based correctional facilities. The Department of Rehabilitation and Correction may review and approve the renovation and construction of projects for which funds are provided. The proceeds of any obligations authorized under this section shall not be applied to any such facilities that are not designated and approved by the Department of Rehabilitation and Correction. The Department of Rehabilitation and Correction shall adopt guidelines to accept and review applications and designate projects. The guidelines shall require the county or counties to justify the need for the facility and to comply with timelines for the submission of documentation pertaining to the site, program, and construction. Section 229.40. The Treasurer of State is hereby authorized to issue and sell, in accordance with Section 2i of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, Chapter 154. of the Revised Code, and other applicable sections of the Revised Code, original obligations in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $232,000,000 in addition to the original issuance of obligations heretofore authorized by prior acts of the General Assembly. These authorized obligations shall be issued, subject to applicable constitutional and statutory limitations, as needed to provide sufficient moneys to the credit of the Adult Correctional Building Fund (Fund 7027) to pay costs of capital facilities for the Department of Rehabilitation and Correction or its functions. Section 231.10. 1 2 3 A DVS DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS SERVICES B Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) C C90085 Veterans' Home Renovation $1,500,000 D Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $1,500,000 E Ohio Veterans' Home Improvement Fund (Fund 6040) F C90075 Sandusky Renovation State $500,000 G Ohio Veterans' Home Improvement Fund (Fund 6040) Total $500,000 H TOTAL ALL FUNDS $2,000,000 Section 233.10. 1 2 3 A DYS DEPARTMENT OF YOUTH SERVICES B Juvenile Correctional Building Fund (Fund 7028) C C47002 General Institutional Renovations $8,042,889 D C47003 Community Rehabilitation Centers $19,300,000 E C47007 Local Juvenile Detention Centers $2,657,111 F Juvenile Correctional Building Fund (Fund 7028) Total $30,000,000 G TOTAL ALL FUNDS $30,000,000 Section 233.20. COMMUNITY REHABILITATION CENTERS For capital appropriations in this act made from appropriation item C47003, Community Rehabilitation Centers, the Department of Youth Services shall designate the projects involving the construction and renovation of single-county and multicounty community corrections facilities. The Department of Youth Services may review and approve the renovation and construction of projects for which funds are provided. The proceeds of any obligations authorized under this section shall not be applied to any such facilities that are not designated and approved by the Department of Youth Services. The Department of Youth Services shall adopt guidelines to accept and review applications and designate projects. The guidelines shall require the county or counties to justify the need for the facility and to comply with timelines for the submission of documentation pertaining to the site, program, and construction. For purposes of this section, "community corrections facilities" has the same meaning as in section 5139.36 of the Revised Code. Section 233.30. LOCAL JUVENILE DETENTION CENTERS For capital appropriations in this act made from appropriation item C47007, Local Juvenile Detention Centers, the Department of Youth Services shall designate the projects involving the construction and renovation of county and multicounty juvenile detention centers. The Department of Youth Services may review and approve the renovation and construction of projects for which funds are provided. The proceeds of any obligations authorized under this section shall not be applied to any such facilities that are not designated by the Department of Youth Services. The Department of Youth Services shall comply with the guidelines set forth in this section, accept and review applications, designate projects, and determine the amount of state match funding to be applied to each project. The department shall, with the advice of the county or counties participating in a project, determine the funded design capacity of the detention centers that are designated to receive funding. Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary contained in Chapter 153. of the Revised Code, the Department of Youth Services may coordinate, review, and monitor the drawdown and use of funds for the renovation and construction of projects for which designated funds are provided. (A) The Department of Youth Services shall develop a formula to determine the amount, if any, of state match that may be provided to a single county or multicounty detention center project. (B) The formula developed by the Department of Youth Services shall yield a percentage of state match ranging from zero to sixty per cent. The funding authorized under this section that may be applied to a construction or renovation project shall not exceed the actual cost of the project. The funding authorized under this section shall not be applied to any project unless the detention center will be built in compliance with health, safety, and security standards for detention centers as established by the Department of Youth Services. In addition, the funding authorized under this section shall not be applied to the renovation of a detention center unless the renovation is for the purpose of increasing the number of beds in the center, or to meet health, safety, or security standards for detention centers as established by the Department of Youth Services. Section 233.40. The Treasurer of State is hereby authorized to issue and sell, in accordance with Section 2i of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, Chapter 154. of the Revised Code, and other applicable sections of the Revised Code, original obligations in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $21,500,000 in addition to the original issuance of obligations heretofore authorized by prior acts of the General Assembly. These authorized obligations shall be issued, subject to applicable constitutional and statutory limitations, as needed to provide sufficient moneys to the credit of the Juvenile Correctional Building Fund (Fund 7028) to pay the costs of capital facilities for the Department of Youth Services or its functions. Section 235.10. 1 2 3 A EXP EXPOSITIONS COMMISSION B Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) C C72305 Facility Improvement and Modernization Plan $10,000,000 D C72312 Emergency Renovations and Equipment Replacement $1,500,000 E C72325 Poultry Barn Upgrades $4,800,000 F C72326 South Commercial Building Upgrades $3,800,000 G C72327 Cox Fine Arts Building Upgrades $4,000,000 H Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $24,100,000 I TOTAL ALL FUNDS $24,100,000 Section 237.10. 1 2 3 A FCC FACILITIES CONSTRUCTION COMMISSION B Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) C C23016 Energy Conservation Projects $3,000,000 D C230E5 State Agency Planning and Assessment $4,000,000 E Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $7,000,000 F Public School Building Fund (Fund 7021) G C23001 Public School Buildings $4,000,000 H Public School Building Fund (Fund 7021) Total $4,000,000 I Cultural and Sports Facilities Building Fund (Fund 7030) J C23027 OHC - Zoar Village Building Restoration $982,000 K C23028 OHC - Basic Renovations and Emergency $4,957,000 L C23032 OHC - Ohio Historical Center Rehabilitation $58,120,342 M C23034 OHC - National Afro-American Museum $1,260,000 N C23057 OHC - On-Line Portal to Ohio's Heritage $5,300,000 O C230C8 OHC - Serpent Mound $1,341,642 P C230D2 OHC - Grant Historical Sites $814,730 Q C230D3 OHC - Johnston Farm and Indian Agency $206,000 R C230D4 OHC - Fort Laurens $2,441,127 S C230EO OHC - Poindexter Village Museum $5,930,000 T C230EP OHC - Fort Meigs $1,154,000 U C230EU OHC - Adena Mansion and Gardens $1,740,000 V C230F1 OHC - Campus Martius Museum $2,884,000 W C230FS OHC - Ohio River Museum $1,825,000 X C230W8 OHC - Cedar Bog $824,000 Y CP0480 The Farmer Music Center GA136 $2,500,000 Z CP0481 Cleveland Museum of Art Campus Renovation GA136 $2,000,000 AA CP0482 Rock & Roll Hall of Fame Renovations GA136 $2,000,000 AB CP0483 Canton Palace Theatre Upgrades GA136 $1,750,000 AC CP0484 CAPA Central Presbyterian GA136 $1,750,000 AD CP0485 Cleveland Orchestra Severance Hall GA136 $1,500,000 AE CP0486 CAPA Ohio Theatre GA136 $1,100,000 AF CP0487 Columbus Museum of Art Improvements GA136 $1,000,000 AG CP0488 Mansfield Playhouse Project GA136 $1,000,000 AH CP0489 Playhouse Square Theater Preservation GA136 $1,000,000 AI CP0490 Sandusky State Theatre Restoration GA136 $1,000,000 AJ CP0491 Blossom Music Center Improvements GA136 $900,000 AK CP0492 Huber Heights Indoor Music Venue GA136 $900,000 AL CP0493 Akron Civic Theatre Roof Replacement Project GA136 $750,000 AM CP0494 Franklin Park Wolfe Palm House GA136 $750,000 AN CP0495 Historic Findlay Market Renovations GA136 $750,000 AO CP0496 Holocaust and Humanity Center Upgrades GA136 $750,000 AP CP0497 Toledo Museum of Art - teamLab GA136 $750,000 AQ CP0498 King Arts Complex Renovations GA136 $650,000 AR CP0499 Canal Winchester Area Historical Society Improvements GA136 $605,000 AS CP0500 Lou and Gib Reese Ice Arena Improvements GA136 $600,000 AT CP0501 Norwalk Theatre Restoration GA136 $600,000 AU CP0502 Strasburg Community Center Amphitheater GA136 $600,000 AV CP0503 Foundry Amphitheatre Improvements GA136 $550,000 AW CP0504 Cincinnati Museum Center "Ohi:yo, Our Home" GA136 $500,000 AX CP0505 Cincinnati Music Hall Revitalization GA136 $500,000 AY CP0506 Huntington Chapel Interior Restoration GA136 $500,000 AZ CP0507 Little Theatre Off Broadway Improvements GA136 $500,000 BA CP0508 Ohio National Road Journey - Exhibit & Building GA136 $500,000 BB CP0509 Secrest Auditorium Renovation GA136 $500,000 BC CP0510 Toledo Valentine Theatre Restoration GA136 $500,000 BD CP0511 Near West Theatre Project GA136 $415,000 BE CP0512 Ariel Opera House GA136 $400,000 BF CP0513 Central Ohio Fire Museum Restoration & Expansion GA136 $400,000 BG CP0514 Cincinnati Public Art Grounds GA136 $400,000 BH CP0515 Ross County Historic Courthouse Restoration GA136 $400,000 BI CP0516 Steubenville Grand Theater Restoration GA136 $400,000 BJ CP0517 Van Wert County Research and Genealogy Center GA136 $400,000 BK CP0518 Dayton Medal of Honor Memorial Honor Park GA136 $350,000 BL CP0519 Mansfield Renaissance Theatre Preservation GA136 $350,000 BM CP0520 Richland Academy of the Arts Renovation GA136 $302,500 BN CP0521 Grand Rapids Townhall Theater GA136 $300,000 BO CP0522 Independence Hemlock Trail Amphitheatre GA136 $300,000 BP CP0523 Morvilius Opera House Restoration GA136 $300,000 BQ CP0524 VOA Bethany Station & Visitor Safety Upgrades GA136 $300,000 BR CP0525 Overfield Tavern Museum Restoration GA136 $275,000 BS CP0526 Medina County McDowell House Museum GA136 $260,000 BT CP0527 Arts in Stark Facility Improvements GA136 $250,750 BU CP0528 Cincinnati Contemporary Arts Building Modernization GA136 $250,000 BV CP0529 Cincinnati Playhouse in the Park Arts Campus GA136 $250,000 BW CP0530 Cincinnati Shakespeare Company GA136 $250,000 BX CP0531 Cleveland Museum of Natural History GA136 $250,000 BY CP0532 Genoa Civic Theatre Improvement Project GA136 $250,000 BZ CP0533 Maltz Museum of Jewish Heritage Gallery Redevelopment and Security Enhancements GA136 $250,000 CA CP0534 McKinley Museum Expansion Project GA136 $250,000 CB CP0535 Medici Museum of Art Infrastructure Project GA136 $250,000 CC CP0536 The Ashland Theatre Building Improvements GA136 $250,000 CD CP0537 Toledo Historic Ohio Theatre Restoration GA136 $250,000 CE CP0538 Western Reserve Historical Society Project GA136 $250,000 CF CP0539 Seiberling House Museum GA136 $247,000 CG CP0540 Garrettsville Curtains Up Theatre Project GA136 $225,000 CH CP0541 Little Cities of Black Diamonds Improvements GA136 $225,000 CI CP0542 Vermilion Town Hall Fine Arts Renovation GA136 $225,000 CJ CP0543 Historic Ada Railroad Depot Rehabilitation GA136 $220,000 CK CP0544 Beck Center Elevator Modernization and Building Improvements GA136 $200,000 CL CP0545 Boonshoft Museum of Discovery GA136 $200,000 CM CP0546 City Hall Events Center and Museum Project GA136 $200,000 CN CP0547 Columbus Symphony Music Center Improvements GA136 $200,000 CO CP0548 Fine Arts Association Building Upgrades GA136 $200,000 CP CP0549 Frank Lloyd Wright's Westcott House GA136 $200,000 CQ CP0550 Hale Farm & Village Restoration Project GA136 $200,000 CR CP0551 Mighty Children's Museum STEAM Expansion GA136 $200,000 CS CP0552 Mound Science and Energy Museum GA136 $200,000 CT CP0553 National First Ladies Library GA136 $200,000 CU CP0554 Preble County Historical Society Collections and Facility Improvements GA136 $200,000 CV CP0555 Regional Gateway - Fallen Officers Memorial GA136 $200,000 CW CP0556 Toledo Live Arts Elevator Project GA136 $200,000 CX CP0557 Wayne Center for the Arts GA136 $200,000 CY CP0558 Zanesville Gateway GA136 $200,000 CZ CP0559 Historic Grafton School Renovation GA136 $195,000 DA CP0560 Amherst Patriots Park Memorial Project GA136 $160,000 DB CP0561 Ritz Theatre GA136 $160,000 DC CP0562 Scioto County Heritage Museum Renovation GA136 $152,000 DD CP0563 Adams County Heritage Museum GA136 $150,000 DE CP0564 Barnesville State Theater GA136 $150,000 DF CP0565 Brown County Historical District Parking Lot GA136 $150,000 DG CP0566 Collingwood Arts Center Roof Project GA136 $150,000 DH CP0567 Collingwood Arts Center Window Project GA136 $150,000 DI CP0568 Fairfield Town Center Parking Structure GA136 $150,000 DJ CP0569 Imagination Station Improvements GA136 $150,000 DK CP0570 Imagination Station: Wonder of Water (That's a WOW) GA136 $150,000 DL CP0571 Lake Erie Nature and Science Wildlife Gardens GA136 $150,000 DM CP0572 Lyndhurst Community Amphitheater GA136 $150,000 DN CP0573 Marietta East Muskingum Park Improvements GA136 $150,000 DO CP0574 Perry County Opera House Restoration GA136 $150,000 DP CP0575 Strand Theatre GA136 $150,000 DQ CP0576 Trumbull County Museum of Science Fiction & Fantasy Arts GA136 $150,000 DR CP0577 Twin City Opera House Restoration GA136 $150,000 DS CP0578 Fayette County Museum Restoration GA136 $145,117 DT CP0579 Center for Print & Collaborative Arts Improvements GA136 $125,000 DU CP0580 Deerfield Township Jeremiah Morrow Barn Upgrades GA136 $125,000 DV CP0581 Funk Music Hall of Fame & Exhibition Center GA136 $125,000 DW CP0582 Green Lawn Abbey Preservation Association GA136 $125,000 DX CP0583 Memorial Hall Improvements GA136 $125,000 DY CP0584 Old Community Hall Renovations GA136 $125,000 DZ CP0585 Rush Township Veteran Memorial Project GA136 $121,000 EA CP0586 Strand Theatre Improvements GA136 $121,000 EB CP0587 Hayes Presidential Library Project GA136 $110,000 EC CP0588 Arcanum Opera House Restoration GA136 $100,000 ED CP0589 Arts and Education Hub Upgrades GA136 $100,000 EE CP0590 Artscape Lebanon Community Arts Center GA136 $100,000 EF CP0591 Athens History Center Improvements GA136 $100,000 EG CP0592 Belmont Park Cemetery Restoration GA136 $100,000 EH CP0593 Bradford Ohio Railroad Museum Exhibit Expansion GA136 $100,000 EI CP0594 Brown County Court House Facility Improvements GA136 $100,000 EJ CP0595 Cincinnati Observatory Improvements GA136 $100,000 EK CP0596 Cleveland Institute of Art Interactive Media Lab GA136 $100,000 EL CP0597 Dayton Woman's Club Improvements GA136 $100,000 EM CP0598 Ensemble Theatre Cincinnati GA136 $100,000 EN CP0599 Germantown Historical Society Restoration GA136 $100,000 EO CP0600 Great Lakes Science Center Project GA136 $100,000 EP CP0601 Greater Lima Region Park & Amphitheater Concession Stand GA136 $100,000 EQ CP0602 Greene County Veterans Memorial GA136 $100,000 ER CP0603 Historic Milford Promont Museum Preservation Project GA136 $100,000 ES CP0604 Historic Renovation of High Road Gallery GA136 $100,000 ET CP0605 Historic St. Marys Theatre Improvements GA136 $100,000 EU CP0606 Hunting Valley Gray Barns Restoration Project GA136 $100,000 EV CP0607 James Denver Preservation Project GA136 $100,000 EW CP0608 Johnny Appleseed Education Center and Museum Facility Improvements GA136 $100,000 EX CP0609 Lima Schoonover Observatory Improvements GA136 $100,000 EY CP0610 Logan County Holland Theatre Renovation GA136 $100,000 EZ CP0611 Middleburg Heights Old District 10 Schoolhouse Renovation GA136 $100,000 FA CP0612 Neustra Gente Community Center Improvements GA136 $100,000 FB CP0613 Newark Midland Theatre Upgrades GA136 $100,000 FC CP0614 Restore Oxford Community Arts Center GA136 $100,000 FD CP0615 Salem Community Theatre Seating Replacement Project GA136 $100,000 FE CP0616 Short North Stage Garden Theater Renovation GA136 $100,000 FF CP0617 Star Marquis Improvements GA136 $100,000 FG CP0618 Stuart’s Opera House Improvements GA136 $100,000 FH CP0619 Toledo Arts Commission Community Space GA136 $100,000 FI CP0620 VanWert Civic Theatre Project GA136 $100,000 FJ CP0621 Wadsworth Woodlawn Cemetery Restoration GA136 $100,000 FK CP0622 Wagnalls Memorial Arts Culture Improvements GA136 $100,000 FL CP0623 Willard Veteran's Park Memorial GA136 $100,000 FM CP0624 Reeves Museum Outdoor Restorations GA136 $97,000 FN CP0625 Waterville Historical Society Parking Lot GA136 $85,000 FO CP0626 Ohio Glass Museum Improvements GA136 $76,000 FP CP0627 Art's Castle Improvements GA136 $75,000 FQ CP0628 Early Ohio Governors' Monuments Project GA136 $75,000 FR CP0629 Fairmount Center for the Arts GA136 $75,000 FS CP0630 Historic Lichtenwalter Schoolhouse Upgrades GA136 $75,000 FT CP0631 Learning Tree Farm Upgrades GA136 $75,000 FU CP0632 North Olmsted Old Town Hall Renovation GA136 $75,000 FV CP0633 Orange Village Community Amphitheater GA136 $75,000 FW CP0634 Wayne County Memorial Plaza Improvements GA136 $75,000 FX CP0635 Wilson Bruce Evans Historical Project GA136 $75,000 FY CP0636 Oakwood Historic Cemetery Preservation GA136 $70,000 FZ CP0637 Logan Center for Creative Learning GA136 $68,300 GA CP0638 Scott House Improvements GA136 $68,000 GB CP0639 Bethel Historical Museum HVAC GA136 $66,000 GC CP0640 Holmes County Historical Society Victorian House GA136 $65,000 GD CP0641 Historic One Room Chippewa School Renovations GA136 $63,000 GE CP0642 Meadowbrook Park Historic Ballroom Renovation GA136 $60,000 GF CP0643 North Ridgeville Fire Museum Restoration GA136 $56,000 GG CP0644 African Town Plaza GA136 $50,000 GH CP0645 Allen Township Historical Projects GA136 $50,000 GI CP0647 Bridge to the Past - Art Display GA136 $50,000 GJ CP0648 Carnegie Center Roof Replacement GA136 $50,000 GK CP0649 Children's Museum of Findlay Improvements GA136 $50,000 GL CP0650 Cleveland's Historic Shaker Square Improvements GA136 $50,000 GM CP0651 Darke County Motorsports Tourism Project GA136 $50,000 GN CP0652 Darl Center for the Arts Improvements GA136 $50,000 GO CP0653 Fostoria Historic Cemetery Restoration Project GA136 $50,000 GP CP0654 Gammon House Interpretive Center GA136 $50,000 GQ CP0655 Historic Woodhill Cemetery Improvements GA136 $50,000 GR CP0656 Little Theatre of Tuscarawas County Facility Improvements GA136 $50,000 GS CP0657 Metzger Park Amphitheater GA136 $50,000 GT CP0658 Mt Oval Historic House and Farm Project GA136 $50,000 GU CP0659 Richfield Joint Recreation Project GA136 $50,000 GV CP0660 Smithville Community Historical Church of God Restoration GA136 $50,000 GW CP0661 Ball-Caldwell Historic Home Renovations GA136 $45,000 GX CP0662 Case-Barlow Farm Barn Improvement: Fire Suppression System GA136 $41,000 GY CP0663 Amherst Quarry Museum GA136 $40,000 GZ CP0664 Convoy Opera House Roof and Annex GA136 $40,000 HA CP0665 The Walhonding Valley Historical Society Building Improvements GA136 $40,000 HB CP0666 Finnish Heritage Museum Elevator GA136 $39,000 HC CP0667 St. Marys Veterans Foundation and Museum of St. Marys GA136 $33,000 HD CP0668 1893 Genoa One Room School Restoration GA136 $25,000 HE CP0669 Lions Lincoln Theatre GA136 $25,000 HF CP0670 Navarre-Bethlehem Historical Society Improvements GA136 $22,200 HG CP0671 Delhi Historic Farmhouse Improvements GA136 $20,000 HH CP0672 Dobama Theatre Improvements GA136 $18,000 HI CP0673 Werner Inn Exterior Door Replacement GA136 $13,000 HJ CP0674 SS Tuttle House Renovation GA136 $11,000 HK CP0675 Anchorage House Museum Improvements GA136 $10,000 HL CP0676 Darke County Historic #19 Schoolhouse Restoration GA136 $10,000 HM CP0677 Castle Museum Improvements GA136 $9,000 HN CP0678 Copas Cemetery Fence Replacement Project GA136 $6,500 HO Cultural and Sports Facilities Building Fund (Fund 7030) Total $142,191,208 HP School Building Program Assistance Fund (Fund 7032) HQ C23002 School Building Program Assistance $600,000,000 HR School Building Program Assistance Fund (Fund 7032) Total $600,000,000 HS TOTAL ALL FUNDS $753,191,208 Section 237.11. ENERGY CONSERVATION PROJECTS The foregoing appropriation item C23016, Energy Conservation Projects, shall be used to perform energy conservation renovations, including the United States Environmental Protection Agency's Energy Star Program, in state-owned facilities. Prior to the release of funds for renovation, state agencies shall have performed a comprehensive energy audit for each project. The Facilities Construction Commission shall review and approve proposals from state agencies to use these funds for energy conservation. Public school districts and state-supported and state-assisted institutions of higher education are not eligible for funding from this item. STATE AGENCY PLANNING AND ASSESSMENT Capital appropriations in this act made from appropriation item C230E5, State Agency Planning and Assessment, shall be used by the Facilities Construction Commission to provide assistance to any state agency for assessment, capital planning, and maintenance management. Section 237.15. SCHOOL BUILDING PROGRAM ASSISTANCE Capital appropriations in this act made from appropriation item C23002, School Building Program Assistance, shall be used by the Facilities Construction Commission to provide funding to school districts that receive conditional approval from the Commission pursuant to Chapter 3318. of the Revised Code. Section 237.20. The Treasurer of State is hereby authorized to issue and sell, in accordance with Section 2i of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, Chapter 154. of the Revised Code, and particularly section 154.23 and other applicable sections of the Revised Code, original obligations in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $138,000,000 in addition to the original issuance of obligations heretofore authorized by prior acts of the General Assembly. These authorized obligations shall be issued, subject to applicable constitutional and statutory limitations, as needed to provide sufficient moneys to the credit of the Cultural and Sports Facilities Building Fund (Fund 7030) to pay costs of capital facilities for Ohio cultural facilities and Ohio sports facilities. Section 237.30. The Ohio Public Facilities Commission is hereby authorized to issue and sell, in accordance with Section 2n of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, and Chapter 151. and particularly sections 151.01 and 151.03 of the Revised Code, original obligations in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $542,500,000 in addition to the original issuance of obligations heretofore authorized by prior acts of the General Assembly. These authorized obligations shall be issued, subject to applicable constitutional and statutory limitations, as needed to provide sufficient moneys to the credit of the School Building Program Assistance Fund (Fund 7032) to pay the state share of the costs of constructing classroom facilities pursuant to Chapter 3318. of the Revised Code. Section 243.10. 1 2 3 A PWC PUBLIC WORKS COMMISSION B Clean Ohio Conservation Fund (Fund 7056) C C15060 Clean Ohio Conservation $75,000,000 D Clean Ohio Conservation Fund (Fund 7056) Total $75,000,000 E State Capital Improvements Fund (Fund 7038) F C15000 Local Public Infrastructure/State CIP $510,000,000 G State Capital Improvements Fund (Fund 7038) Total $510,000,000 H State Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Fund (Fund 7040) I C15030 Revolving Loan $135,000,000 J State Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Fund (Fund 7040) Total $135,000,000 K TOTAL ALL FUNDS $720,000,000 Section 243.15. LOCAL PUBLIC INFRASTRUCTURE (A)(1) Capital appropriations in this act made from the State Capital Improvements Fund (Fund 7038) shall be used in accordance with sections 164.01 to 164.12 of the Revised Code. The Director of the Public Works Commission may certify to the Director of Budget and Management that a need exists to appropriate investment earnings to be used in accordance with sections 164.01 to 164.12 of the Revised Code. If the Director of Budget and Management determines pursuant to division (D) of section 164.08 and section 164.12 of the Revised Code that investment earnings are available to support additional appropriations, such amounts are hereby appropriated. (2) If the Public Works Commission receives refunds due to project overpayments that are discovered during a post-project audit, the Director of the Public Works Commission may certify to the Director of Budget and Management that refunds have been received. In certifying the refunds, the Director of the Public Works Commission shall provide the Director of Budget and Management information on the project refunds. The certification shall detail by project the source and amount of project overpayments received and include any supporting documentation required or requested by the Director of Budget and Management. Upon receipt of the certification, the Director of Budget and Management shall determine if the project refunds are necessary to support existing appropriations. If the project refunds are available to support additional appropriations, these amounts are hereby appropriated to appropriation item C15000, Local Public Infrastructure/State CIP. (B) Notwithstanding division (B) of section 164.08 of the Revised Code, of the foregoing appropriation item C15000, Local Public Infrastructure, $10,000,000 shall be used to support emergency improvements of infrastructure including roads, bridges, water systems, and storm sewers in the City of East Cleveland. STATE CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM - SMALL GOVERNMENTS Of the foregoing appropriation item C15000, Local Public Infrastructure/State CIP, up to $10,000,000 in each fiscal year of the biennium shall be used for State Capital Improvement Program (SCIP) projects, in accordance with division (B)(1) of section 164.08 of the Revised Code, in townships with populations of less than five thousand persons within their unincorporated areas. REVOLVING LOAN Capital appropriations in this act made from the State Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Fund (Fund 7040) shall be used in accordance with sections 164.01 to 164.12 of the Revised Code. If the Public Works Commission receives refunds due to project overpayments that are discovered during a post-project audit, the Director of the Public Works Commission may certify to the Director of Budget and Management that refunds have been received. In certifying the refunds, the Director of the Public Works Commission shall provide the Director of Budget and Management information on the project refunds. The certification shall detail by project the source and amount of project overpayments received and include any supporting documentation required or requested by the Director of Budget and Management. Upon receipt of the certification, the Director of Budget and Management shall determine if the project refunds are necessary to support existing appropriations. If the project refunds are available to support additional appropriations, these amounts are hereby appropriated to appropriation item C15030, Revolving Loan. CLEAN OHIO CONSERVATION GRANT REPAYMENTS Capital appropriations in this act made from the Clean Ohio Conservation Fund (Fund 7056) shall be used in accordance with sections 164.20 to 164.27 of the Revised Code. Any amount in grant repayments received by the Public Works Commission and deposited into the Clean Ohio Conservation Fund pursuant to section 164.261 of the Revised Code is hereby appropriated through the foregoing appropriation item C15060, Clean Ohio Conservation. Section 243.20. The Ohio Public Facilities Commission is hereby authorized to issue and sell, in accordance with Sections 2p, 2s, and 2t of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, and Chapter 151. and particularly sections 151.01 and 151.08 of the Revised Code, original obligations, in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $700,000,000 in addition to the original obligations heretofore authorized by prior acts of the General Assembly. These authorized obligations shall be issued, subject to applicable constitutional and statutory limitations, as needed to provide sufficient moneys to the credit of the State Capital Improvements Fund (Fund 7038) to pay costs of capital improvement projects of local subdivisions. Section 243.30. The Ohio Public Facilities Commission is hereby authorized to issue and sell, in accordance with Sections 2o and 2q of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, and Chapter 151. and particularly sections 151.01 and 151.09 of the Revised Code, original obligations of the state in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $100,000,000 in addition to the original issuance of obligations heretofore authorized by prior acts of the General Assembly. These authorized obligations shall be issued, subject to applicable constitutional and statutory limitations, as needed to provide sufficient moneys to the credit of the Clean Ohio Conservation Fund (Fund 7056), the Clean Ohio Agricultural Easement Fund (Fund 7057), and the Clean Ohio Trail Fund (Fund 7061) to pay costs of conservation projects. Section 245.10. 1 2 3 A OSB DEAF AND BLIND EDUCATION SERVICES B Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) C C22616 Renovations and Improvements $3,191,000 D C22628 Demolish Old Campus Building $309,000 E C22631 Campus Connector $10,100,000 F Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $13,600,000 G TOTAL ALL FUNDS $13,600,000 Section 509.01. CERTIFICATION OF AVAILABILITY OF MONEYS Moneys that require release shall not be expended from any appropriation contained in this act without certification of the Director of Budget and Management that there are sufficient moneys in the state treasury in the fund from which the appropriation is made. Such certification made by the Office of Budget and Management shall be based on estimates of revenue, receipts, and expenses. Nothing in this section limits the authority of the Director of Budget and Management granted in section 126.07 of the Revised Code. Section 509.02. LIMITATION ON USE OF CAPITAL APPROPRIATIONS The appropriations made in this act, excluding those made from the State Capital Improvement Fund (Fund 7038) and the State Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Fund (Fund 7040) for buildings or structures, including remodeling and renovations, are limited to: (A) Acquisition of real property or interests in real property; (B) Buildings and structures, which includes construction, demolition, complete heating and cooling, lighting, and lighting fixtures, and all necessary utilities, ventilating, plumbing, sprinkler, and water and sewer systems, when such systems are authorized or necessary; (C) Architectural, engineering, and professional services expenses directly related to the projects; (D) Machinery that is necessary to the operation or function of the building or structure at the time of initial acquisition or construction; (E) Acquisition, development, and deployment of new computer systems, including the integration of existing and new computer systems, but excluding regular or ongoing maintenance or support agreements; (F) Furniture, fixtures, or equipment that meets all the following criteria: (1) Is essential in bringing the facility up to its intended use or is necessary for the functioning of the particular facility or project; (2) Has a unit cost of about $100 or more; (3) Has a useful life of five years or more. Furniture, fixtures, or equipment that is not an integral part of or directly related to the basic purpose or function of a project for which moneys are appropriated shall not be paid for from these appropriations. This paragraph does not apply to appropriation line items specifically for furniture, fixtures, or equipment. Section 509.03. CONTINGENCY RESERVE REQUIREMENT Any request for release of capital appropriations by the Director of Budget and Management or the Controlling Board for projects, the contracts for which are awarded by the Ohio Facilities Construction Commission, shall contain a contingency reserve, the amount of which shall be determined by the Ohio Facilities Construction Commission, for payment of unanticipated project expenses. Any amount deducted from the encumbrance for a contractor's contract as an assessment for liquidated damages shall be added to the encumbrance for the contingency reserve. Contingency reserve funds shall be used to pay costs resulting from unanticipated job conditions, to comply with rulings regarding building and other codes, to pay costs related to errors or omissions in contract documents, to pay costs associated with changes in the scope of work, and to pay the cost of settlements and judgments related to the project. Any funds remaining upon completion of a project may, upon approval of the Controlling Board, be released for the use of the institution to which the appropriation was made for another capital facilities project or projects. Section 509.04. SATISFACTION OF JUDGMENTS AND SETTLEMENTS AGAINST THE STATE Except as otherwise provided in this section, an appropriation contained in this act or in any other act may be used for the purpose of satisfying judgments, settlements, or administrative awards ordered or approved by the Court of Claims or by any other court of competent jurisdiction in connection with civil actions against the state. This authorization does not apply to appropriations that are to be applied to or used for payment of guarantees by or on behalf of the state or for payments under lease agreements relating to or debt service on bonds, notes, or other obligations of the state. Notwithstanding any other section of law to the contrary, this authorization includes appropriations from funds into which proceeds or direct obligations of the state are deposited only to the extent that the judgment, settlement, or administrative award is for or represents capital costs for which the appropriation may otherwise be used and is consistent with the purpose for which any related obligations were issued or entered into. Nothing contained in this section is intended to subject the state to suit in any forum in which it is not otherwise subject to suit, nor is it intended to waive or compromise any defense or right available to the state in any suit against it. Section 509.05. CAPITAL RELEASES BY THE DIRECTOR OF BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT Notwithstanding section 126.14 of the Revised Code, appropriations for appropriation items C50100, Local Jails, and C50101, Community-Based Correctional Facilities, appropriated from the Adult Correctional Building Fund (Fund 7027) to the Department of Rehabilitation and Correction, and any projects specifically identified for appropriation item C58050, Community Support, shall be released upon the written approval of the Director of Budget and Management. The appropriations from the Public School Building Fund (Fund 7021) and the School Building Program Assistance Fund (Fund 7032) to the Facilities Construction Commission, from the Transportation Building Fund (Fund 7029) to the Department of Transportation, from the Clean Ohio Conservation Fund (Fund 7056), the State Capital Improvement Fund (Fund 7038), and the State Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Fund (Fund 7040) to the Public Works Commission, and from the Underground Parking Garage Operating Fund (Fund 2080) to the Capitol Square Review and Advisory Board shall be released upon presentation of a request to release the funds, by the agency to which the appropriation has been made, to the Director of Budget and Management. Section 509.06. PREVAILING WAGE REQUIREMENT Except as provided in section 4115.04 of the Revised Code, moneys appropriated or reappropriated by the 136th General Assembly shall not be used for the construction of public improvements, as defined in section 4115.03 of the Revised Code, unless the mechanics, laborers, or workers engaged therein are paid the prevailing rate of wages prescribed in section 4115.04 of the Revised Code. Nothing in this section affects the wages and salaries established for state employees under Chapter 124. of the Revised Code, or collective bargaining agreements entered into by the state under Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code, while engaged on force account work, nor does this section interfere with the use of inmate and patient labor by the state. Section 509.07. AUTHORIZATION OF THE DIRECTOR OF BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT The Director of Budget and Management shall authorize both of the following: (A) The initial release of moneys for projects from the funds into which proceeds of direct obligations of the state are deposited; (B) The expenditure or encumbrance of moneys from funds into which proceeds of direct obligations are deposited, only after determining to the Director's satisfaction that either of the following applies: (1) The application of such moneys to the particular project will not negatively affect any exclusion of the interest or interest equivalent on obligations issued to provide moneys to the particular fund from the calculation of gross income for federal income tax purposes under the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 26 U.S.C. 1, as amended. (2) Moneys for the project will come from the proceeds of federally taxable obligations, the interest on which is not so excluded from the calculation of gross income for federal income tax purposes and which have been authorized and issued on that basis by their issuing authority. In the event the Director determines that the condition set forth in division (B)(1) of this section does not apply, and that there is no existing fund in the state treasury to enable compliance with the condition set forth in division (B)(2) of this section, the Director may create a fund in the state treasury for the purpose of receiving proceeds of federally taxable obligations. The Director may establish capital appropriation items in that taxable bond fund that correspond to the preexisting capital appropriation items in the associated tax-exempt bond fund. The Director also may transfer capital appropriations in whole or in part between the taxable and tax-exempt bond funds within a particular purpose for which the bonds have been authorized. Section 509.08. ACCOUNTING MAINTENANCE BY THE DIRECTOR OF BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT Within the limits set forth in this act, the Director of Budget and Management shall establish accounts indicating the source and amount of funds for each appropriation made in this act, and shall determine the form and manner in which appropriation accounts shall be maintained in accordance with section 126.21 of the Revised Code. Section 509.11. REQUIREMENTS RELATING TO NONSTATE OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN FINANCED PROJECTS (A) No capital improvement appropriations made in this act shall be released for planning or for improvement, renovation, or construction or acquisition of capital facilities if a state agency, as defined in section 154.01 of the Revised Code, does not own the real property that constitutes the capital facilities or on which the capital facilities are or will be located unless provided for elsewhere in this act. This restriction does not apply in any of the following circumstances: (1) The state agency has a long-term (at least as long as the obligations that financed the project) lease of, or other interest (such as an easement) in, the real property. (2) In the case of an appropriation for capital facilities that, because of their unique nature or location, will be owned or be part of facilities owned by a separate nonprofit organization and made available to the state agency for its use or benefit, the nonprofit organization either owns or has a long-term lease of the real property or other capital facility to be improved, renovated, constructed, or acquired and has entered into a joint or cooperative use agreement, with and approved by the state agency that meets the requirements of division (B) of this section. (B) In the case of capital facilities referred to in division (A)(2) of this section, the joint or cooperative use agreement shall include, as a minimum, provisions that: (1) Specify the extent and nature of that joint or cooperative use, extending for not shorter than the length of the obligations that financed the project, with the value of such use or right to use to be, as determined by the parties and approved by the approving department, reasonably related to the amount of the appropriation; (2) Provide for pro rata reimbursement to the state should the arrangement for joint or cooperative use by a state agency be terminated; (3) Provide that procedures to be followed during the capital improvement process will comply with appropriate applicable state statutes and rules, including the provisions of this act. (C) This section does not apply to appropriations from the State Capital Improvements Fund (Fund 7038), State Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Fund (Fund 7040), Clean Ohio Conservation Fund (Fund 7056), Clean Ohio Revitalization Fund (Fund 7003), the Service Station Cleanup Fund (Fund 7100), or the School Building Program Assistance Fund (Fund 7032). Section 518.10. OBLIGATIONS ISSUED UNDER CHAPTER 151. OF THE REVISED CODE The capital improvements for which appropriations are made in this act from the Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024), the Ohio Parks and Natural Resources Fund (Fund 7031), the School Building Program Assistance Fund (Fund 7032), the Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034), the State Capital Improvements Fund (Fund 7038), the State Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Fund (Fund 7040), the Coal Research and Development Fund (Fund 7046), the Clean Ohio Conservation Fund (Fund 7056), the Clean Ohio Agricultural Easement Fund (Fund 7057), and the Clean Ohio Trail Fund (Fund 7061) are determined to be capital improvements and capital facilities for natural resources, a statewide system of common schools, state-supported and state-assisted institutions of higher education, local subdivision capital improvement projects, coal research and development projects, and conservation purposes (under the Clean Ohio Program) and are designated as capital facilities to which proceeds of obligations issued under Chapter 151. of the Revised Code are to be applied. Section 518.20. OBLIGATIONS ISSUED UNDER CHAPTER 154. OF THE REVISED CODE The capital improvements for which appropriations are made in this act from the Administrative Building Taxable Bond Fund (Fund 7016), the Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026), the Adult Correctional Building Fund (Fund 7027), the Juvenile Correctional Building Fund (Fund 7028), the Transportation Building Fund (Fund 7029), the Cultural and Sports Facilities Building Fund (Fund 7030), the Mental Health Facilities Improvement Fund (Fund 7033), and the Parks and Recreation Improvement Fund (Fund 7035) are determined to be capital improvements and capital facilities for housing state agencies and branches of government, mental health and developmental disabilities, and parks and recreation and are designated as capital facilities to which proceeds of obligations issued under Chapter 154. of the Revised Code are to be applied. Section 523.10. TRANSFER OF OPEN ENCUMBRANCES Upon the request of the agency to which a capital project appropriation item is appropriated, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer open encumbrance amounts between separate encumbrances for the project appropriation item to the extent that any reductions in encumbrances are agreed to by the contracting vendor and the agency. Section 525.10. LITIGATION PROCEEDS TO THE ADMINISTRATIVE BUILDING FUND Except as otherwise required by section 109.112 of the Revised Code, any proceeds received by the state as the result of litigation or a settlement agreement related to any liability for the planning, design, engineering, construction, or constructed management of facilities operated by the Department of Administrative Services shall be deposited into the General Revenue Fund or the Building Improvement Fund (Fund 5KZ0). Section 527.10. TRANSFERS FROM THE CLEAN OHIO REVITALIZATION FUND TO THE SERVICE STATION CLEANUP FUND During the biennium ending June 30, 2028, the Director of Budget and Management, at the request of the Director of Development, may transfer up to the remaining unobligated cash balance from the Clean Ohio Revitalization Fund (Fund 7003) to the Service Station Cleanup Fund (Fund 7100) as needed to provide for Service Station Cleanup grants awarded by the Director of Development. Section 610.10. That Sections 357.09, 357.15, 357.16, 357.24, 357.28, 357.34, 357.36, 371.10, 371.20, 373.10, 373.15, 387.10, and 387.13 of H.B. 730 of the 136th General Assembly be amended to read as follows: Sec. 357.09. 1 2 3 A CTI COLUMBUS STATE COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C38420 Technology Upgrades $48,507 E C38425 Workforce Based Training and Equipment $12,123 F C38428 Business Technologies School $30,008 G C38435 Student Success Renovations $15,000,000 H C38436 Building Repairs $205,850 I C38437 Building Infrastructure Repairs $9,000,000 J C38439 Academic/Student Space Upgrades $119,164 K C38440 Delaware Entrepreneurial Center Ohio Wesleyan $12,182 L C38453 Campus Safety Grant Program $27,835 M C38455 Girl Scouts of Ohio's Heartland STEM and Leadership Immersion Campus $1,500,000 N C38459 Van Buren Center Essential Renovation $500,000 O C38462 CRIS Facilities $40,000 P Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $26,495,669 Q Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) R C38451 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $39,203 S C38463 Gravity Project Phase 2 - Taxable $575,000 T C38464 Rickenbacker Area Mobility Center - Taxable $1,000,000 U C38467 Jewish Family Services Technology Hub for Workforce Advancement - Taxable $125,000 V Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $1,739,203 $1,164,203 W TOTAL ALL FUNDS $28,234,872 $27,659,872 STUDENT SUCCESS RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C38435, Student Success Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C38435, Student Success Renovations, plus up to $5,000. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Columbus State Community College shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $5,000 from appropriation item C38435, Student Success Renovations. BUILDING INFRASTRUCTURE REPAIRS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C38437, Building Infrastructure Repairs, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C38437, Building Infrastructure Repairs, plus up to $266,958. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Columbus State Community College shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $266,958 from appropriation item C38437, Building Infrastructure Repairs. Sec. 357.15. 1 2 3 A KSU KENT STATE UNIVERSITY B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C27079 Blossom Music Center $3,800,000 E C270F3 Severance Hall $3,850,000 F C270H2 Founders Hall HVAC Upgrades - Tuscarawas $163,098 G C270I5 White Hall Rehabilitation - Kent $561,261 H C270K3 Critical Deferred Maintenance - Kent $1,604,183 I C270K4 Campus ADA Improvements - Kent $272,993 J C270K7 Nursing Skills Lab Renovation - Geauga $83,672 K C270K9 Rockwell Hall Renovation and Expansion - Kent $45,000 L C270L5 Garfield Zimmerman Home $250,000 M C270L8 Blossom Music Center Improvements $2,400,000 N C270M1 Severance Hall $800,000 O C270M4 Campus Safety Grant Program $500,000 P C270M9 Library - Theater Building Roof Replacement - Trumbull $90,259 Q C270N1 Main Classroom Rooftop Unit Replacement Phase I - Salem $196,098 R C270N2 IT Network Access Enhancement in Academic Buildings - Kent $1,260,506 S C270N5 Severance Music Center $500,000 T C270O3 Purinton Hall Renovations - East Liverpool $300,000 U C270O5 University Library Tower Renovations and Elevator Modernization - Kent $4,500,000 V C270O6 Elevator Modernizations for Accessibility - Kent $3,000,000 W C270O7 Central Chiller Plant Replacement - Stark $652,392 X C270O9 Main Hall Entrance Renovation - Ashtabula $163,098 Y C270P5 Blossom Music Center $1,050,000 Z C270P6 Porthouse Theater Improvements $147,300 AA Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $26,189,860 $25,939,860 AB Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) AC C270H6 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $277,147 AD C270O4 Classroom Building Renovations - East Liverpool - Taxable $8,664 AE C270P3 Cunningham Hall Deferred Maintenance Phase II - Kent - Taxable $80,712 AF C270P7 Ashland County Airport Authority Terminal and Flight School Project - Taxable $150,000 AG C270P8 TRAM Innovation Center - Taxable $800,000 AH Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $1,316,523 AI TOTAL ALL FUNDS $27,506,383 $27,256,383 CRITICAL DEFERRED MAINTENANCE - KENT The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C270K3, Critical Deferred Maintenance - Kent, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C270K3, Critical Deferred Maintenance - Kent, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C270G3, Fire Alarm System Replacements, plus up to $5,106. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Kent State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $5,106 from appropriation item C270I4, Henderson Hall HVAC and ADA Improvements. MAIN CLASSROOM ROOFTOP UNIT REPLACEMENT PHASE I - SALEM The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C270N1, Main Classroom Rooftop Unit Replacement Phase I - Salem, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C270N1, Main Classroom Rooftop Unit Replacement Phase I - Salem, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C270K6, Classroom 127 Renovation/Electrical System Upgrades - Salem. PURINTON HALL RENOVATIONS - EAST LIVERPOOL The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C270O3, Purinton Hall Renovations - East Liverpool, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C270O3, Purinton Hall Renovations - East Liverpool, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C27003, Classroom Building Renovations - East Liverpool. MAIN HALL ENTRANCE RENOVATION - ASHTABULA The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C270O9, Main Hall Entrance Renovation - Ashtabula, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C270O9, Main Hall Entrance Renovation - Ashtabula, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C270I7, Library Asbestos Abatement and Restroom Installation - Ashtabula. Sec. 357.16. 1 2 3 A LCC LAKELAND COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C37900 Basic Renovations $447,217 E C37928 Campus Safety Grant Program $197,741 F C37935 Mechanic Infrastructure Replacement $693,537 G C37936 Electric Infrastructure Replacement $88,925 H CP0804 Equine Veterinary and Rehabilitation Facility GA136 $250,000 I Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $1,427,420 $1,677,420 J Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) K C37927 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $164,157 L Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $164,157 M TOTAL ALL FUNDS $1,591,577 $1,841,577 BASIC RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C37900, Basic Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C37900, Basic Renovations, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C37919, Engineering Building Renovations. EQUINE VETERINARY AND REHABILITATION FACILITY The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item CP0804, Equine Veterinary and Rehabilitation Facility GA136, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C58050, Community Support, earmarked for Cedar Hills Transformation Camp. Sec. 357.24. 1 2 3 A OHU OHIO UNIVERSITY B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C30025 Southeast Library Warehouse $171,298 E C30075 Infrastructure Improvements $69,559 F C30136 Building Envelope Restorations $224,061 G C30157 Building and Safety System Improvements $148,471 H C30158 Academic Space Renewal $1,095,510 I C30162 Lancaster Building/Infrastructure Renewal $25,075 J C30163 Southern Building/Infrastructure Renewal $15,300 K C30164 Building Interior Improvements - Regional Campuses $5,000 L C30169 CWRU Health Education Campus $1,000,000 M C30171 Campus Infrastructure Improvements - Regional Campuses $601,670 N C30179 Building Exterior Improvements - Regional Campuses $40,700 O C30181 Lancaster Festival Upgrades $100,000 P C30183 MOV2GO Foundation Facility Expansion $50,000 Q C30185 Lancaster Festival Security Enhancements $100,000 R C30186 Chesterhill Lions Club $50,000 S C30188 Fairfield County CDL Training and Testing Lot $300,000 T Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $3,996,644 $3,796,644 U TOTAL ALL FUNDS $3,996,644 $3,796,644 SOUTHEAST LIBRARY WAREHOUSE The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C30025, Southeast Library Warehouse, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C30025, Southeast Library Warehouse, plus up to $20,400. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $20,400 from appropriation item C30025, Southeast Library Warehouse. INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C30075, Infrastructure Improvements, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C30075, Infrastructure Improvements, plus up to $27,462. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $27,462 from appropriation item C30075, Infrastructure Improvements. BUILDING ENVELOPE RESTORATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C30136, Building Envelope Restorations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C30136, Building Envelope Restorations, plus up to $13,400. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $13,400 from appropriation item C30136, Building Envelope Restorations. ACADEMIC SPACE RENEWAL The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C30158, Academic Space Renewal, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C30158, Academic Space Renewal, plus up to $202,858. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $202,858 from appropriation item C30158, Academic Space Renewal. BUILDING INTERIOR IMPROVEMENTS - REGIONAL CAMPUSES The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C30164, Building Interior Improvements - Regional Campuses, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C30164, Building Interior Improvements - Regional Campuses, plus up to $15,105. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $15,105 from appropriation item C30164, Building Interior Improvements - Regional Campuses. CAMPUS INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS - REGIONAL CAMPUSES The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C30171, Campus Infrastructure Improvements - Regional Campuses, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C30171, Campus Infrastructure Improvements - Regional Campuses, plus up to $570,856. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $570,856 from appropriation item C30171, Campus Infrastructure Improvements - Regional Campuses. FAIRFIELD COUNTY CDL TRAINING AND TESTING LOT The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C30188, Fairfield County CDL Training and Testing Lot, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C36346, Fairfield County CDL Training and Testing Lot. Sec. 357.28. 1 2 3 A SCC SINCLAIR COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C37745 Advanced Manufacturing and Skilled Trades Training Hub $3,500,000 E C37764 Greater West Dayton Incubator $300,000 F C37768 Campus-Wide General Plumbing Replacement $2,967,992 G C37769 Campus-Wide Chiller Replacement $374,250 H C37770 Energy Conservation/Basic Renovations $3,000,000 I C37773 Learning Environment Renovations $2,037,997 J CP0805 Westwood Neighborhood Early Learning and Childcare Center GA136 $600,000 K C37776 Air Handler Replacements $2,623,000 L Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $14,803,239 $15,403,239 M Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) N C37756 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $11,679 O C37780 Food Service Renovations Centerville - Taxable $122,805 P Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $134,484 Q TOTAL ALL FUNDS $14,937,723 $15,537,723 WESTWOOD NEIGHBORHOOD EARLY LEARNING AND CHILDCARE CENTER The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item CP0805, Westwood Neighborhood Early Learning and Childcare Center GA136, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C230FM, Cultural and Sports Facilities Projects, earmarked for Day Air Credit Union Ballpark Professional Development License Facility Standard Improvements and Dayton Dragon Improvements, minus $1,900,000. Sec. 357.34. 1 2 3 A UTO UNIVERSITY OF TOLEDO B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C34080 Building Envelope/Weatherproofing $5,000 E C34095 Underground Steam/Condensate Infrastructure Improvements $5,000 $55,000 F C340A5 ProMedica Transformative Low Income Medical Senior Housing $250,000 G C340B3 Reverse Osmosis Auto Watering System for Research Animals $526,112 H C340B9 University of Toledo Hillel $50,000 I C340C3 Campus Safety Grant Program $19,890 J C340C6 Space Replacement/Consolidation $336,514 K C340D1 Hopability - Epilepsy Center of Northwest Ohio $125,000 L Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $1,317,516 $1,067,516 M Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) N C340C1 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $172,606 O C340C9 Research Lab Renovation - Taxable $6,097 P C340E5 Toledo Innovation Center - Taxable $450,000 Q Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $628,703 R TOTAL ALL FUNDS $1,946,219 $1,696,219 BUILDING ENVELOPE/WEATHERPROOFING The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C34080, Building Envelope/Weatherproofing, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C34080, Building Envelope/Weatherproofing, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C34072, Building Automation System Upgrades, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C340B2, Wireless Infrastructure Upgrade. HOPABILITY - EPILEPSY CENTER OF NORTHWEST OHIO The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C340D1, Hopability - Epilepsy Center of Northwest Ohio, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C58050, Community Support, earmarked for Uptown Smiles Clinical Renovations. UNDERGROUND STEAM/CONDENSATE INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C34095, Underground Steam/Condensate Infrastructure Improvements, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C34095, Underground Steam/Condensate Infrastructure Improvements, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C340B9, University of Toledo Hillel. Sec. 357.36. 1 2 3 A WSU WRIGHT STATE UNIVERSITY B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C27570 Envelope Repairs $109,203 E C27571 Wellfield Remediation $138,344 F C27577 Workforce Based Training and Equipment $34,048 G C27578 University Safety Initiative $1,819,960 H C27579 Pedestrian Tunnel Renewal $85,208 I C27582 Campus Paving and Grounds $252,999 J C27585 Campus Energy Efficiency and Controls $245,815 K C27589 Gas Line Replacement $3,933,606 L C27590 Workforce Development Center - Lake Campus $1,517,775 M C27594 Health College Renovation $1,225,750 N C27598 405 Xenia Avenue Market Redevelopment $150,000 O C275A2 Lake Campus Infrastructure $369,538 P C275A5 Wright State University Archives Facilities Upgrade Project $100,000 Q C275A6 Infinity Labs Wright State Power House $250,000 R C275A7 Northwest Health and Wellness Campus $200,000 S C275A8 Village of Camden Technology Center $175,000 T C275A9 Campus Safety Grant Program $143,885 U C275B3 Student Union Atrium Renovation $126,299 V C275B4 Paul Laurence Dunbar Library Renovation $957,011 W C275B5 Campus Restroom Upgrades $300,000 X C275B6 Laboratory Animal Resources Occupational Safety Phase II $11,233 Y C275B9 Campus Safety Exterior Cameras and Access Control $500,000 Z C275D3 Healthy Family Market/Dayton Children's Westside Pediatric Center $500,000 AA C275D4 Aerospace, Medicine, and Human Performance National Center of Excellence - Wright State University $400,000 AB C275D5 Wright State University Archives Facilities Upgrades $250,000 AC Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $13,795,674 $13,620,674 AD Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) AE C27599 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $31,468 AF C275A1 Fairborn Fiber Expansion Project - Taxable $75,000 AG C275C2 Energy Efficiency and Controls - Taxable $88,763 AH C275D2 University Safety Initiative - Taxable $41,958 AI C275D6 Workforce Development Center - Taxable $500,000 AJ C275D7 USAF Research Partnership - Taxable $250,000 AK Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $987,189 AL TOTAL ALL FUNDS $14,782,863 $14,607,863 UNIVERSITY SAFETY INITIATIVE The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C27578, University Safety Initiative, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C27578, University Safety Initiative, plus up to $13,623. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Wright State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $13,623 from appropriation item C27578, University Safety Initiative. LAKE CAMPUS INFRASTRUCTURE The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C275A2, Lake Campus Infrastructure, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C275A2, Lake Campus Infrastructure, plus up to $41,447. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Wright State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $41,447 from appropriation item C275A2, Lake Campus Infrastructure. Sec. 371.10. 1 2 3 A MHA DEPARTMENT OF BEHAVIORAL HEALTH B Reappropriations C Mental Health Facilities Improvement Fund (Fund 7033) D C58001 Community Assistance Projects $20,775,720 E C58007 Infrastructure Renovations $90,731,528 F C58048 Community Resiliency Projects $7,388,043 G C58050 Community Support $26,178,235 $27,403,235 H Mental Health Facilities Improvement Fund (Fund 7033) Total $145,073,526 $146,298,526 I TOTAL ALL FUNDS $145,073,526 $146,298,526 Sec. 371.20. COMMUNITY SUPPORT The foregoing appropriation item C58050, Community Support, shall be equal to the amount of all projects specified in this section, unless the amounts are released prior to June 30, 2026. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C58050, Community Support, earmarked for Harbor Behavioral Health, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C24073, Mercy College of Ohio Physician Assistant Program. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C58050, Community Support, earmarked for Mission Point, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C230FM, Cultural and Sports Facilities Projects, earmarked for the Jeep Museum, minus $250,000. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C58050, Community Support, earmarked for Edna House, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C230AE, Variety Theatre, minus $200,000. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C58050, Community Support, earmarked for Safer Futures, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation items C270L5, Garfield Zimmerman Home, and C230FM, Cultural and Sports Facilities Projects, earmarked for Village of Garrettsville Cemetery. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C58050, Community Support, earmarked for Lincoln Community Center Upgrades, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C230FM, Cultural and Sports Facilities Projects, earmarked for Miami Valley Veterans Museum, minus $400,000. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C58050, Community Support, earmarked for Gateway Men's Shelter, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C230FM, Cultural and Sports Facilities Projects, earmarked for Dayton Air Credit Union Ballpark. 1 2 A Project List B Gracehaven-Multipurpose Building $2,500,000 C Cuyahoga County Mental Behavioral Health Diversion Crisis Center $1,700,000 D Cleveland Christian Home - Child Wellness Campus $1,500,000 E Bellefaire Jewish Children's Bureau Child and Youth Service Center $1,000,000 F Dayton Boys and Girls Club (Miami Chapel Inspire Zone) $1,000,000 G Gateway Men's Shelter $1,000,000 H Greater Dayton Regional Hospital Association $800,000 I Bellefaire Child and Youth Services Center $750,000 J Mission Point $750,000 K LADD Forever Home $720,000 L Providence House East Side Campus Community Hub $700,000 M Cleveland Clinic Akron General $700,000 N Faith Mission Life Safety and Critical Improvements $560,000 O Toledo YWCA Domestic Shelter Project $500,000 P Whitney Manor $500,000 Q Vista Village $500,000 R Ravenwood Health Renovation $500,000 S Clark County Family Justice Center $500,000 T Tri-County Response Center Project $500,000 U Tri-County Board of Recovery and Mental Health Services $450,000 V Applewood Centers Inc. $425,000 W Providence House $400,000 X May Dugan Center Renovation $400,000 Y Integrated Community Solutions Community Center $350,000 Z Shelby Health & Wellness Renovation Project $350,000 AA Alvis House $300,000 AB Journey Center for Safety and Healing $300,000 AC Western Reserve Area on Aging $300,000 AD Safer Futures $275,000 AE Cleveland Rape Crisis Center $250,000 AF Cedar Hills Transformation Camp $250,000 AG Sisters of Charity Health System and Sisters of Charity Foundation of Cleveland $250,000 AH Lower Lights Christian Health Center $250,000 AI Alliance Area Domestic Violence Shelter $250,000 AJ Alliance YWCA Headquarters Improvements $250,000 AK The Refuge - New Building $250,000 AL Tobacco Treatment Center of Ohio $250,000 AM Wayfinders Ohio Emergency Homeless Shelter $250,000 AN Adams County $250,000 AO YWCA Greater Cincinnati Domestic Violence Shelter East $250,000 AP Center for Addiction Treatment Recovery House $250,000 AQ Addiction Services Council Facility Expansion $230,000 AR Richland County Shelter Renovation Project $217,235 AS Cincinnati Children's Hospital Youth Mental Health Facility $210,000 AT West Dayton Community Services Center (Easter Seals Miami Valley) $200,000 AU Union Miles Development Corp (Walt Collins Veterans Housing Facility) $200,000 AV Star House $200,000 AW CommQuest Recovery Campus Improvements $200,000 AX Child Guidance & Family Solutions (CGFS) - Akron Project $200,000 AY Sanctuary Night - Expanding to Meet the Need $200,000 AZ Child Guidance & Family Solutions (CGFS) $200,000 BA Washington County Boys and Girls ClubAlice Chapman Early Learning Center $175,000 BB Y-Haven YMCA of Greater Cleveland $150,000 BC Pathways for Women $150,000 BD OhioGuidestone Youth and Family Resiliency Center $150,000 BE City of Franklin $150,000 BF Square One Meigs $150,000 BG Harbor Behavioral Health $125,000 BH Lorain County Safe Harbor $115,000 BI Henry County $110,000 BJ Seven Hills Trauma Recovery Center $105,000 BK Shelby Mercy Mission House Renovations $101,000 BL Comprehensive Health Care at the Centers, Gordon Square $100,000 BM Y-Haven YWCA of Greater Cleveland $100,000 BN Livingston Avenue Community New Direction Project $100,000 BO The Cocoon Project for Survivors of Domestic and Sexual Violence $100,000 BP Beyond the Walls $100,000 BQ Blue Line Foundation HQ & Regional Training Center $100,000 BR Haven Home Renovations $100,000 BS Mansfield Champions for Children Child Advocacy Center $100,000 BT Toledo Lutheran Social Services Expansion Project $100,000 BU CommQuest $100,000 BV Women's Resource Center of Hancock County $100,000 BW Lincoln Community Center Upgrades $100,000 BX YMCA Competitive Sports Training Facility $75,000 BY Muskingum Behavioral Health Improvements $57,000 BZ Veterans Resource Center Project $50,000 CA Cadence Care Network Family and Community Resource Center $50,000 CB Harbor Crisis Stabilization Unit $50,000 CC Edna House $50,000 CD Homesafe - Ashtabula $40,000 CE Riveon Mental Health and Recovery – Middleburg Heights $13,000 Sec. 373.10. 1 2 3 A DNR DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES B Reappropriations C Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) D C725D5 Fountain Square Building Improvements $2,185,561 E C725E0 ODNR Fairgrounds Areas Upgrading $109,545 F C725N7 District Office Renovations $276,420 G Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $2,571,526 H Clean Ohio Trail Fund (Fund 7061) I C72514 Clean Ohio Trail Fund $3,841,416 J Clean Ohio Trail Fund (Fund 7061) Total $3,841,416 K Ohio Parks and Natural Resources Fund (Fund 7031) L C72549 ODNR Facilities Development $2,063,611 M C725E1 Local Parks Projects - Statewide $686,330 N C725E5 Project Planning $1,225,000 O C725J0 Natural Areas/Preserves Maintenance/Facilities $1,124,081 P C725J6 Ohio and Erie Canal $3,285,000 Q C725K0 State Park Renovations and Upgrading $2,513,319 R C725M0 Dam Rehabilitation $51,826 S Ohio Parks and Natural Resources Fund (Fund 7031) Total $10,949,167 T Parks and Recreation Improvement Fund (Fund 7035) U C725A0 State Parks Campgrounds, Lodges, and Cabins $31,247,561 V C725C4 Muskingum River Lock and Dam $17,417,077 W C725E2 Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects $50,952,525 $53,076,193 X C725E6 Project Planning $5,000 Y C725L8 Statewide Trails Program $18,907,428 Z C725M5 Lake Erie Islands State Park/Middle Bass Island State Park $11,747 AA C725N6 Wastewater/Water Systems Upgrades $94,065 AB C725R3 State Parks Renovations and Upgrades $17,052,040 AC C725R4 Dam Rehabilitation - Parks $18,889,505 AD C725U4 Operations Equipment $8,796,400 AE C725U9 Recreation Facilities $11,066,588 AF Parks and Recreation Improvement Fund (Fund 7035) Total $174,439,936 $176,563,604 AG State Fiscal Recovery Fund (Fund 5CV3) AH C725V4 Parks ARPA $932,140 AI C725V5 Trails ARPA $76,627 AJ C725V6 Wastewater/Water Systems ARPA $302,681 AK State Fiscal Recovery Fund (Fund 5CV3) Total $1,311,448 AL Wildlife Fund (Fund 7015) AM C725K9 Wildlife Area Building Renovations $40,988,784 AN Wildlife Fund (Fund 7015) Total $40,988,784 AO TOTAL ALL FUNDS $234,102,277 $236,225,945 FEDERAL REIMBURSEMENT All reimbursements received from the federal government for any expenditures made pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the fund from which the expenditure originated. CLEAN OHIO TRAIL FUND The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C72514, Clean Ohio Trail Fund, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C72514, Clean Ohio Trail Fund, plus up to $3,466,877. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Natural Resources shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $3,466,877 from appropriation item C72514, Clean Ohio Trail Fund. ODNR FAIRGROUNDS AREAS UPGRADING The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C725E0, ODNR Fairgrounds Areas Upgrading, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C725E0, ODNR Fairgrounds Areas Upgrading, plus up to $200,170. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Natural Resources shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $113,218 from appropriation item C725D5, Fountain Square Building Improvements, and $86,952 from appropriation item C725N7, District Office Renovations. STATE PARK RENOVATIONS AND UPGRADING The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C725K0, State Park Renovations and Upgrading, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C725K0, State Park Renovations and Upgrading, plus up to $836,383. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Natural Resources shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $19,881 from appropriation item C72549, ODNR Facilities Development, $367,941 from appropriation item C725E1, Local Parks Projects - Statewide, $7,137 from appropriation item C725K0, State Park Renovations and Upgrading, $429,182 from appropriation item C725M0, Dam Rehabilitation, and $12,242 from appropriation item C725N5, Wastewater/Water Systems Upgrades. STATE PARKS RENOVATIONS AND UPGRADES The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C725R3, State Parks Renovations and Upgrades, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C725R3, State Parks Renovations and Upgrades, plus up to $8,348,822. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Natural Resources shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $6,185,743 from appropriation item C725A0, State Parks Campgrounds, Lodges, and Cabins, $24,960 from appropriation item C725B2, Parks Equipment, $33,377 from appropriation item C725B5, Buckeye Lake Dam Rehabilitation, $5,923 from appropriation item C725C4, Muskingum River Lock and Dam, $13,327 from appropriation item C725E6, Project Planning, $21,813 from appropriation item C725L8, Statewide Trails Program, $179,725 from appropriation item C725N6, Wastewater/Water Systems Upgrades, $112,826 from appropriation item C725R3, State Parks Renovations and Upgrades, and $1,771,128 from appropriation item C725R4, Dam Rehabilitation - Parks. Sec. 373.15. The foregoing appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, shall be equal to the amount of all unreleased local parks projects and allowable administrative costs specified in this section, unless amounts are released prior to June 30, 2026. Of the foregoing appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, an amount equal to two percent of the projects listed below that received their initial appropriation prior to the effective date of this section June 30, 2026, may be used by the Department of Natural Resources for the administration of local projects, except that the Department shall not use any portion of the funding for those projects whose reappropriation has been redirected in this section from the unencumbered balance of another appropriation item. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, earmarked for the Champion City Sports and Wellness Center is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C230FM, Cultural and Sports Facilities Projects, earmarked for A.B. Graham Memorial at I-70 and SR 72. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, earmarked for Dublin Riverside Crossing Park is the unencumbered balance as of June 20, 2026, in appropriation item C230FM, Cultural and Sports Facilities Projects, earmarked for the Brown-Harris Historic Cemetery Preservation. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, earmarked for Brooklyn John M. Coyne Center Improvements is the unencumbered balance remaining in appropriation item C230Z8, Brooklyn John Frey Park, as of June 20, 2026. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, earmarked for the City of Vandalia Robinette Park Renovation, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C230EC, Triumph of Flight. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, includes the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C270N4, East Liverpool Athletic Center. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, earmarked for the Veterans Memorial Park at Latty's Grove Rehabilitation Project and Hicksville Park Playground Equipment, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, earmarked for the Community Pool and Pool House, minus $46,332. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, earmarked for Weathersfield Township Community Park, is the S.B. 310 of the 133rd General Assembly appropriation for appropriation item C80046, Multi-jurisdictional Opioid Education and Workforce Training and Meeting Center, that was refunded to the state. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, earmarked for Village of Hollansburg Community Park Improvements and Village of Arcanum Community Park Splash Pad, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C230AH, Longtown Clemens Homestead. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, earmarked for Brookville Golden Gate Community Park, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C275A8, Village of Camden Technology Center, minus $25,000. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, earmarked for Beautifying James E. Cavanaugh Park is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C230FM, Cultural and Sports Facilities Projects, earmarked for the Cleveland Majestic Hall. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, earmarked for Rockefeller Park Greenhouse, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C230AB, Cleveland Music Hall, minus $200,000. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, earmarked for the Shaw JCC of Akron, Center at Rosemont Preserve, and Hardesty Park Initiative projects, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C58050, Community Support, earmarked for Cleveland Clinic Akron General, minus $200,000. 1 2 A Project List B Heritage Trail Extension $2,500,000 C Cheryl Allen Center Improvements $2,000,000 D Cleveland Tower City and Bedrock Development Activities $2,000,000 E Smale Riverfront Park $1,700,000 F West Liberty W. Columbus St. Bridge $1,265,000 G Cincinnati Findlay Community and Recreation Center $1,200,000 H Gateway to Freedom Park $1,200,000 I French Creek Sports Complex $1,075,000 J Hoover Reservoir Crew $1,000,000 K Walnut Township Flood Mitigation Project - Final Design and Implementation Plan $1,000,000 L South Point Community Pool $1,000,000 M The Wilds RV Park and Campground $900,000 N Irishtown Bend and Canal Basin Park $765,000 O Upper Arlington Riverside Drive Shared Use Path $750,000 P Detroit Shoreway Project $750,000 Q Environmental Education Pavilion at Forest Lawn Stormwater Park $750,000 R Champion City Sports and Wellness Center $750,000 S Price Hill Sports Complex $650,000 T Greater Dayton School Project $600,000 U Battery Park Coastal Improvements $500,000 V Lake Metro Parks Lakefront Trail $500,000 W North Ridgeville Mills Creek $500,000 X Oak Harbor Waterfront $500,000 Y Mid Ohio Valley Aquatic Center, Inc. (MOVAC) $500,000 Z Sidney Feeder Canal Bike Trail $500,000 AA Plain City-Heritage Trail Connector $500,000 AB Weathersfield Township Community Park $500,000 AC Bradfield Community Recreation Center $480,000 AD Geneva Township Park - Old Lake Road Shoreline Restoration $450,000 AE Mentor Marsh Observation Tower $450,000 AF Lexington Depot Park and Trailhead $425,000 AG Mosquito Creek Lake Park Improvements $404,000 AH Buckeye Lake Feeder Channel Restoration $400,000 AI Solon to Chagrin Falls Multi-Purpose Trail $400,000 AJ Kelleys Island East Lakeshore Shoreline Protection $400,000 AK City of Grove City Town Center Playground $400,000 AL Lake Metroparks Lake Erie Shoreline Trail and Revetment Wall $400,000 AM Fairlawn connector trails $400,000 AN Hicksville Park Playground Equipment $387,900 AO Wapakoneta Parking and Pedestrian Plaza Project $380,000 AP Boeckling Building Pier $350,000 AQ Alum Creek Pedestrian/Bike Bridge - Bexley $350,000 AR Wauseon Community Social and Recreational Center $350,000 AS Fairport Harbor Marina Boat Launch $350,000 AT Gateway Regional Sports Complex $350,000 AU Put-in-Bay Downtown Promenade Renovation $350,000 AV Copley Road Trail East $350,000 AW Sheffield Village French Creek Project $325,000 AX Veterans Memorial Park at Latty's Grove Rehabilitation Project $315,768 AY Marina Boat Dock Riverside Renovation $300,000 AZ Solon-Chagrin Falls Multi-purpose Trail $300,000 BA Final Third Foundation's Pathways Park Facility Development $400,000 BB Scout Achievement Center $300,000 BC Wadsworth Inclusive Playground at Valley View Elementary $300,000 BD Glenford Earthworks Phase III $300,000 BE Camp Joy $300,000 BF The Harold D. Miller Park Improvement Project $300,000 BG Dublin Riverside Crossing Park $255,225 BH Heights to Hudson Trail $250,000 BI Coke Oven Community Civic Center Park $250,000 BJ Canal Basin Park - Riverfront Connections $250,000 BK SPIRE Institute and Academy $250,000 BL Village of Minerva Park Trail Improvement Project $250,000 BM Roadway and Recreation Walking Track Repair $250,000 BN Johnstown Splash Pad $250,000 BO Black River School Playground Surface and Walking Track $250,000 BP Putnam County Historical Society Museum $250,000 BQ Plain Township Legacy Park Amphitheater $250,000 BR Vienna Air Heritage Park $250,000 BS Mid-Ohio Aquatic Center $250,000 BT Beverly Island Village Park Bridgeat the Island $250,000 BU Lockington Trail Bridge $250,000 BV J. Babe Stern Ball Field $250,000 BW Timken Gatehouse Renovation $250,000 BX City of Vandalia Robinette Park Renovation $250,000 BY JCC of Greater Columbus $243,000 BZ Cave Lake Dam $225,000 CA Chillicothe Paint Creek Recreational Trail $215,000 CB Lawrence County Union Rome Trails and Walkways $214,000 CC Mandel Jewish Community Center Preston's H.O.P.E Playground $210,000 CD Bradstreet's Landing Pier, Lakefront Access and Resiliency Improvements $200,000 CE City of Monroe Lookout Point $200,000 CF Union and Rome Township Trails Project $200,000 CG Munson Springs Nature Preserve and Historical Site $200,000 CH Shared Use Path Connector (Goosepond Road-Licking Health Department) $200,000 CI Lorain County Metro Park Connector $200,000 CJ Sidney Urbana Trail System Phase I $200,000 CK Mount Aloysius Community Rec Center $200,000 CL Rockefeller Park Greenhouse $200,000 CM Shaw JCC of Akron $200,000 CN Center at Rosemont Preserve $200,000 CO East Liverpool Heritage Trail Project $185,000 CP Radnor Township Park Improvements $160,000 CQ Center Green Stream Restoration Project $150,000 CR McNamara Park Project $150,000 CS Pickerington Soccer Association Facility Improvements $150,000 CT Wellsville Marina Dredging $150,000 CU Findlay Playground/Grant Park/Over-the-Rhine Recreation Center $150,000 CV Swanton Railroad Park $150,000 CW Antrim Community Center $150,000 CX Mill Creek Valley Conservancy District Corridor Revitalization $150,000 CY Forest Park Central Park Improvements $150,000 CZ Buckeye Lake Boat Ramps and Pier Enabling Project $150,000 DA J. Babe Stern Community Center for At Risk Children $150,000 DB Mount Gilead Park Site Preparations $150,000 DC Summit Lake Vision Plan $150,000 DD Mansfield Central Park $150,000 DE Recreational Project at the Bowling Green Training and Community Center $150,000 DF Brookville Golden Gate Community Park $150,000 DG CROWN Ohio River Trail Safety Improvements $140,000 DH Centerville Mills Park Wetland Boardwalk and Trails System $125,000 DI Old Murray City School Building Demolition $125,000 DJ Flight Line: East Dayton Rails-to-Trails $125,000 DK Fairlawn Gully Water Quality Basins $125,000 DL City of Poland Sheridan Rd. Multi-Use Trail $107,000 DM Minister-Ft. Loramie Multi-Use Trail Connector $100,000 DN The Graham Schools Pony Wagon Trail $100,000 DO Addyston Park Upgrades $100,000 DP Miracle Field Complex $100,000 DQ Veterans Memorial at Rose Run Park $100,000 DR Mitchell Park Trail Connector $100,000 DS Fairfax Ziegler Park Improvements $100,000 DT Columbia Twp. Wooster Pike Bike Trail $100,000 DU Holden Arboretum All-Season Trails $100,000 DV Avon Lake Boat Launch and Park Improvements $100,000 DW Syracuse Doggie Park $100,000 DX The Wilds Shade and Shelter Improvements $100,000 DY Paulding County Trails Project $100,000 DZ Brunswick Hills Township Park $100,000 EA Mound Park Pickleball and Tennis Court Resurfacing Project $100,000 EB Ottawa Memorial Pool Splash Pad $100,000 EC Village of Bellville Historic Bandstand Renovations $100,000 ED Beautifying James E. Cavanaugh Park $100,000 EE Hardesty Park Initiative $100,000 EF Brooklyn John M. Coyne Center Improvements $90,000 EG Hart Crane Park $85,000 EH YMCA of Bucyrus Aquatic Center $80,000 EI 4-H Camp Piedmont Upgrades $75,000 EJ Bacci Park Infrastructure and Security Improvements $75,000 EK Geneva-on-the-Lake Shoreline Protection Project $75,000 EL Brook Park Central Park $75,000 EM Independence Hemlock Trail $75,000 EN Middleport-Pomeroy Walking Path Project Phase IV $75,000 EO New Concord Swimming Pool $75,000 EP Sharon Nature Preserve Trails Phase I $75,000 EQ Boston Heights - Matthew Thomas Park Trail $75,000 ER Summit Lake Vision Plan $75,000 ES Hiestand Woods Park and Preserve $75,000 ET Madeira Dawson Promenade Connector $70,000 EU Ellsworth Hills Learning Lab $65,000 EV Continental Buckeye Park Improvements $60,000 EW Holden Arboretum $50,000 EX Jeromesville Square Park $50,000 EY Shade Community Center Upgrades $50,000 EZ Barge 225 - Cleveland Metroparks Floating Education Center $50,000 FA Clague Park Cabin Renovation $50,000 FB Bellaire Walking Trail $50,000 FC Big Walnut Trail Extension and Park $50,000 FD Big Walnut Trail SE Columbus - Eastland Area $50,000 FE Kelley Nature Preserve Boat Ramp $50,000 FF Drews Trak Memorial Pump Track Expansion $50,000 FG P&G MLB Cincinnati Reds Youth Academy $50,000 FH Salt Fork State Park $50,000 FI Center Ice Foundation $50,000 FJ Avon Lake Veterans Park Gazebo $50,000 FK Pomeroy Multimodal Path $50,000 FL Keener Park Renovations/Pickleball Courts $50,000 FM Brunswick Lake ADA Canoe/Kayak Launch $50,000 FN Camp Sherman Park $50,000 FO Village of Bloomdale Reservoir Project $50,000 FP Milford Center Rail Depot $50,000 FQ Adena Golden Wave Stadium Renovation $49,000 FR Village of Arcanum Community Park Splash Pad $48,000 FS Selby Building Revitalization $45,000 FT Village of Dunkirk Splash Pad and Storage Building $45,000 FU Bruce L Chapin Bridge - Northcoast Inland Trail $45,000 FV Burr Oak State Park $44,000 FW East Liverpool Splash Pad $40,000 FX Village of Hollansburg Community Park Improvements $42,000 FY Chippewa Park Shelter House $40,000 FZ Nimisilla Park Excavating $40,000 GA Rittman Splash PadMorton Salt Park Improvements $40,000 GB Jeromesville Community Garden $35,000 GC Monroeville Clark Park - North Coast Inland Trail Connection $33,000 GD Antwerp Village Community Park $33,000 GE Camp McKinley Improvements $30,000 GF Keener Park Sledding Hill $30,000 GG Village of Weston Community Splash Pad $30,000 GH Rayland Friendship Park Restroom Project $25,000 GI Charlement Reservation Stable $25,000 GJ Gloria Glens Southwest Park Grading $25,000 GK Willshire Ballpark Enhancements $25,000 GL Osgood Tennis Court $20,000 GM Clifton to Yellow Springs Bike Trail $20,000 GN Rockford Community Improvements $18,000 GO Wakeman Trail Connector $17,000 GP Sardinia Veteran's Community Park Revitalization $15,000 GQ Seville Memorial Park Public Restroom Facilities $15,000 GR Village of Albany Bike PathsPark Project $10,000 GS Paulding County Trails Project $7,500 GT Buckeye Trail Boesel Easement Bridge $2,800 Sec. 387.10. 1 2 3 A FCC FACILITIES CONSTRUCTION COMMISSION B Reappropriations C Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) D C230E3 Hazardous Substance Abatement $246,840 E C230E5 State Agency Planning and Assessment $113,317 F Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $360,157 G Cultural and Sports Facilities Building Fund (Fund 7030) H C23032 OHC - Ohio Historical Center Rehabilitation $5,000 I C23066 Variety Theater $85,000 J C230AB Cleveland Music Hall $400,000 K C230AE Variety Theatre $250,000 L C230AH Longtown Clemens Homestead $90,000 M C230BL Fairport Harbor Lighthouse Project $200,000 N C230BV Downtown Toledo Music Hall $400,000 O C230CH Mt. Perry Scenic Railroad Structure Renovations $125,000 P C230CM Waverly Old Children's Home Renovation $20,000 Q C230CN Garrettsville Buckeye Block Community TheaterCurtains Up Theatre $227,323 R C230FM Cultural And Sports Facilities Projects $41,604,368 $41,330,700 S C230FS OHC - Ohio River Museum $5,000 T C230GJ OHC - Hopewell Ceremonial Earthworks $11,650,000 U C230J6 West Side Market Renovation $500,000 V C230R8 National Ceramic Museum and Heritage Center Renovation $100,000 W C230X8 Riverside Veterans Memorial $15,000 X C230Y6 Ashtabula Maritime and Surface Transportation Museum $100,000 Y Cultural and Sports Facilities Building Fund (Fund 7030) Total $55,776,691 $54,278,023 Z Public School Building Fund (Fund 7021) AA C23001 Public School Buildings $2,000,000 AB Public School Building Fund (Fund 7021) Total $2,000,000 AC School Building Program Assistance Fund (Fund 7032) AD C23002 School Building Program Assistance $380,000,000 AE School Building Program Assistance Fund (Fund 7032) Total $380,000,000 AF TOTAL ALL FUNDS $438,136,848 $436,638,180 OHC - OHIO RIVER MUSEUM The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C230FS, OHC - Ohio River Museum, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C230FS, OHC - Ohio River Museum, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C230W7, OHC - Lundy House Restoration. SCHOOL BUILDING PROGRAM ASSISTANCE The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C23002, School Building Program Assistance, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C23002, School Building Program Assistance, plus up to $9,294,558. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Ohio Facilities Construction Commission shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $8,907,561 from appropriation item C23002, School Building Program Assistance, and $386,997 from appropriation item C23010, Vocational Facilities Assistance Program. STATE AGENCY PLANNING/ASSESSMENT The foregoing appropriation item C230E5, State Agency Planning/Assessment, shall be used by the Facilities Construction Commission to provide assistance to any state agency for assessment, capital planning, and maintenance management. Sec. 387.13. CULTURAL AND SPORTS FACILITIES PROJECTS The amount reappropriated from the foregoing appropriation item C230FM, Cultural and Sports Facilities Projects, shall be equal to the amount of all projects specified in this section, unless the amounts are released prior to June 30, 2026. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C230FM, Cultural and Sports Facilities Projects, earmarked for Amherst Historical Society - Sandstone Quarry Museum, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C230BR, Amherst Historical Water Tower Project. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C230FM, Cultural and Sports Facilities Projects, earmarked for Roy Rogers Esplanade Improvements, is the unencumbered balance as of the effective date of this amendmentJune 30, 2026, in appropriation items C10058, Portsmouth MARCS. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C230FM, Cultural and Sports Facilities Projects, earmarked for the Huber Opera House Sound System, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, earmarked for the Community Pool and Pool House, minus $703,668. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C230FM, Cultural and Sports Facilities Projects, earmarked for Historic Ohio Theatre - Toledo, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C340A5, ProMedica Transformative Low Income Medical Senior Housing. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C230FM, Cultural and Sports Facilities Projects, earmarked for Cleveland Neighborhood Progress: Centennial Campaign for the City of Cleveland Historic Shaker Square, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C230AE, Variety Theatre, minus $50,000. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C230FM, Cultural and Sports Facilities Projects, earmarked for Lancaster Festival Upgrades, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation items C30181, Lancaster Festival Upgrades, and C30185, Lancaster Festival Security Enhancements. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C230FM, Cultural and Sports Facilities Projects, earmarked for Miamisburg Historic Carnegie Building Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation items C230FM, Cultural and Sports Facilities Projects, earmarked for Camden Opera House Second Floor Renovation, and C275A8, Village of Camden Technology Center, minus $150,000. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C230FM, Cultural and Sports Facilities Projects, earmarked for The Castle Museum Improvements, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, earmarked for Shade Community Center Upgrades. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C230FM, Cultural and Sports Facilities Projects, earmarked for the General James W. Denver Property Preservation Project, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, earmarked for the Clifton to Yellow Springs Bike Trail. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C230FM, Cultural and Sports Facilities Projects, earmarked for Lou and Gib Reese Ice Arena Improvements, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, earmarked for Center Ice Foundation. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C230FM, Cultural and Sports Facilities Projects, earmarked for Maroon Arts - Culture Lab Upgrades, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C38463, Gravity Project Phase 2 - Taxable. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C230FM, Cultural and Sports Facilities Projects, earmarked for Near West Theatre, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C23066, Variety Theater. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C230FM, Cultural and Sports Facilities Projects, earmarked for Great Lakes Science Center Water and Technology Gallery, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C230AB, Cleveland Music Hall, minus $200,000. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C230FM, Cultural and Sports Facilities Projects, earmarked for the Legacy Building Project, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C58050, Community Support, earmarked for Cleveland Clinic Akron General, minus $500,000. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C230FM, Cultural and Sports Facilities Projects, earmarked for The Fleetwood Building Improvements Project, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C230BV, Downtown Toledo Music Hall. 1 2 A Project List B Dayton Dragons Improvements $2,000,000 $1,900,000 C Columbus Symphony Orchestra $2,000,000 D Cincinnati Art Museum Improvements $1,650,000 E Louvee Theater $1,500,000 F Columbus Museum of Art Upgrades $1,250,000 G Jeep Museum $1,000,000 H Allen County Memorial Hall Improvements $1,000,000 I Playhouse Square $1,000,000 J Norwalk Theater Restoration $1,000,000 K Cleveland Museum of Art $1,000,000 L Greater Cleveland Foodbank $1,000,000 M Playhouse Square - Transformational Greyhound Project $1,000,000 N Severance Music Center $1,000,000 O Eric Mendelsohn Park Synagogue Campus Restoration $1,000,000 P Port Regal Theatre $1,000,000 Q Dayton Air Credit Union Ballpark $1,000,000 R Voice of America MetroPark & Museum Tylersville Road Grand Entrance $750,000 S Barn at Stratford Parking Lot Improvement and Expansion $657,000 T Central Presbyterian Church $650,000 U Mahoning Valley Historical Society Expansion and Improvement $600,000 V Dayton Art Institute Roof Replacement $600,000 W Maroon Arts - Culture Lab Upgrades $575,000 X Ohio Aviation Hall of Fame $550,000 Y Harroun Barn Restoration/Preservation $500,000 Z Cleveland Public Theatre Improvements $500,000 AA Historic Washington Auditorium Project $500,000 AB Miami Valley Veterans Museum $500,000 $400,000 AC Canton Township Palace Theater $500,000 AD Great Lakes Science Center - Water Technology Exhibition $500,000 AE Karamu House Capstone Capital Improvements $500,000 AF Museum of Contemporary Art Improvements $500,000 AG Central Presbyterian Church Renovation (CAPA) $500,000 AH Mansfield Theater Road to 100 Renovation $500,000 AI Day Air Credit Union Ballpark Professional Development License Facility Standard Improvements $500,000 AJ International Soap Box Derby $500,000 AK The Fleetwood Building Improvements Project $400,000 AL Columbus Museum of Art $350,000 AM Federal Valley Resource Center $350,000 AN Fort Laurens Restoration $330,000 AO Children's Museum of Cleveland $307,500 AP Rockwell District Cultural and Arts Amphitheater - Whitehall $300,000 AQ Renovation of Wellman Theater $300,000 AR Champaign County YMCA $300,000 AS Willoughby Amphitheater $300,000 AT BAYarts Cultural Arts Center Expansion $288,000 AU Oak Harbor Riverfront $275,000 AV Piqua Arts - The Bank $250,000 AW Yoctangee Park Historic Armory $250,000 AX Canton Memorial Civic Center Improvements $250,000 AY Beck Center for the Arts $250,000 AZ Northside's Outdoor Community Entertainment Venue $250,000 BA Valentine Theatre $250,000 BB Historic Ohio Theatre - Toledo $250,000 BC Performing Arts Stage $200,000 BD Central Ohio Fire Museum Restoration $200,000 BE Cincinnati Regal Theater Renovation $200,000 BF Hollywood Theatre $200,000 BG East Liverpool Revitalization Project $200,000 BH Butler Institute of Art Studio Maker Space $200,000 BI Complete Cozad - Health Hospitality Campus $200,000 BJ South Webster Historic City Hall Events Center & Museum $200,000 BK Canton Palace Theatre $200,000 BL Roy Rogers Esplanade Improvements $200,000 BM Village of Somerset Improvements $200,000 BN Cleveland Neighborhood Progress: Centennial Campaign for the City of Cleveland Historic Shaker Square $200,000 BO Lancaster Festival Upgrades $200,000 BP Great Lakes Science Center Water and Technology Gallery $200,000 BQ Legacy Building Project $200,000 BR St. Clairsville Train Depot $150,000 BS Johnstown Amphitheater $150,000 BT Powell Education Center $150,000 BU Richwood Pavilion $150,000 BV Clearview Museum $150,000 BW Van Wert Area Performing Arts $150,000 BX Morgan County Historical Society $144,000 BY John and Iris Hathaway Education and Community Center $125,000 BZ Miamisburg Historic Carnegie Building Renovations $125,000 CA Lorain County Historical Society $112,000 CB Outdoor Restroom Facility Construction $100,000 CC Wellston Sport Complex $100,000 CD Cleveland Majestic Hall $100,000 CE El Mercado at La Villa Hispana Cultural Revitalization $100,000 CF Old Town Hall $100,000 CG Dublin Arts Council - Muirfield Drive Project $100,000 CH Swanton Memorial Park Improvements $100,000 CI Covedale Center - Phase 6 Renovations $100,000 CJ West Liberty Town Hall Opera House Community Center Restoration and Renovation $100,000 CK Gant Stadium Renovation $100,000 CL Jacob Miller Tavern $100,000 CM Jacob Miller's Tavern Renovation $100,000 CN Circleville Historic City Hall Improvements $100,000 CO Middletown Entertainment and Sports Venue $100,000 CP Firelands Historical Society Expansion $100,000 CQ Collingwood Arts Center Upgrades $100,000 CR Battle of Buffington Island Civil War Battlefield MuseumWashington County Courthouse Upgrades $100,000 CS Camden Opera House Second Floor Renovation $100,000 CT Swiss Community Historical Society - Heritage Center $100,000 CU The Music Settlement Center for Innovation, Education, and Technology $100,000 CV Polish Cultural Center $100,000 CW Historic Hoover Auditorium Renovation $100,000 CX Hotel McArthur $100,000 CY Rome Township Community Park $100,000 CZ Waterloo Arts Renovation Project $100,000 DA National Veterans Memorial and Museum Core Improvements $100,000 DB Cincinnati Observatory Improvements $100,000 DC Galion Big Four Depot Renovation $100,000 DD Start Westward Memorial $100,000 DE The Funk Music Hall of Fame and Exhibition Center $100,000 DF Twin City Opera House $100,000 DG Portage Riverwalk Arts Infrastructure - Oak Harbor $100,000 DH Barker House Stabilization Project $100,000 DI The Mark at the Park Sponsors VIP Pavilion $95,000 DJ Near West Theatre $85,000 DK Muirfield/Dublin Arts Project $75,000 DL Tarlton Community Building $75,000 DM Pleasant Square Community Center $75,000 DN Hune Covered Bridge RelocationRehabilitation $75,000 DO Heritage House Museum Restoration $75,000 DP Massillon Museum Improvements $75,000 DQ Grant Presidential Sculpture $50,000 DR Clark Gable Facility Improvements $50,000 DS Wright Patterson Air Force Base Holocaust Museum $50,000 DT John S. Knight Convention Center $50,000 DU Trumpet in the Land Outdoor Drama Tower Project $50,000 DV Decorative Arts Center of Ohio Accessibility Project $50,000 DW Grand Army of the Republic Hall $50,000 DX Canton Museum of Art $50,000 DY G.A.R. Hall Historic Rehabilitation $50,000 DZ The Castle Museum Improvements $50,000 EA Lou and Gib Reese Ice Arena Improvements $50,000 EB Huber Opera House Sound System $46,332 EC York Township Historical Society Museum and Educational Center $45,000 ED Miami Valley Veterans Museum Upgrades $45,000 EE West Liberty Piatt Castle Mac-A-Cheek Improvements $44,000 EF Amherst Historical Society - Sandstone Quarry Museum $40,000 EG Wendel Concert Stage $35,000 EH History of Weston, Historical Offerings $30,000 EI Village of Garrettsville Cemetery $25,000 EJ Bucyrus Bicentennial Arch Project $25,000 EK Piketon Liberty Memorial $25,000 EL Dayton Contemporary Dance Arts and Cultural Center $25,000 EM Shelby House Museum $20,000 EN Historic 19th Century Jefferson Depot Village $20,000 EO General James W. Denver Property Preservation Project $20,000 EP Muskingum County History (FKA Stone Academy) $15,668 EQ Louisville Mainstreet $15,000 ER Paulding County Historical Electrical Wiring Project $14,500 ES Jackson Center Museum Building Improvements $13,500 ET Palmyra Township Historical Society $12,700 EU Jewish Community of Canton Technology Upgrades $10,000 EV Leipsic Recreation Center Improvements $7,500 EW Jeromesville Totem Pole $3,000 Section 610.11. That existing Sections 357.09, 357.15, 357.16, 357.24, 357.28, 357.34, 357.36, 371.10, 371.20, 373.10, 373.15, 387.10, and 387.13 of H.B. 730 of the 136th General Assembly are hereby repealed. Section 610.12. Sections 610.10 and 610.11 of this act take effect on July 1, 2026. Section 610.13. The amendments made by Sections 610.10 and 610.11 of this act supersede the appropriations made in the applicable sections of Sub. H.B. 730 of the 136th General Assembly that take effect on the same date, to the extent the amendments may be in conflict. Section 620.10. That Section 200.30 of H.B. 2 of the 135th General Assembly (as amended by H.B. 730 of the 136th General Assembly) be amended to read as follows: Sec. 200.30. ONE TIME STRATEGIC COMMUNITY INVESTMENTS On June 28, 2024, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $17,800,000 cash from the General Revenue Fund to the One Time Strategic Community Investments Fund (Fund 5AY1). The foregoing appropriation item 042509, One Time Strategic Community Investments, shall be used by the Office of Budget and Management to provide grants for the projects listed in this section in the amounts listed. Prior to disbursing a grant to a recipient, the Office of Budget and Management shall enter into a grant agreement with the recipient. As part of the grant agreement, the recipient shall agree to complete a final report, in a form and manner to be prescribed by the Office of Budget and Management, detailing how the recipient used the grant and submit the report to the Office of Budget and Management. An amount equal to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of the foregoing appropriation item 042509, One Time Strategic Community Investments, at the end of fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated for the same purpose in fiscal year 2026. 1 2 A Project Amount B Adams County Fairgrounds Improvements $400,000 C Adams County Welcome Center $350,000 D Adams County Community Foundation $200,000 E West Union Wastewater Plant Improvements $200,000 F Lima Veterans Memorial Hall Improvements $10,000,000 G Allen County Airport Fuel Farm $1,000,000 H Rhodes State Advanced Manufacturing Equipment and Lab $440,000 I Allen County Child Support Enforcement Agency Facility $375,000 J Heir Force Community School Land Acquisition $250,000 K Temple Christian School Building Expansion $250,000 L Boys and Girls Club of Lima $100,000 M Ashland County Fair $1,100,000 N Cinnamon Lake Sewer District Lift Station $1,000,000 O Charles Mill Marina Houseboat and Path Renovation $910,000 P Hugo Young Theatre $248,554 Q Davy McClure Outdoor Education Shelter $200,000 R Ashland County Fire Training Facility $200,000 S Hickory Street Sanitary Sewer Lift Station $76,000 T Rowsburg Community Center $30,000 U Hayesville Pedestrian Walkway $25,000 V SPIRE Institute $1,000,000 W Ashtabula Juvenile Court Improvements $800,000 X Boys and Girls Club of Ashtabula $132,274 Y Country Neighbor Program $101,600 Z VFW Roof Repairs Geneva Post 6846 $99,037 AA Ashtabula Arts Center Restroom Project $45,000 AB Athens Regional Training Center $2,500,000 AC The Appalachian Center for Economic Networks Food Sector Accelerator Project $700,000 AD Nelsonville-York Elementary School (NYES) Playground Renovation $250,000 AE York Township VFD Project $250,000 AF City of Nelsonville Dog Park $139,731 AG Boys and Girls Club of Athens $100,000 AH Buchtel Village Park Project $100,000 AI Edna Brooks Domestic Violence Shelter $36,800 AJ Village of Waynesfield Veteran’s Park Enhancement $352,950 AK Saint Mary's Reservoir Mill $250,000 AL New Bremen Public Library Renovation $200,000 AM YMCA Auglaize-Mercer Recreation Complex $200,000 AN Barton VFD Station $1,000,000 AO Belmont Volunteer Fire Department New Station $1,000,000 AP The Sargus Center Revitalization and Sustainability Initiative $500,000 AQ Mead Township Hall and Garage Project $300,000 AR VFW Roof Repairs Powhatan Point Post 5565 $24,900 AS Future Plans Sanctuary $3,000,000 AT Brown County Junior Fair Covered Horse Arena $400,000 AU Water Infrastructure Bramel Mobile Home Park $400,000 AV Millikin Interchange Improvements $8,500,000 AW Madison Township Firehouse Improvements $1,750,000 AX BCRTA Outdoor Workforce Training $1,000,000 AY Riversedge Amphitheater Expansion $1,000,000 AZ Shuler Benninghofen Mixed-Use Project $1,000,000 BA VOA MetroPark Museum Grand Entrance $1,000,000 BB Oxford Student Safety Project $800,000 BC Liberty Playground Replacement Project $500,000 BD Madison Township Park Revitalization $500,000 BE Welding Lab Program Expansion in Fairfield Township $450,000 BF Monroe Plaza South Project $400,000 BG YWCA Hamilton Scholar House $400,000 BH World Class Clubs: Repairing Community Gymnasium $225,000 BI Boys and Girls Club of West Chester/Liberty $218,796 BJ VFW Roof Repairs West Chester Post 7696 $15,560 BK Carroll County Annex Building Rehab $500,000 BL Seven Ranges Scout Reservation Facility Upgrades $500,000 BM Dellroy Village Storm Drain and Street Repair $250,000 BN Carroll County Agricultural Service Center $200,000 BO Minerva Downtown Revitalization Project $200,000 BP Dellroy Village Offices/Garage Renovations $195,250 BQ Champaign Aviation Museum Improvements $20,000 BR Champion City Sports and Wellness Center $4,000,000 BS Champion City Sports and Wellness Center $750,000 BT Champion Center Arena Improvements $250,000 BU Goshen Fire Department Station 18 Rebuild $2,500,000 BV Felicity Veterans Village Housing Project $1,000,000 BW Milford Five Points Landing $400,000 BX Union Township Community Splash Pad $268,125 BY Nisbet Park Amphitheater $250,000 BZ Moscow Ohio River Stabilization, Phase III $240,000 CA Williamsburg Township Emergency Services Upgrades $150,000 CB Owensville Historical Society Museum $132,000 CC Williamsburg Community Park Trail Extension $86,770 CD VFW Roof Repairs Loveland Post 5354 $28,505 CE VFW Roof Repairs New Richmond Post 6770 $20,894 CF Boys and Girls Club of Clermont $18,921 CG Wilmington Runway Reopening and Improvements $3,500,000 CH Doan-Walnut-Short Street Water Main $500,000 CI Columbiana County Annex/Drug Task Force Building $2,900,000 CJ Utica Shale Academy Improvements $2,500,000 CK East Palestine Village Safety Complex $1,000,000 CL Hanover Township Fire and Emergency Medical Services Expansion Initiative $250,000 CM Lepper Restoration Project $175,000 CN City of Coshocton Fire Training Tower $1,000,000 CO Coshocton Skip’s Landing and Downtown Revitalization $750,000 CP City of Coshocton Roscoe Cemetery Improvements $460,000 CQ City of Coshocton Pickleball Court Upgrades $300,000 CR City of Coshocton Water Plant Electrical Upgrades $300,000 CS City of Coshocton Town Hall Roof Project $240,000 CT City of Coshocton Emergency Generator Project $200,000 CU Coshocton County Library Masonry Project $48,000 CV Maplecrest Community Center $500,000 CW The Galion Depot Canopy Restoration Project $200,000 CX The New Washington Veteran’s Memorial Park Project $34,460 CY Cuyahoga County Northcoast Connector $20,000,000 CZ Bedrock Riverfront Development $8,000,000 DA Rock and Roll Hall of Fame Museum Expansion and Renovation Project $7,000,000 DB Cleveland Port Bulk Terminal Modernization $5,000,000 DC West Side Market in Cleveland $2,400,000 DD Cahoon Park $2,000,000 DE Cleveland Zoo Primate Forest $2,000,000 DF Irishtown Bend Park $2,000,000 DG Valor Acres Brecksville Veterans Affairs Hospital Site Redevelopment $2,000,000 DH Blue Abyss $1,800,000 DI Two Foundation Building Purchase and Renovation $1,625,000 DJ Park Synagogue $1,500,000 DK The Music Settlement – Gries House Redevelopment $1,500,000 DL Brook Park Community Center Restoration $1,000,000 DM Cleveland Women’s Soccer Stadium $1,000,000 DN Electric Building Renovation $1,000,000 DO Independence Selig Drive Emergency Access $1,000,000 DP Shaker Heights Doan Brook Park $1,000,000 DQ YMCA of Greater Cleveland – New Facility Construction $1,000,000 DR Argonaut Project - Advancing Aviation and Maritime Pipeline $800,000 DS Birthing Beautiful Communities Birth Center $800,000 DT Connecting the Circle $800,000 DU Glenville YMCA $800,000 DV Saint Edwards High School Sustainable Urban Agriculture $800,000 DW Cleveland Public Square Improvements $750,000 DX University Heights Municipal Sewer Project $700,000 DY University Hospitals Breast Center - Parma $700,000 DZ Cleveland Habitat Building Project $507,500 EA Cleveland Airport NEOFIX $500,000 EB Euclid Public Library Green Branch Improvements $500,000 EC Hospice of the Western Reserve Center for Community Engagement and Hospice Care $500,000 ED JumpStart Northern Ohio Operations $500,000 EE Ohio Aerospace Institute Sensitive Information Research Facility $500,000 EF Rocky River Fire Station Improvements $500,000 EG Saint Casimir Parish Improvements $500,000 EH Seven Hills Fire Department $500,000 EI Vocational Guidance Services Renovation Cleveland Facility $500,000 EJ YWCA of Greater Cleveland $500,000 EK Boys and Girls Club of Broadway in Cuyahoga County $485,005 EL Maltz Museum of Jewish Heritage $480,000 EM Richmond Heights Salt Bin $450,000 EN Magnolia Clubhouse $400,000 EO Middleburg Heights Central Park Phase 1 $400,000 EP Cleveland Institute of Art - Interactive Media Lab $365,000 EQ Greenstone Lifeline Connection Improvements $327,867 ER Chagrin Valley Volunteer Fire Station $300,000 ES Berea City Hall and Police Station Upgrades $250,000 ET Jenning's Center for Older Adults $250,000 EU Journey Center for Safety and Healing/Domestic Violence Shelter $200,000 EV Lyndhurst Community Center Audio Visual Project $200,000 EW MetroHealth Emergency Department Refresh $200,000 EX Northeast Ohio Music Arts Development Hub $200,000 EY Olmsted Falls Visibility Project $200,000 EZ Achievement Centers for Children Westlake facility $100,000 FA Achievement Centers for Children Camp Cheerful facility $75,000 FB VFW Roof Repairs Solon Post 1863 $88,787 FC VFW Roof Repairs Parma Post 1974 $28,633 FD VFW Roof Repairs Cleveland Post 2533 $17,208 FE Western Ohio Regional Fire Training Facility $750,000 FF Eldora Speedway Public Safety Upgrades $400,000 FG Historic Bear’s Mill Infrastructure Restoration $275,000 FH The Darke County Fish and Game Association $120,000 FI Ney/Washington Township Fire Department Building $300,000 FJ Veterans Memorial Park at Latty’s Grove Rehabilitation Project $200,000 FK Little Brown Jug Grandstand Renovation $2,500,000 FL Sunbury Ohio-to-Erie Trail Expansion $1,250,000 FM Boardman Arts Park Improvements Whimsy Venue $1,000,000 FN Stockhands Horses for Healing, Capital Improvement Project $908,000 FO Dempsey Wildlife and Education Renovation $600,000 FP Delaware County Bicentennial Barn Renovation $500,000 FQ Powell Adventure Park Expansion $480,000 FR "Smuirfield" Golf Project $225,000 FS Ohio Fallen Heroes Memorial $70,000 FT VFW Roof Repairs Sunbury Post 8736 $58,440 FU Worenstaff Memorial Public Library Renovation $34,000 FV The Landing in Erie County $3,000,000 FW Battery Park Coastal Improvements $1,000,000 FX NW Ohio Water Quality Improvements/Cold Creek Foundation $800,000 FY Camp Timberlane Infrastructure Improvements $600,000 FZ Kelley's Island East Lakeshore Shoreline Protection $400,000 GA Erie County Fairgrounds Infrastructure Improvements $250,000 GB Erie County Jail Surveillance Upgrades $200,000 GC Huron Boat Basin and Amphitheater Capital Improvement Project $200,000 GD Sawmill Creek Wastewater Treatment Plant Expansion $200,000 GE Violet Township Event Center $2,100,000 GF Gateway Mixed Use District $2,000,000 GG Government Services Building Acquisition and Renovation $2,000,000 GH Wendel Pool Dehumidification System Replacement $550,000 GI Walnut Township Flood Mitigation $500,000 GJ Pickerington Covered Bridge Rehabilitation $350,000 GK Pickerington Connects $234,410 GL Elmwood Playground $225,000 GM Expanding Horizons – Meals on Wheels Senior Services Center $200,000 GN Historic Lancaster Bell and Clock Tower $150,000 GO Sycamore Creek Park Pond Restoration $125,000 GP Wagnalls Memorial Window Project $50,000 GQ American Legion Post 283 Improvements $20,000 GR Rushville Union Lions Club Accessible Parking $5,500 GS Jeffersonville Rattlesnake Water System Improvements $1,000,000 GT Wayne Township Firehouse Community Shelter $175,000 GU The Ohio Center for Advanced Technologies $20,000,000 GV Columbus Symphony Orchestra – Music for All $18,500,000 GW Downtown Columbus Capital Line $10,000,000 GX Heritage Trail Expansion $8,000,000 GY John Glenn International Airport Improvements $7,500,000 GZ OP Chaney Grain Elevator Restoration $2,800,000 HA Downtown Security Command Center $1,500,000 HB Unverferth House Revitalization and Expansion Campaign $1,500,000 HC Historic Dublin Riverfront Revitalization $1,230,000 HD Heartland Music Incubator $1,000,000 HE Norwich Township Fire Department Station 84 $1,000,000 HF Westland Mall Renovations $1,000,000 HG Hilliard First Responders Park $800,500 HH Green Lawn Cemetery Chapel $750,000 HI Heinzerling Facility Improvements $750,000 HJ Whitehall Police Department Emergency Facility $605,220 HK Knoll View Place $600,000 HL Tolles Cybersecurity Lab Renovation $600,000 HM Edison Welding Institute Renovations $500,000 HN Elevate Northland $500,000 HO LifeTown Kindness Center $500,000 HP National Center for Urban Solutions Facility $500,000 HQ Scioto Rise Place $500,000 HR Dublin Brand Road Pedestrian Tunnel Flood Mitigation $468,000 HS OZEM Gardner House Rehabilitation $375,000 HT Somali Community Link Center $350,000 HU The Refuge $250,000 HV Grandview Heights Fire EMS Police Facility $200,000 HW Grandview Heights McKinley Field Park $200,000 HX Tawnya Salyer Memorial Statue $200,000 HY Columbus Urban League Career Connect Hub $150,000 HZ Boys and Girls Club of J. Ashburn $138,585 IA VFW Roof Repairs Reynoldsburg Post 9473 $32,695 IB Building the Future of 4-H Camp Palmer $1,825,000 IC Community Event and Recreational Facility Renovation in Wauseon $500,000 ID Fulton County Fairgrounds Arts and Craft Building $80,000 IE Gallia County Council on Aging New Facility $2,500,000 IF Reservoir Enhancement Project $2,250,000 IG Gallia County Sheriff Office Renovation $225,000 IH Hambden Fire Station Project $2,000,000 II Montville Fire Station Construction $1,250,000 IJ Chardon Fire Department Equipment Project $1,000,000 IK Burton Berkshire Local Schools Career Pathways Program $915,037 IL Geauga County Fair $500,000 IM Russell Township Community Building $370,905 IN Chester Township Police Department Building Renovation $348,875 IO Chardon Memorial Stadium Restroom and Concession Project $250,000 IP Geauga County Safety Center Parking Lot $250,000 IQ Salt Dome Structural Repairs $155,000 IR St. Mary School Playground Enhancements $4,000 IS Cedarville Opera House $12,000,000 IT Clifton Union School Improvements $3,900,000 IU Future Development of Wright-Patterson $3,500,000 IV Clifton Opera House $1,900,000 IW Skyway SCIF Center $1,000,000 IX Spring House Park: Phase One $1,000,000 IY WSU: Archive Facility Upgrades $500,000 IZ OhioMeansJobs Greene County Improving Accessibility Project $175,000 JA Ohio Veterans’ Children’s Home Expansion and Upgrade, Phase 1 $150,000 JB Cambridge YMCA $3,000,000 JC Route 40 East Sewer Extension $1,000,000 JD Cambridge Fire Department Renovations $560,000 JE Old Washington Community VFD Station $250,000 JF Hamilton County Convention Center District Development $46,000,000 JG University of Cincinnati Health $16,750,000 JH Xavier University College of Osteopathic Medicine $9,750,000 JI Riverbend 2.0 $8,000,000 JJ Blue Line Foundation HQ and Regional Training Center $1,000,000 JK 605 Plum Convention Center Garage Renovation $945,771 JL Boys and Girls Club of Taft $300,978 JM Boys and Girls Club of East Hamilton $194,722 JN Boys and Girls Club of Sheakley $58,529 JO Findlay YMCA $1,250,000 JP Hancock County Fair $500,000 JQ Hancock County Park District $250,000 JR Owens State Community College CDL Facilities $250,000 JS Ada War Memorial Park $500,000 JT Hardin County Fair $500,000 JU Kenton Fire Department $500,000 JV Ohio Northern University HealthWise Mobile Health Clinic $500,000 JW Pump House Funding – Rodney Hensel $200,000 JX Hardin County Veterans Memorial Park District $50,000 JY Alger Baseball Field $40,000 JZ Harrison County Fairground Replacement and Enhancement $720,000 KA Regional Safety Center at Tappan Lake $650,000 KB Jewett Fire and Emergency Equipment Storage Building $325,000 KC Village of Bowerston VFD $205,000 KD Village of Bowerston Maintenance Building $100,000 KE Napoleon Public Library Improvements $1,000,000 KF The Henry County Community Event Center Office Addition $1,000,000 KG Corn City Regional Fire District New Fire Station $500,000 KH Napoleon Water Tower Upgrades $135,000 KI Core Networking Equipment at The Center for Child and Family Advocacy (CCFA) in Henry County $72,000 KJ Malinta Community Historical Society Site Project $45,000 KK Highland County Courthouse $1,000,000 KL Camp Wyandot Historic Camper Cabin Project $50,000 KM Union Furnace / Starr Township Improvements $35,000 KN Agricultural Society Millersburg Expo $750,000 KO Safe Harbor Ohio $500,000 KP Winesburg Park Improvements $250,000 KQ West Holmes Local Schools Robotics Program $22,000 KR Norwalk Theater Restoration $2,000,000 KS Norwalk Public Library Rehab $400,000 KT Feichtner Memorial Building Improvements $250,000 KU Huron County Transfer Station Scale Replacement $202,000 KV Jackson County Memorial Building Renovation $2,500,000 KW City of Jackson Park and Trail Revitalization $1,000,000 KX Jackson County Courthouse Building and Grounds Renovation $600,000 KY Blamer Park Renovation $392,038 KZ Wellston Food Pantry Turn-Key Renovation $200,000 LA Wellston Fire Department Training Academy $175,000 LB Jefferson County Agricultural Society Small Animal Barn $35,000 LC Mount Vernon Police Station $2,000,000 LD Fredericktown Water Infrastructure Improvements $750,000 LE Family Fun Grounds in Knox County $125,000 LF Willoughby Osborne Park Shoreline Protection $2,000,000 LG Uptown Mentor Revitalization $1,500,000 LH ISTEM Painesville Township Haden Facility and Crowns Project $1,000,000 LI Mentor Fire Station $1,000,000 LJ University Hospitals TriPoint Breast Center - Painesville $938,750 LK Concord Township Waterline Extension Project $500,000 LL Lake Erie College Center for Health Sciences $500,000 LM Lake Metro Parks Lakefront Trail $500,000 LN Kirtland Public Library Roof Project $340,625 LO Mentor on the Lake – Lake Overlook $300,000 LP Rabbit Run Theater Improvements $100,000 LQ VFW Roof Repairs Mentor Post 9295 $35,478 LR Resources for Restoring Lives and Providing Safety and Security $15,328 LS Wayne National Forest Welcome Center $5,000,000 LT Coal Grove Village Riverfront Park $1,250,000 LU Lawrence County School Communications $750,000 LV Necco Center Improvements $375,000 LW Boys and Girls Club of Portsmouth $100,000 LX Buckeye Lake North Shore Park and Pier $8,500,000 LY Memorial Health Systems Education and Event Center $3,000,000 LZ Johnstown - Mink Street Water Infrastructure $500,000 MA Newark Towne Center Project $1,854,000 MB Buckeye Valley Family YMCA Pataskala Childcare Center $200,000 MC Mary Ann Township Fire Department $66,000 MD Hanover Hains Hill Drive Drainage Improvements $52,000 ME Junior Achievement - Regional Satellite Learning Center $50,000 MF Boys and Girls Club of Newark $46,195 MG Indian Lake Advocacy Group $5,000,000 MH Logan County Sewer District Flat Branch Upgrades $1,500,000 MI Bellefontaine Calvary Christian School $250,000 MJ Indian Lake Pickleball $150,000 MK Lorain County Community College Desich Entrepreneurship Center 3rd Floor Microelectronics Training Hub $2,500,000 ML Lorain County Fairs $2,500,000 MM Boys and Girls Club of Elyria South $1,000,000 MN Lorain County PACE Site Modifications $1,000,000 MO The Nord Center Capital Improvement Project $1,000,000 MP French Creek Sports Complex $925,000 MQ Lorain County Justice Center $750,000 MR North Ridgeville Cypress Avenue Project $700,000 MS Sheffield Lake Field House Rec Complex $600,000 MT Black River Landing Amphitheater $500,000 MU Haven Center Emergency Shelter / Neighborhood Alliance $500,000 MV Vocational Guidance Services (VGS) Project - Lorain $500,000 MW Lorain County Health and Dental Facility $375,000 MX Elyria Public Library West River Branch $300,000 MY Lorain Hispanic Veterans Memorial $300,000 MZ Lorain County Kennel Project $250,000 NA El Centro Facility Improvements $200,000 NB Good Knights Bed Building Center $150,000 NC Sheffield Village Colorado Avenue Side Path $150,000 ND Carlisle Township Hall Project $100,000 NE VFW Roof Repairs Wellington Post 6941 $12,276 NF Lucas County Seawall and River Edge Reconstruction Project $3,000,000 NG Toledo Innovation Center $3,000,000 NH Inclusive Multigenerational Community and Recreation Center (IMCRC) $2,900,000 NI Virginia Stranahan Trail and Senior Affordable Housing/Senior Center Development $2,700,000 NJ Eugene F. Kranz Toledo Express Airport Terminal Renovation Project $2,000,000 NK Toledo YWCA Domestic Shelter Project $2,000,000 NL Toledo Zoo Reptile House $1,740,000 NM Toledo Fire and Rescue Department Facility Repairs $1,600,000 NN Ottawa Park Revitalization Phase 1 $950,000 NO Imagination Station; Toledo Science Center World of Discovery Exhibit $750,000 NP Homer Hanham Boys and Girls Club Renovation $650,000 NQ Toledo Seagate Food Bank $650,000 NR Pre-Medical and Health Science Academy at Mercy College $500,000 NS Toledo School for the Performing Arts Replacement Windows $500,000 NT Sylvania Township Safety Training and Grounds Improvement $485,000 NU Toledo Safe Haven Ronald McDonald Facility $300,000 NV Whitney Manor $300,000 NW Toledo Hensville Entertainment District $250,000 NX Ottawa Hills Walk Path Project $175,000 NY Glass City Mural Wall Lighting (Toledo) $100,000 NZ Lucas County Sheriff Substation Renovation $100,000 OA Toledo Broadway Commercial Redevelopment Project $100,000 OB Madison County Airport Improvements $35,938 OC Animal Charity of Ohio Infrastructure Expansion $1,500,000 OD Community Learning Center $1,000,000 OE West Branch Regional Community Education and Wellness Training Center in Mahoning County $875,000 OF Mahoning Valley Historical Society Expansion and Improvement $750,000 OG Mahoning County Road Improvements $660,000 OH Mahoning County Veterans Center $650,000 OI Salem Airpark Improvements $600,000 OJ Youngstown Area Jewish Federation Building Expansion $501,389 OK Mahoning Valley Regional Multi-Jurisdictional Infrastructure Initiative $450,000 OL Boys and Girls Club of Youngstown $300,000 OM Youngstown Playhouse Roof $238,000 ON Village of Poland $185,000 OO Boys and Girls Club of Oak Hill $159,131 OP City of Struthers Mauthe Park Splash Pad $103,150 OQ Rich Center for Autism Building for Tomorrow Phase 2 $100,000 OR OCCHA Renovado Capital Campaign $93,500 OS Canfield Police Department Drone Program $60,000 OT War Vet Museum Facility and Program Improvement Project $60,000 OU Austintown 9-11 Memorial Park $50,000 OV VFW Roof Repairs Ellsworth Post 9571 $14,480 OW Marion Harding Performing Arts Center $347,000 OX Magnetic Springs Community Park $153,000 OY Marion Soldiers and Sailors Memorial Chapel $450,000 OZ George W. King Mansion – Etowah $300,000 PA Boys and Girls Club of Oak Street $277,170 PB Terradise Nature Center Interpretive Center $200,000 PC Women’s History Resource Center Phase II $185,000 PD City of Wadsworth Brickyard Athletic Complex and Fixler Reservation $2,500,000 PE Lake Medina $1,500,000 PF Akron Childrens Medina Health Center $1,400,000 PG Medina County Career Center Modular Fire Training Tower $1,000,000 PH Oenslager Nature Center $500,000 PI City of Medina Multi-Use Uptown Loop Phase 1 $396,000 PJ Medina County Radio System – Seville Tower $450,000 PK Medina County Sheriff Office Jail Safety Enhancement $200,000 PL Equine Assisted Mental Health Community Campus $200,000 PM Majestic Equine Connections $200,000 PN Main Street Medina Facade Improvement $150,000 PO Medina County Achievement Center Renovation and Innovative Vocational Training Building $100,000 PP Serenite Restaurant and Culinary Institute Roof/Gutter Repair $65,000 PQ Main Street Medina South Town Gateway $62,000 PR VFW Roof Repairs Medina Post 5137 $60,898 PS Homer Township Tornado Siren Project $36,834 PT Chippewa Lake Area Emergency Siren $35,000 PU Ohio University Airport Improvements $2,500,000 PV Meigs County Transportation Hub $1,500,000 PW Racine Entertainment District $1,500,000 PX 1872 Hall Complex $250,000 PY Meigs County Fair $250,000 PZ Fort Recovery Water Tower $600,000 QA Troy Great Miami River Recreation Connectivity Project $2,000,000 QB Troy-Miami County Public Library Improvements $500,000 QC Bethel Township VFD Improvements $400,000 QD Graysville and Community VFD Improvements $250,000 QE Bethel Community Center Improvements $183,000 QF Woodsfield Government and Community Center $100,000 QG Midway Community and Senior Citizens $70,000 QH Laings Community Center $23,000 QI VFW Roof Repairs Sardis Post 9930 $19,836 QJ Miami Chapel Inspire Zone Youth Workforce Development Center – Boys & Girls Club $3,000,000 QK Dayton Aviation Heritage Site (Wright Factory) $2,000,000 QL Dayton International Airport Concourse B $2,000,000 QM Future Development of Wright-Patterson $1,500,000 QN Healthy Family Market / Dayton Children's Pediatric Center $1,500,000 QO Tri-Cities North Regional Wastewater Authority $1,500,000 QP Kettering Business Park $1,250,000 QQ West Carrollton River District and Whitewater Park $500,000 QR Countryside Park Revitalization $1,000,000 QS Ronald McDonald House of Dayton $1,000,000 QT Schuster Center $1,000,000 QU Union Ring Road Completion Project - Phase II $1,000,000 QV Uptown Centerville Connectivity and Development Improvements $1,000,000 QW Harrison Township Police Headquarters Renovation $950,000 QX Saint Vincent de Paul Community Donation Intake Facility $800,000 QY Saint Vincent de Paul Social Services Emergency Shelter for Men $500,000 QZ Homefull Housing, Food and Jobs Center $750,000 RA Jefferson Township Community Improvements $600,000 RB BOLT Innovation Center $500,000 RC Centerville Schools Safety Access $500,000 RD Dayton Dream Center Transitional Housing $500,000 RE East End Whole Family Services Hub Facility Expansion and Renovation in Dayton $500,000 RF Union Ring Road Completion Project - Phase III $500,000 RG Robinette Park $400,000 RH Homefull’s Healthy Start Child Care & Early Learning Center West Dayton $350,000 RI Dayton Airshow $300,000 RJ Germantown Covered Bridge $275,000 RK Dayton Clothes that Work! Facility Improvements $250,000 RL Flyghtwood Sports Life and Leadership Campus $250,000 RM Grant Park Accessibility Improvements $250,000 RN K-12 Gallery and TEJAS Acquisition Project $250,000 RO Miami Township Public Works $250,000 RP Old North Dayton Park Expansion Project $250,000 RQ Catholic Social Services Supervised Visitation Center $200,000 RR Dayton Alvis, Inc. $195,149 RS Boys and Girls Club of Dayton $154,851 RT Preservation of Dayton Woman’s Club Historic Mansion $100,000 RU West Memory Gardens Flood Mitigation Project $75,000 RV German Township Channel Maintenance $60,000 RW Miamisburg Historical Society Improvements $40,000 RX Pennsville Volunteer Fire Department – New Building Construction $1,500,000 RY Historic Preservation, Job Creation, and Healthcare Expansion at the Stanbery Building (McConnelsville) $500,000 RZ Malta/McConnelsville Equipment Project $325,000 SA Chesterhill VFD Station $250,000 SB Morgan County Emergency Communications Center $250,000 SC Morgan County Fair $250,000 SD Reinersville Volunteer Fire Department $50,000 SE Flying Horse Farms Renovation and Updates to Facilities $350,000 SF Morrow County Engineers Facility $250,000 SG Morrow County Health Department Renovations $250,000 SH Water Filter Installation for Legacy Phosphorus Fields $500,000 SI The Wilds Giraffe Barn and Innovative Guest Lodging $2,500,000 SJ Avondale Youth Center HVAC Upgrade $450,000 SK The Tribe Athletic Complex Track $1,000,000 SL Ottawa County Workforce Hub and Center for Career Advancement $1,250,000 SM Skills Academy in Ottawa County $250,000 SN Ottawa County Fairgrounds Upgrades $200,000 SO Put-In-Bay Downtown Promenade Renovation $200,000 SP Genoa Civic Theatre Improvements $100,000 SQ Paulding County Agricultural Society Racetrack Lighting Improvement $41,000 SR Antwerp Rotary Basketball Court $40,000 SS Perry County Community Access and Workforce Training $500,000 ST Reading Township Volunteer Fire Department $1,250,000 SU Thornville AMVETS 51 $80,000 SV South Bloomfield Corridor Improvements $1,500,000 SW Ohio Christian University for Science $500,000 SX Pickaway County Library $250,000 SY Memorial Hall Window Replacement Project $200,000 SZ Pike Emergency Operations Backup Power Project $750,000 TA Ravenna Health Center $1,500,000 TB Serenity House Residential Facility $700,000 TC Happy Trails Farm Animal Sanctuary Welcome Center $500,000 TD Kent Safety Town $250,000 TE Shalersville Park $225,000 TF Freedom Township Historical Society Historical Museum $105,000 TG Buchert Park Improvements $51,000 TH Portage County Children’s Advantage HVAC $40,000 TI Windham Historical Society $27,950 TJ Preble County Fairgrounds Stall Barns $700,000 $400,000 TK Preble County Fairgrounds Multi-Purpose Community Room $300,000 TL Preble Gratis Well Reconstruction $50,000 TM Fort Jennings Park Pedestrian Bridge and Park Improvements $350,000 TN The Ottoville Park Community Wellness and Recreation Enhancement Project $213,000 TO Womens Policy and Resource Center $100,000 TP Buckeye Park Improvements $40,000 TQ Mansfield Christian School Improvements $1,500,000 TR Avita Comprehensive Cancer Center $1,150,000 TS Plymouth Fire Department Building Replacement $600,000 TT Mansfield Theater "Road to 100" Renovation $500,000 TU YMCA-North Central Ohio Sports Complex $500,000 TV Main Street Plaza Improvement Project $250,000 TW Richland County Agricultural Society $100,000 TX VFW Roof Repairs Mansfield Post 3494 $27,964 TY Ohio Genealogical Society Archives Security $10,000 TZ Hopewell Regional Visitor Center $5,000,000 UA Union Township Fire Department Project $175,000 UB Fremont Downtown Revitalization $1,350,000 UC Hayes Presidential Library Improvements $300,000 UD Fremont Water Access Emergency Response $150,000 UE Shawnee State University College of Health and Human Services $5,000,000 UF Appalachian Youth Behavioral Health Services Expansion $2,000,000 UG Scioto County Safety Operations Center $696,000 UH Scioto County Fairgrounds $600,000 UI Green Township Garage $500,000 UJ Installer Technician Registered Apprenticeship in Scioto County $323,150 UK Portsmouth Courtroom Renovations $240,000 UL Bloom-Vernon Local Schools Lighting $51,600 UM Seneca County Agricultural Center $370,000 UN Fostoria Learning Center Security $352,000 UO Seneca County Museum Interior Revitalization $190,000 UP Bettsville Emergency Medical Services Renovation $150,000 UQ Attica-Venice Township Joint Cemetery Mausoleum $93,742 UR Court Street Streetscape Project $50,000 US Ritz Theatre Marquee Renovation $30,000 UT Fort Loramie Industrial Park $724,000 UU Midwest Regional ESC Resilient Heights Improvements $600,000 UV Shelby County Community Workforce Training Center $500,000 UW Boys and Girls Club of Massillon $193,904 UX VFW Roof Repairs Louisville Post 7490 $42,970 UY Hall of Fame Village $9,763,126 UZ Pro Football Hall of Fame Modernization $7,000,000 VA Stark County Juvenile Detention System Demolition $64,200 VB Cascade Plaza $5,000,000 VC New Franklin Sewer Project $3,800,000 VD Akron-Canton Airport West Side Development for Aeronautic Activity $3,200,000 VE Cuyahoga Falls Regional Fire Training Complex $3,000,000 VF Akron Art Museum – Center for Digital Discovery $2,000,000 VG Akron Zoo Veterinary Hospital $1,750,000 VH Akron Community Health Center Addiction One Campus Expansion $1,250,000 VI Barberton City Hall and Justice Center $1,000,000 VJ Summit County Mobile Medical Project $1,000,000 VK Boston Heights Safety Center $986,831 VL Middle School Trades Education Center in Summit County $750,000 VM Hudson Inclusive Playground $680,000 VN Summit County Fairgrounds New Agriculture Center $600,000 VO Macedonia Service Center $500,000 VP Child Guidance and Family Solutions – Multi-Campus $450,000 VQ Boys and Girls Club - Steve Wise $440,913 VR Akron Urban League Building Improvements $400,000 VS Legacy Building Project Improvements $400,000 VT Bath North Fork Preserve Improvements $170,000 VU Copley Road Trail East $150,000 VV G.A.R. Hall Rehabilitation $150,000 VW Stark State Oil and Natural Gas Job Training Equipment $100,000 VX Stow First Responders Memorial $95,863 VY Special Education Cornerstone Community School $76,393 VZ Boston Township Hall ADA Upgrades $50,000 WA Cortland Safety Service Complex / Training Facility $2,150,000 WB West Warren Industrial Park Traffic and Fire Suppression Improvements $1,500,000 WC Holy Trinity Orthodox Christian Academy and Preschool $1,000,000 WD Eastwood Field Renovations $500,000 WE Trumbull County Fairgrounds Grandstand Renovation $500,000 WF Cortland’s Outdoor Education & Event Space $350,000 WG Bloomfield Regional Emergency Medical Services Renovation Project $345,000 WH Mosquito Lake State Park Water Improvements $330,350 WI Camp Sugarbush Infrastructure Improvements $300,000 WJ John F. Kennedy Renovation Project $300,000 WK Hubbard Outpost Sanitary Sewer Project $175,000 WL Liberty Township Fencing Project $100,000 WM Victory Christian School Renovation $100,000 WN Tuscarawas County Facilities Investments in Health, Safety, and Election Security $2,500,000 WO Tuscarawas County Engineer Building $1,350,000 WP Cleveland Clinic Union Hospital Cancer Center $1,000,000 WQ Fire, EMT, Law Enforcement Burn Building $500,000 WR Norma Johnson Center Improvements (Red Barn and Brandywine) $250,000 WS Dover Public Library Roof Replacement Project $85,731 WT Transportation Research Center, Inc. Impact Lab Upgrades $24,000,000 WU Richwood Pickleball $218,000 WV Leesburg Township Walking Trail and Playground Project $162,545 WW The Village of Richwood Fairgrounds $49,849 WX Northwest State Community College Van Wert Campus Renovation $1,000,000 WY Van Wert Regional Airport Runway Project $600,000 WZ VFW Roof Repairs Van Wert Post 5803 $41,754 XA Middle Point Memorial Park $25,000 XB Moser Park Concession Stand Replacement $19,860 XC Wilkesville Township Outdoor Warning Siren $35,000 XD Cincinnati Open Tennis Tournament $27,500,000 XE Warren County Ion Exchange Project $200,000 XF Waynesville and Maineville Girl Scout Camp Improvements $200,000 XG VFW Roof Repairs Mason Post 9622 $9,969 XH Mid Ohio Valley Aquatic Center $750,000 XI Memorial Community Childcare Center $375,000 XJ GAR Hall $375,000 XK Decatur Township Building Construction $350,000 XL Boys and Girls Club of Marietta $213,909 XM Marietta Saint Mary of the Assumption Roof Project $150,000 XN Betsy Mills Drainage Project $79,000 XO Marietta College Womens Softball Complex $50,000 XP VFW Roof Repairs New Matamoras Post 6387 $13,740 XQ Shreve Wastewater Treatment Plant System Improvements $1,750,000 XR Wooster Community Hospital Improvements $1,000,000 XS Wayne County Agricultural Society, Inc. $415,000 XT Wayne County Airport Hangar Construction Project $350,000 XU Wayne County Emergency Vehicle Drivers Training Course $300,000 XV Boys and Girls Club of Orrville $280,318 XW Boys and Girls Club of Edgewood $186,771 XX Foodsphere Commercial Kitchen/Food Marketplace $100,000 XY Edgerton Community Center $425,000 XZ Installation of Elevator to North Annex Building in Williams County $187,076 YA Wabash Cannonball Trail: Design Engineering $153,500 YB Wood County Engineer Garage and Maintenance Facility (Bowling Green) $1,000,000 YC Wood County Educational Service Center $750,000 YD Positive Community Connections Center Project (Bowling Green) $600,000 YE Wood County Committee on Aging $500,000 YF City of Perrysburg $200,000 YG North Baltimore Public Library Emergency Repairs $100,000 YH Wood County Public Library Heating Project $100,000 YI Upper Sandusky Midway Industrial Park $400,000 YJ VFW Roof Repairs Carey Post 3759 $20,712 Section 620.11. That existing Section 200.30 of H.B. 2 of the 135th General Assembly (as amended by H.B. 730 of the 136th General Assembly) is hereby repealed. Section 805.10. The items of law contained in this act, and their applications, are severable. If an item of law contained in this act, or if an application of an item of law contained in this act, is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other items of law contained in this act and their applications that can be given effect without the invalid item or application. Section 810.10. The provisions of this act in sections prefixed with section numbers in the 200s with the purpose of drawing money from the state treasury in payment of liabilities lawfully incurred under those sections cease to have effect after June 30, 2028. Section 835.10. This act is hereby declared to be an emergency measure necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety. The reason for such necessity is the need to provide funding continuity to ongoing and planned capital projects and the urgent need for strategic investments in local communities. Therefore, this act shall go into immediate effect. Speaker ___________________ of the House of Representatives. President ___________________ of the Senate. Passed ________________________, 20____ Approved ________________________, 20____ Governor. The section numbering of law of a general and permanent nature is complete and in conformity with the Revised Code. Director, Legislative Service Commission. Filed in the office of the Secretary of State at Columbus, Ohio, on the ____ day of ___________, A. D. 20____. Secretary of State. File No. _________	Effective Date ___________________